World Primer: Nosgoth

🌍 Overview of Nosgoth
Nosgoth is a dark, gothic realm steeped in ancient magic, time paradoxes, and a perpetual struggle between fate and free will. Once a balanced world maintained by the Pillars of Nosgoth, it is now fractured by corruption, war, and the actions of powerful beings. Themes of vampirism, divine manipulation, betrayal, and cyclical destruction run deep.

🧛 Vampires and Humans
Vampires are immortal stewards turned tyrants. Kain, a resurrected noble, becomes their lord and embraces a path defying destiny.
Humans, once dominant, now struggle for survival. The militant Sarafan Order arises to resist vampire rule, becoming zealous and morally compromised in their crusade. 

🔮 Major Themes
Fate vs. Free Will – Central to Kain and Raziel’s journey. Can destiny be changed?
Corruption of Power – The more power one holds, the closer one gets to madness.
Time and Paradoxes – Time travel is both a plot driver and gameplay element.

🔱 Key Factions and Characters
Kain – Antihero vampire lord, defies fate, creates his own empire.
Raziel – Fallen vampire turned wraith, manipulated across timelines.
The Elder God – Cosmic manipulator feeding on souls through the Wheel of Fate.
Moebius – The Time Streamer, puppet master under the guise of order.
The Pillars – Magical obelisks tied to balance and decay.
Factions:
Sarafan Order – Zealot humans turned oppressors.
Vampire Clans – Fractured houses under Kain’s dominion.
Hylden – Banished race of corruptive, tech-bound sorcerers.
Circle of Nine – Once guardians of the Pillars, now corrupt mages.
Outcasts – Mercenaries, scavengers, or rogue factions.

🗺️ Key Locations
Pillars of Nosgoth – Center of power and corruption.
The Abyss – Spectral chasm where Raziel was cast.
Vampire Citadel – Kain’s fortress.
The Stronghold – Sarafan base, now a source of decay.

📅 Timeline of Major Events
The Ancient War – Hylden vs. Ancients; Hylden banished.
Vampiric Curse – Ancients cursed, become vampires.
Corruption of the Pillars – Circle of Nine falls.
Kain's Resurrection – Refuses martyrdom, breaks fate.
Raziel’s Betrayal and Rebirth – Thrown into the Abyss, becomes wraith.
Soul Reaver’s Prophecy – Raziel's destiny revealed, cycles unravel.
Defiance – Final confrontation; Raziel merges with blade, Kain glimpses hope.

🧙 NPC Compendium (Abbreviated)
Kain – Vampire Lord; Ability: Chrono Reversal (1x/session negate time-based action)
Raziel – Wraith Bladebearer; Ability: Phase Strike (ignore armor for 1 round)
Moebius – Time Streamer; Ability: Reset Encounter (manipulate initiative/order)
Elder God – Cosmic Entity; Ability: Tentacle of Fate (pull 1 PC into Spectral Realm)
Vorador – Ancient vampire, rival and mentor; Ability: Blood Pact (ally gains +2 DR)

🌌 The Spectral Realm
Exists parallel to material reality.
Traversed by wraiths and spirits.
Physics distort; time warps.
Spectral creatures ignore physical armor.
Some spells function differently or grow stronger in this plane.

🗺️ Visual Map of Nosgoth (Narrative Description)
North: Mountains of the Hylden Gate; ice-choked wastelands and spirit tombs.
East: Ravaged human territories, Serafan Stronghold, blighted rivers.
South: Swamps of the Forgotten God, ancient ruins, and arcane machines.
West: The Abyss, crumbled Pillars, Vampire Citadel overlooking shattered canyons.

💠 Summary
Nosgoth is a world at war with itself—twisted by destiny, corrupted by power, and haunted by echoes of what might have been. Players who enter it are not merely adventurers; they are agents of change—whether toward damnation or redemption.
Let this document serve as the foundation for your journeys across Nosgoth’s dying light.




























Lineage Lore Compendium

In the shattered world of Nosgoth, race is more than bloodline—it is legacy, curse, and metaphysical resonance. The beings that walk the lands and linger in the spectral veil are not simply born, but shaped by prophecy, defiance, and decay. This document explores the origins and cultural myths of each major Lineage in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG.

🧛 Vampires
Once mortals, now immortal predators, the vampires of Nosgoth are fractured into broods descended from Kain's original lieutenants. Each carries echoes of their progenitor’s power and flaws. They were once enforcers of balance, but after Kain’s refusal to sacrifice himself for the Pillars, the bloodlines grew corrupt and territorial. The clans became increasingly bestial, with some adapting to the terrain and magic of their dominions. Despite their power, all vampires are slowly dying—sterile, cursed, and hunted by time.
▶️ Razielim
Cast into the Abyss by Kain and reborn in spectral flame, the Razielim are winged pariahs believed extinct. Those who remain are ghostly, proud, and obsessed with fate. Many seek revenge, answers, or to reclaim their lost heritage.
▶️ Turelim
Warrior-kings with seismic voices, the Turelim built fortresses and crushed resistance. Loyal to Kain's vision, they see themselves as righteous conquerors and shun the corruption of other clans.
▶️ Dumahim
Silent and stoic, the Dumahim are hulking brutes whose strength is matched only by their patience. Entombed for centuries, some still awaken beneath crumbling cathedrals or abandoned war engines.
▶️ Zephonim
Twisted by parasitic traits, the Zephonim adapted to ruined towers and vertical lairs. They are masters of ambush, secrets, and mutation.

👻 Wraiths
Wraiths are souls severed from their bodies by violent death or unfinished destiny. Some were once Razielim, others broken humans or Hylden who escaped the cycle. Without form, they draw power from memory, emotion, and raw Soul energy. They exist between realms, fading in and out of reality. While many lose themselves to madness, a few retain identity—and purpose.

🧠 Hylden-Corrupted (Formerly Human)
Once ordinary mortals, the Hylden-Corrupted are those humans who have irrevocably succumbed to the insidious influence of the true Hylden – the ancient, alien race banished to a dimension of torment, whose sanity-bending power and glyph-based energies still seep into Nosgoth. This corruption may stem from direct exposure to unearthed Hylden artifacts, the performance of heretical rituals designed to tap into their power, whispers from beyond the veil that prey on ambition or despair, or even deliberate, horrific experimentation with their dangerous technologies.
The transformation is both physical and mental. Their bodies often bear the marks of this alien taint: perhaps glowing glyphs painfully etched into their flesh, unnatural bio-mechanical growths merging with their anatomy, eyes that reflect the void, or other unsettling mutations that set them apart from unaltered humanity. Their minds, too, are warped and reshaped. While this often grants them unnatural access to the Hylden's sophisticated understanding of glyphcasting and other forbidden arts, it invariably comes at the cost of their original sanity, empathy, and human identity.
Driven by fragmented Hylden directives that echo in their minds, by delusions of grandeur and empowerment bestowed by their unseen "benefactors," or by a desperate, twisted desire to master the very powers that consume them, the Hylden-Corrupted often find themselves enacting the ancient Hylden's unfathomable goals. These might include unraveling the fabric of Nosgoth's reality, asserting dominance through their terrifying alien "gifts," or seeking to shatter the hated Wheel of Fate that binds souls to the Elder God.
To other humans, they are terrifying aberrations, walking nightmares, and traitors to their kind. To vampires, they represent unpredictable new players in the eternal struggle for Nosgoth – sometimes useful pawns, other times dangerous rivals wielding powers not born of blood or traditional necromancy. They are a testament to the pervasive, insidious nature of Hylden influence, a living warning that some doors are best left unopened.

🧙 Humans
Frail but defiant, humans are the last truly mortal race. Survivors of vampire purges, Hylden incursions, and their own hubris, they have become diverse and adaptable. From wandering Nomads to zealous Sarafan warriors, humans are driven by belief, memory, and legacy. Many train to hunt the undead, while others become scholars of the old gods and broken magics.
▶️ Sarafan
Fanatical knights who once enforced divine law, the Sarafan were resurrected as vampires by Kain, but their mortal faith persists in hidden orders. They are disciplined, fierce, and obsessed with purity.
▶️ Nomads
Descendants of those who refused to kneel to vampire lords, Nomads roam the wildlands, reclaiming forgotten places and surviving by skill and instinct.
▶️ Oracle-Blooded
Touched by visions or divine whispers, the Oracle-Blooded are rare seers, healers, or truth-speakers. Their birth is often heralded by omens.

🧬 Revenants
These half-wraith, half-corpse beings rise from death not by magic, but by the force of their own will. Some are rejected souls, others revived by necromancers or divine error. Revenants rot, but they remember. They are stubborn remnants of war, vengeance, or unfinished fate. Some serve Balance, others disrupt it—always with unfinished business.

🌑 Unbound
The Unbound are anomalies: beings born of glitches in fate or survivors of magical catastrophes. They resist all prophetic insight and often display unnatural luck or timing. Some theorize they are temporal echoes or shards of the Elder God’s mind. Others just call them dangerous. Whatever the truth, the Unbound do not fit into the cosmic pattern—and they like it that way.

Every lineage carries myth, stigma, and secret strength. GMs are encouraged to weave this lore into social encounters, racial prejudice, relic design, and prophecy fulfillment.




















Lineages (Races)

In Nosgoth, racial identity is more than a matter of heritage—it defines your connection to the realms, your resistance to corruption, and your legacy in the war between fate and freedom. In this system, races are known as Lineages, representing both physical form and metaphysical origin. Each Lineage comes with unique traits, starting skill bonuses, and potential narrative hooks.

🧛 Vampires
Movement Speed: 30 ft (6 squares) Terrain Bonus: Move through rubble and broken architecture without penalty. Stealth: +1 to Stealth rolls when moving in darkness or moonlight. Movement Effects: Can scale vertical surfaces with minor difficulty (DR 1)  if near blood trails. Immortal and cursed, vampires dominate the Material Realm with supernatural strength and blood-fueled powers.

Subtypes: Razielim, Turelim, Dumahim, Zephonim
Bonuses: +1 Weapon Mastery, +1 Stealth
Unique Trait: Gain 1 Blood when near a dying creature.
Narrative Hook: Bound by the wheel of fate and the blood of the ancients.
▶️ Razielim
Winged vampires once favored by Kain.
Bonus Skill: +1 Possession or Observation
Feature: Razielim Glide: "As part of your move on your turn, you can unfurl your wings to glide. This allows you to move up to 30 feet (6 squares) horizontally through the air. This gliding movement has the following properties:
You must end this movement on a solid surface you can stand on. If you do not, you fall any remaining distance.
This specific gliding movement does not provoke attacks of opportunity from enemies.
If you initiate this glide from an elevated position, you take no damage from the descent (for falls up to 60 feet / 12 squares). Additionally, for every 5 feet (1 square) of height you descend during the glide, you can extend the horizontal distance of the glide by an additional 5 feet (1 square), up to a maximum total horizontal glide distance of 60 feet / 12 squares (your base 30 feet / 6 squares + up to 30 feet / 6 squares from descent).
You cannot gain altitude with this glide; it is for horizontal movement or controlled descent."
Detect Planar Echoes (Razielim Lineage Feature)
A Razielim can extend their senses to perceive residual impressions—planar echoes—left on the fabric of reality by significant events, powerful emotions, temporal disturbances, or the crossing of beings between realms.
Action Required: 1 Action.


Focus Area: The Razielim concentrates on their immediate surroundings (e.g., a specific room, an ancient object, a person with a strong connection to the past or other realms) or a location where a planar disturbance is suspected.


Skill Roll: The player makes a Soul + Observation check.


Difficulty Rating (DR): The GM sets the DR based on the echo's nature:


DR 1 (Simple): Recent, potent, or emotionally charged echoes (e.g., a site of a very recent violent death, a powerful magical discharge moments ago).
DR 2 (Standard): Older echoes, events of moderate significance, or areas with a general lingering spiritual presence.
DR 3 (Challenging): Faint, ancient echoes, subtle temporal ripples, or echoes relating to beings who have tried to conceal their passage.
DR 4+ (Severe): Echoes that are deliberately warded, extremely ancient and fragmented, or touch upon profound truths of fate or the planes.
Effects of Success:


Standard Success (Meeting DR): The Razielim perceives a basic echo. This might manifest as:
A fleeting, ghostly image or reenactment of a brief moment.
A dominant emotion (fear, sorrow, rage, joy) strongly tied to the location or object.
A faint, disembodied sound (a whisper, a cry, a specific noise).
A sudden cold spot, a strange scent, or an unnatural stillness.
Extra Successes: For each success achieved beyond the DR requirement, the Razielim gains clearer and more detailed information. This could include:
A more extended or clearer vision of past events.
Understanding the source or context of an emotion.
Decipherable words or short phrases.
A better sense of who or what was involved in the event that created the echo.
The presence of multiple, fainter echoes linked to the primary one.
A subtle premonition or warning if the echo is tied to future events or dangers.
Pushing the Roll: If the initial roll fails and the player chooses to push it (gaining a Corruption Die as per your system's rules):


A '1' rolled on the Corruption Die might result in a backlash. This could manifest as a disturbing or overwhelming vision inflicting 1 point of Soul Stress (similar to the Wraith Phasing consequence), a momentary sensory overload (e.g., temporary blindness or deafness for 1 round), or attracting the fleeting attention of minor, curious (and potentially unsettling) spectral entities.
GM Guidance:


Planar echoes should primarily serve as a narrative tool, providing clues, deepening lore, or offering insights into the history of Nosgoth and its inhabitants.
The information gained should be primarily sensory. While it can warn of past dangers (like a trap that was sprung) or spectral presences, it doesn't typically grant direct, ongoing mechanical combat bonuses.
The Razielim player can describe what they are trying to focus on, which can help the GM tailor the echo's content.
Consider the nature of Nosgoth: echoes might be fragmented, paradoxical due to time distortions, or tinged with the oppressive atmosphere of the world.


▶️ Turelim
Muscle-bound warlords of Nosgoth.
Bonus Skill: +1 Tactics
Feature: Turelim Protector (Turelim Lineage Feature)
The Turelim are renowned for their unyielding defense and the protective loyalty they extend to those they consider under their charge. Their sheer physical presence and warrior's resolve allow them to shield their allies from harm.
Trigger: An ally within 5 feet (1 square) of the Turelim is successfully hit by an attack.
Action Cost: 1 Reaction.
Frequency: Once per scene.
Effect:
The Turelim can declare they are interposing themselves to take the blow meant for their ally.
The Turelim is now considered the one hit by that attack (the attack automatically hits the Turelim as they have moved into its path).
Against the damage dealt by this specific intercepted attack, the Turelim gains +2 to their Armor value. This bonus applies only to this single instance of damage.


▶️ Dumahim
Imposing and silent—undead titans.
Bonus Skill: +1 Presence
Feature: Patient Earthshaker (Dumahim Lineage Feature)
Embodying the immense, stoic strength and the unyielding patience of ages spent entombed, a Dumahim can channel their power into the very ground, unleashing a localized shockwave to disrupt their foes.
Condition for Use: To activate this ability, the Dumahim must not have willingly moved from their current space since the end of their previous turn. (Shifting in place or being forcibly moved does not prevent its use, but taking a move action does).
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Frequency: Once per scene.
Effect:
The Dumahim chooses to either Knock Prone OR Push Back enemies. This choice must be made before affected enemies attempt their check.
The Dumahim then slams a fist, foot, or weapon powerfully into the ground or an adjacent large, solid surface (like a stone floor, heavy debris, or a thick wall).
All enemies within a 10-foot (2 squares) radius of the Dumahim must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Fury check (to brace against the impact) or a DR 2 Evasion check (to leap clear of the worst of the tremor), whichever the target prefers.
Any enemy who fails this check suffers the effect chosen by the Dumahim:
If Knock Prone was chosen: The target is knocked prone in their current space.
If Push Back was chosen: The target is pushed 5 feet (1 square) directly away from the Dumahim. If this movement would push them into a solid obstacle (like a wall or another creature), they stop at the obstacle.


▶️ Zephonim
Insectoid vampires adept at infiltration.
Bonus Skill: +1 Thievery
Feature: Cling: As a Bonus Action, you can begin clinging to an adjacent vertical surface. You can maintain this cling for up to 3 rounds. While clinging, you can use your actions as normal. If you move from that spot, you are no longer clinging unless you use this feature again."
"A Zephonim utilizing their Cling feature can strategically achieve superior positioning. If clinging places them in Elevated Terrain relative to their adversaries, they gain +1 success on relevant combat rolls (such as ranged attacks) or awareness checks. Conversely, enemies targeting an elevated Zephonim with ranged attacks require +1 additional success to hit them. Should their clinging position provide Cover (e.g., behind an outcropping or architectural feature), attackers targeting them with ranged or spell attacks likewise require +1 additional success for half cover, or +2 additional successes for full cover. While clinging to an exposed position offers no inherent combat advantage beyond potential surprise, leveraging this feature for attacks from Stealth may grant further situational bonuses as per GM discretion or specific perk interactions."

👻 Wraiths
Movement Speed: 25 ft (5 squares) (Spectral: 35 ft (7 squares) while phased) Terrain Bonus: Ignore terrain penalties in the Spectral Realm. Stealth: Gain advantage on Stealth checks while in the Spectral Realm. Movement Effects: May pass through thin barriers while phased. Souls untethered from flesh, walking the boundary of life and death.
Bonuses: +1 Possession, +1 Observation, +1 Will
Unique Trait: Wraith Phasing
"You can manipulate your connection to the Spectral Realm. You can use this ability a number of times equal to your Will attribute (minimum 1 use) per long rest.
As a Bonus Action on your turn, you can expend one use of this ability to fully phase into the Spectral Realm. This effect lasts until the start of your next turn.
While phased:
Spectral Form:


You appear as a translucent, ghostly figure. Creatures in the Material Realm that cannot perceive the Spectral Realm have Disadvantage on Perception checks to notice you unless you interact directly with the Material Realm (e.g., attack, speak audibly).
Your movement speed is 35 feet. You ignore difficult terrain, and you can move through other creatures and physical obstacles as if they were difficult terrain. Obstacles you pass through can be no more than 1 foot thick.
You cannot end your movement inside another creature or a solid object. If you attempt to do so, or if the effect ends while you are inside an obstacle, you are immediately shunted to the nearest unoccupied space and suffer 1 point of Soul stress (or 1d6 non-lethal damage, GM's choice).
Spectral Interaction:


You can perceive and interact with the Spectral Realm normally (e.g., see spirits, spectral pathways, soul energies). Your view of the Material Realm appears muted and indistinct.
Attacks you make (whether unarmed or with weapons) deal Soul damage and ignore the physical Armor of targets in the Material Realm.
You can only affect creatures and magical objects in the Material Realm. You cannot interact with mundane, non-magical inanimate objects in the Material Realm (e.g., you cannot pick up a mundane rock or open a non-magical door unless it's thin enough to pass through).
Spectral Resilience:


You have Resistance to bludgeoning, piercing, and slashing damage originating from non-magical sources in the Material Realm.
You are immune to the grappled and restrained conditions caused by non-magical, physical means from the Material Realm.
Spells and magical effects that can target ethereal or spectral beings affect you normally. Other Material Realm spells might not affect you directly, at the GM's discretion based on the spell's nature (e.g., a mundane fire trap might not harm you, but a magical firewall would).

Narrative Hook: Forgotten by death, hunted by time.

🧠 Hylden-Blooded
Movement Speed: 30 ft (6 squares) Terrain Bonus: Move at full speed across corrupted or glyph-infused terrain. Stealth: No bonus, but may use Glyphcasting to alter terrain visibility. Movement Effects: May surge 10 ft once per scene when taking a Corruption Die. Exiled beings of entropy and dark invention.
Bonuses: +1 Glyphcasting, +1 Forbidden Knowledge
Unique Trait: May cast one spell per long rest without cost—but take Corruption.
Narrative Hook: Bearers of ancient wrath, seeking dominion or revenge.

🧙 Humans
Movement Speed: 30 ft (6 Squares) Terrain Bonus: May ignore one terrain penalty per session due to adaptability. Stealth: Gain +1 to Stealth when in crowds or chaotic environments. Movement Effects: May Dash through narrow spaces others cannot. Mortals who live, adapt, and fight for survival.
Bonuses: Choose any 2 skills to get +1 
Unique Trait: Gain 1 extra perk every 4 levels.
Narrative Hook: The last flickers of resistance and redemption.
▶️ Sarafan (Human Subgroup)
Warrior-priests sworn to order.
Bonus Skill: +1 Weapon Mastery or Religion
Feature: Zealous Surge (Active Component): Additionally, once per scene, you can use a Bonus Action to audibly invoke your convictions or focus your inner fire. When you do, choose one of the following immediate effects:


Smite the Unworthy: Your next successful weapon attack made before the end of your current turn against a creature you recognize as an Undead, a Vampire, or one overtly displaying signs of deep corruption (e.g., a Hylden-twisted entity, a practitioner of forbidden soul magic) deals an additional 2 points of damage.
Rallying Cry: Select one ally you can see and who can hear you. That ally gains +1 die to their next attack roll OR their next saving throw (they choose which, if both apply) made before the start of your next turn.
Purifying Resolve: You (or one willing ally you touch) immediately get to re-roll a failed saving throw against one ongoing effect that is causing Corruption gain or is of a clearly unholy/impure magical nature (e.g., a Hylden curse, a necromantic debility).


▶️ Nomads
Survivors of the wastes and wilderness.
Bonus Skill: +1 Nature or Craft
Feature: Active Aspect (Resourceful Moment): Once per scene, as a Bonus Action, you can quickly assess your immediate surroundings or the items you carry to find or create a fleeting advantage.
Declare a simple, plausible, non-magical advantage you're attempting to gain (e.g., "I kick dust/debris to briefly distract that guard," "I use this broken pipe for better leverage on this stuck door," "I spot a patch of unstable ground near that enemy," "I quickly sharpen a stick to use as a makeshift caltrop").
The GM will determine an appropriate skill check, typically Will + Nature, Will + Craft, or Will + Thievery, with a Difficulty Rating (DR) of 1 to 3 based on the environment and the plausibility of your idea.
On a success: You achieve the desired minor, temporary benefit. Examples include:
Granting yourself or an ally +1 die on their next immediate skill check related to your improvisation.
Imposing -1 die on an enemy's next immediate action (e.g., an attack roll or Perception check if distracted).
Creating a small (e.g., 5-foot square) patch of difficult terrain that lasts for 1-2 rounds.
Spotting a minor, temporary vulnerability (e.g., "that loose rock above them," "their strap is about to break") that might offer a narrative edge or +1 damage on a single, immediate attack exploiting it. The exact benefit is determined by the GM but should be a logical outcome of your improvised action and generally last for only one roll or a very brief period.


▶️ Oracle-Blooded
Touched by divinity or prophecy.
Bonus Skill: +1 Insight or Forbidden Knowledge
Feature: Fleeting Omen (Active Minor Ability): Additionally, once per scene, the Oracle-Blooded can use a Bonus Action to open their senses to the immediate future or hidden realities concerning a single target (a creature, object, or small area like a doorway or chest) they can see within 30 feet (6 squares).


Roll 1d6. The result gives a brief, symbolic, and often cryptic insight or feeling related to that target in the very near future (typically within the next few minutes or the current interaction):
Impending Harm/Loss: A flash of danger, pain, or something being taken/broken related to the target. (Mechanical suggestion: The next time the target takes damage or suffers a negative effect this scene, the Oracle-Blooded (or an ally they warn) knew something bad was coming and can use a Reaction to grant the target +1 die on a check to resist or mitigate it, or impose -1 die on an attacker if it's an attack).
Deception/Hidden Truth: A feeling of unease, something being hidden, or a duplicitous aura around the target. (Mechanical suggestion: The Oracle-Blooded gains +1 success on their next Insight check made against or regarding this target this scene).
Sudden Opportunity/Gain: A glimmer of hope, a brief vision of success, or a feeling of impending fortune related to the target. (Mechanical suggestion: The next time the target attempts an action that could lead to a significant positive outcome, they (or an ally acting on the target) gain +1 die on their roll).
Stagnation/Delay: A sense of inertia, obstacles, or time slowing around the target; things will not proceed as quickly as hoped. (Narrative clue, perhaps a warning not to rush).
Unexpected Movement/Change: A premonition of sudden motion, a shift in position, or an unforeseen alteration related to the target. (Narrative clue, or perhaps advantage on initiative if a combat is about to start involving the target).
Clarity/Revelation: A moment of profound understanding or a clear sign related to the target's immediate purpose or nature. (GM provides a useful, though not necessarily game-breaking, piece of clear information or +1 success on a relevant knowledge check about the target).
The GM describes the omen briefly and subjectively to the Oracle-Blooded player, who then interprets it. The mechanical suggestion is a guideline for the GM to translate the omen into a tangible, minor effect if appropriate.



🧬 Revenants
Movement Speed: 25 ft (5 squares) Terrain Bonus: Treat shallow graves, crypts, or ruined interiors as normal ground. Stealth: +1 Stealth in fog, smoke, or when obscured by decay. Movement Effects: May collapse into ash once per rest to move through bars or cracks. Souls returned to decayed bodies—half-wraith, half-corpse.
Bonuses: +1 Concentration, +1 Rituals
Unique Trait: Unyielding Purpose
A Revenant is a soul bound to a decaying form by sheer force of will, driven by a task left undone or a vow yet to be fulfilled. This singular focus grants them unnatural resilience and a relentless drive.
Death's Door Denied (Core Passive Trait): Once per major story arc (an "Act," as determined by the GM), when you are reduced to 0 Hit Points, your unyielding purpose drags you back from oblivion. At the start of your next turn (or immediately after the current combat encounter concludes, at the GM's discretion for narrative pacing), you rise with 1 Hit Point. Your decaying form visibly knits itself together just enough to continue your pursuit.


Driven by Will (Active Trait): Additionally, once per scene, you can draw upon the burning embers of your will that keep you animate. As a Bonus Action, you may choose one of the following effects:


Resolute Advance: For the next minute, you can ignore the effects of difficult terrain, and you gain +1 die on any check made to resist being forcibly moved or knocked prone. This reflects your stubborn refusal to be hindered.
Vengeful Focus: If pursuing a direct aspect of your "unfinished business" (a specific vendetta, a quest for a lost item tied to your past, protecting a legacy, etc., as defined with your GM), your next successful attack roll or damaging spell roll made against a target directly obstructing that business before the end of your next turn deals an additional +2 damage OR you gain +1 die on a single crucial skill check made this scene to overcome an obstacle related to that business.
Narrative Hook: Defying the grave, serving a second purpose.

🌑 Unbound
Movement Speed: 30 ft (6 squares) Terrain Bonus: May treat any difficult terrain as normal for 1 round per rest. Stealth: +1 Stealth while moving unpredictably or chaotically. Movement Effects: Once per session, teleport up to 20 ft as a bonus action. Wildcards—those untouched by lineage but shaped by chaos.
Bonuses: +1 any skill, +1 Insight or Observation
Unique Trait: Untethered Soul (Refined name for the fate immunity)
Effect: Once per game session, when you would be directly targeted or affected by a magical effect, prophecy, potent curse, or divinely influenced event that the GM determines is specifically attempting to control your actions, alter your destiny, or bind your will through fated means, you may choose to be entirely immune to that single instance of the effect. You instinctively 'glitch' or phase out of its intended metaphysical path, remaining unaffected. This cannot be used against direct physical damage that isn't intrinsically tied to such a fate-altering effect.
Secondary Active Trait: Probability Shift (This is the "expanded" part for more frequent use)
Lore: Unbound often display unnatural luck or timing, subtly warping the probabilities around them.
Frequency: Once per scene.
Action Cost: 1 Reaction.
Trigger & Effect: When you or another creature you can see within 30 feet (6 squares) makes an attack roll, skill check, or saving throw, you can attempt to introduce a 'glitch' into the immediate flow of probability related to that roll.
You can choose to affect one or two of the d6s rolled as part of that creature's dice pool.
That creature must re-roll the chosen die or dice.
If you targeted yourself or an ally: They use the new result(s) for the re-rolled dice if they are higher; otherwise, they keep their original roll for those dice (effectively, they get to re-roll for a better outcome).
If you targeted an enemy: They must use the new result(s) for the re-rolled dice, regardless of whether they are better or worse than the original.
You must declare the use of this ability after the initial dice are rolled but before the outcome of the roll is determined by the GM.
Narrative Hook: Broken from the tapestry, living proof that destiny can be hacked.

Each Lineage is a gateway to custom abilities, roleplay prompts, and adventure. Players are encouraged to mix these with backgrounds and perks for a truly personalized champion of Nosgoth.




Class Lore Compendium

In Nosgoth, power is not just earned—it is inherited, stolen, or bestowed by ancient forces. Every class in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG reflects a mythic archetype, shaped by aeons of war, betrayal, divine manipulation, and spectral unrest. The lore of each class helps players ground their characters in the fractured world of Nosgoth and ties their journey to the cosmic struggle over fate and freedom.

Blood Knight
Once temple guardians and arena champions, the Blood Knights are forged in battle and raised in blood rites. Their legacy stems from the vampiric warlords who survived Kain's purges and created their own martial sects. Bound by honor and violence, they believe pain is proof of purpose and that combat is a sacrament. Many are former Dumahim who broke ranks to forge new crusades across Nosgoth. They channel rage and resilience into overwhelming physical might.

Soul Reaver
The Soul Reavers are the few who dare to wield the echoes of the Reaver blade's legacy. Born from the fragmented memories of Raziel and others who walked between realms, they are trained to phase through worlds and strike at both body and spirit. Each Soul Reaver is haunted by visions of their possible futures—and pasts. Their magic and combat are inseparable, each blow carried on spectral wind. Though rare, they are often hunted by both Sarafan and Hylden for their potential.

Shadowmancer
Stalkers of shadow and master manipulators, Shadowmancers embrace the unseen. Born from the remnants of Zephonim assassin cults, their magic is drawn from the darkness between realms. Unlike Glyph Seekers, they distrust open conflict and use illusions, fear, and sudden violence to overwhelm foes. They often serve as spies, saboteurs, or lone agents in long-forgotten towers. The veil is both their weapon and their sanctuary.

Sangromancer
Sangromancers are heirs to the darkest of Nosgoth’s magical legacies: blood sorcery. Drawing from Hylden rituals, vampiric biology, and forgotten alchemical arts, these mages reshape flesh and spill vitae to control the battlefield. Once banned by the Sarafan and still feared by the Balance Wardens, Sangromancers hide in ruined temples and blood-wells. Their power grows with every drop spilled—and they feel the pulse of every living thing.

Glyph Seeker
Glyph Seekers are arcane scholars and sigil-scribes who channel structured magic through symbols, relics, and spatial geometry. Born from the magical studies that predate the Pillars’ fall, they believe in restoring order through enchantment. Many are exiled Hylden researchers or humans trained under secretive academies in mountain vaults. They manipulate energy with precision and are responsible for the majority of Nosgoth’s remaining functional wards.

Dreadblade
Assassins who move through shadow like wind through ruined stone, Dreadblades are weapons first and people second. Descendants of Sarafan enforcers or cursed Zephonim war survivors, they blend magic and martial precision. Known for single-strike kills and spectral poisons, they often work alone or serve as elite scouts in cursed territories. Every blade is an execution. Every step, a death foretold.

Warden of Balance
Sworn to the protection of the Balance Pillars—even shattered—they are chosen by visions or reborn through divine ritual. Wardens of Balance are part priest, part enforcer, and part oracle. They seek to maintain the delicate equilibrium between realms, magic, and morality. Some were once Sarafan or Oracle-Blooded humans granted divine insight. Their power is fueled not just by Soul or Will, but by an unwavering sense of cosmic duty.

Hylden Warlock
Exiles, traitors, and entropy-scarred prophets—the Hylden Warlocks are Nosgoth’s most feared casters. Drawing from glyph decay, soul leeching, and forbidden prophecy, they channel pain and memory into raw spellcraft. Many have fled the Spectral Realm, bearing fragments of the Wheel of Fate itself. They twist the rules of time, break the bonds of sanity, and whisper truths too dangerous to speak aloud. Power is their only god.

Each class bears not just abilities, but a story—woven from Nosgoth’s blood-soaked ruins and celestial fractures. GMs are encouraged to use this lore when crafting NPC mentors, factional goals, or questlines tied to class destinies.












Class Compendium

This document contains a comprehensive overview of all core classes available in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG system. Each class is designed to reflect a different aspect of Nosgoth's mythos—spectral magic, divine judgment, blood-fueled rage, and more.

Blood Knight
Starting Skill Points: 5
Starting HP: 12
HP Per Level: +6
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every  level
Role: Tank / Melee Bruiser
Core Stats: Fury, Blood
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.

Class Abilities:
Blood Frenzy: Gain +2 Fury when damaged in combat.
Life Drain: Heal 1 HP per 2 damage dealt via melee.
Passive: +1 Dmg when under 50% HP.
Suggested Skills for Point Allocation: Given their role, Blood Knights would benefit from investing points in:
Weapon Mastery: Essential for melee combat effectiveness.
Evasion: To supplement their tanking capabilities.
Unarmed Combat: If focusing on natural vampire weaponry or brawling.
Tactics: For battlefield control and positioning.
Presence: To intimidate foes.
Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Iron Hide
Effect (Passive): When your current Hit Points are at or below 50% of your maximum HP, your skin toughens like iron. You automatically gain +1 to your Armor value. This bonus is lost if your HP rises above 50%.
Example: If you have 2 Armor normally, you'd have 3 Armor while Iron Hide is active.
Lvl 2: Brutal Counter
Effect (Reactive): When an enemy successfully hits you with a melee attack while adjacent to you, their aggression is met with immediate retribution. After their attack resolves, the attacker automatically suffers 1 physical damage from your counter-strike. This does not require you to use your Reaction action.
Lvl 3: Iron Veins
Effect (Passive): Your blood runs thick and unnaturally resilient, or perhaps you have little true blood left to spill. You are immune to the Bleeding status effect and any ongoing damage specifically caused by such effects. You still take the initial damage from attacks that would cause bleeding.
Lvl 4: Bloodrush
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Cost: 1 Blood Point.
Effect: You expend a measure of your vampiric vitae to fuel a burst of supernatural speed. You immediately gain an additional Move action this turn, allowing you to move up to your full Speed again. This extra movement can be taken before or after your standard Action or Move. You can only benefit from Bloodrush once per turn.
Lvl 5: Crushing Blow
Action Cost: Bonus Action to prepare.
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Effect: You focus your strength into your next attack. If your next successful melee weapon attack made before the end of your current turn hits a creature, in addition to normal damage, the target must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Might save. If the save fails, the target is Stunned for 1 round (they cannot take Actions or Move on their next turn, and cannot take Reactions until the start of their turn after that).
Lvl 6: Juggernaut
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Effect: You lower your shoulder and charge forward with unstoppable force, moving up to your full Speed in a straight line. You can attempt to move through the spaces of any creatures of your size or smaller in this path.
For each creature whose space you attempt to enter, they must make a DR 2 Evasion check OR an opposed fury check against your Might (target chooses which check to make).
If the creature fails: You move through their space, they are knocked Prone, and you may continue your movement if you have any remaining.
If the creature succeeds: Your movement stops in the space before theirs. You can attempt to push through a maximum number of creatures equal to your Fury attribute (minimum 1) per Juggernaut charge. This movement does not deal damage unless a separate attack is made.
Lvl 7: Deathbound
Frequency: Once per scene.
Effect (Reactive): If you are reduced to 0 Hit Points, your vampiric nature refuses to yield. Instead of falling unconscious or suffering further consequences, you are immediately restored to 1 Hit Point. This effect triggers automatically and can interrupt the attack or effect that would have otherwise incapacitated you.
Lvl 8: Warpath
Effect (Passive): Your melee attacks strike with such force that they can shatter or bypass defenses. When you deal damage with a successful melee attack, you treat the target as having 1 less point of Armor than they actually possess (to a minimum of 0 Armor).
Lvl 9: Crimson Avatar
Action Cost: Bonus Action to activate.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Duration: 1 minute.
Effect: You unleash your full vampiric fury, transforming into a terrifying paragon of destruction. For the duration:
You gain an additional Action on each of your turns. This additional Action can be used for any activity a normal Action can (e.g., Attack, use an ability, Juggernaut).
You gain +1 die on all Fury-based skill checks and melee attack rolls.
Your physical appearance becomes more monstrous and imposing.
Lvl 10: Bloodstorm
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Effect: You become a whirlwind of devastating melee strikes. As an Action, make a single melee attack roll. Compare this result to the Defense Value (DV) of all enemies within 5 feet of you. All enemies whose DV is met or exceeded take your normal weapon damage.
Level 11: Sanguine Bulwark
Effect: Your "Iron Hide" perk (+1 Armor when below 50% HP) now grants +2 Armor instead. Additionally, when you spend 1 Blood for "Bloodrush," you also gain Temporary HP equal to your current Blood attribute score (before spending the point for Bloodrush). These Temporary HP last for 1 minute.
Level 12: Overwhelming Momentum
Effect: Your "Juggernaut" charge (Lvl 6) can now push enemies an additional 5 feet (1 square) back. Furthermore, if an enemy is knocked prone by your Juggernaut or stunned by your "Crushing Blow" (Lvl 5), they are so disoriented that their next attack roll suffers disadvantage (or they roll -2 dice).
Level 13: Font of Vitae
Effect: Your maximum Blood point pool increases by 2. Additionally, when a creature with blood is slain within 10 feet (2 squares) of you, you can use your Reaction to draw upon its fading life essence, regaining 1 Blood point.
Level 14: Relentless Predator
Effect: Your "Warpath" perk (Lvl 8: attacks ignore 1 Armor) is enhanced. You now ignore 1 point of enemy Armor on all melee attacks. If the target is below 50% HP, you ignore 2 points of their Armor instead. Your "Life Drain" is also more effective against weakened foes, healing an additional 1 HP whenever you damage an enemy that is below 50% of its maximum HP.
Level 15: Crimson Terror
Effect: When you activate "Crimson Avatar" (Lvl 9), your transformation is terrifying. For the duration, enemies who start their turn within 15 feet (3 squares) of you and can see you must succeed on a DR 2 Will save or become Frightened until the end of their next turn. An enemy who succeeds on this save is immune to this fear effect for the remainder of the current Crimson Avatar activation.
Level 16: Unyielding Spirit
Effect: Your "Deathbound" perk (Lvl 7: auto-heal to 1 HP once per scene) is improved. When it activates, you now return to 10% of your maximum HP (rounded up). Additionally, you gain a permanent +1 die bonus to saving throws against effects that would cause paralysis or stun.
Level 17: Lord of the Feast
Effect: Your "Life Drain" ability becomes even more potent. You now heal 1 HP for every 1 damage dealt via melee when you are below 50% of your maximum HP (instead of the normal 1 HP per 2 damage). Furthermore, your "Bloodstorm" (Lvl 10) ability now also siphons life; you heal HP equal to half the total damage dealt by a single Bloodstorm attack, divided amongst the targets hit (e.g., if Bloodstorm deals 12 total damage across 3 enemies, you heal 6 HP).
Level 18: Essence Thief
Effect: When you successfully damage an enemy that possesses magical resources (like Soul Energy, Blood Points, or spell slots, GM's discretion), you have a chance to siphon their power. Once per turn upon dealing melee damage, the target must make a DR 2 Will save. If they fail, they lose 1 unit of their magical resource (e.g., 1 Blood point, 1 Soul Energy, or suffer a minor penalty to their next spellcasting attempt) and you gain 1 Blood point. This cannot raise you above your maximum Blood.
Level 19: Adamantite Form
Effect: Your physical form becomes incredibly resilient. You gain a permanent +1 to your base Armor value. Additionally, you become immune to critical hits; any critical hit against you is treated as a normal hit instead.
Level 20: Blood Tyrant's Apotheosis
Effect: You have reached the zenith of your vampiric might as a Blood Knight. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can enter an Apotheosis state for 1 minute:
Your Fury and Blood attributes are increased by +2 (this can exceed your normal maximum).
All your melee attacks automatically count as having rolled one additional success for determining hit and for triggering bonus effects from extra successes.
Your "Life Drain" ability heals you for the full damage dealt by your melee attacks (1 HP per 1 damage), regardless of your current HP.
You are immune to all mind-affecting effects (including fear and domination) and gain resistance to all non-magical physical damage (bludgeoning, piercing, slashing).




Soul Reaver
Starting Skill Points: 5
Starting HP: 10
HP Per Level: +5
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every  level
Role: Phase Warrior / Hybrid Caster
Core Stats: Soul, Fury
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.
Class Abilities:
Phase Walk (Soul Reaver Core Class Ability)
You have learned to briefly and partially shift your form into the Spectral Realm, becoming ethereal enough to glide through physical barriers.
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Activation: As a Bonus Action on your turn.
Duration: Until the end of your current turn.
Effect: Upon activation, your form becomes visibly translucent and wreathed in faint spectral energies. For the duration of this effect (until the end of your current turn):
Pass Through Obstacles: You can move through solid physical objects and obstacles (such as walls, doors, large furniture, or even other creatures) as if they were difficult terrain.
Thickness Limit: The portion of any single obstacle you pass through can be no more than 5 feet thick. (This allows passage through most standard walls or doors, but not exceptionally thick barriers).
No Ending Inside: You cannot willingly end your movement inside a solid object or obstacle. If this effect ends while you are inside an obstacle (e.g., you don't have enough movement to pass fully through a 5-foot thick wall), you are immediately and safely shunted to the nearest unoccupied space you occupied before entering the obstacle, and you suffer 1 point of Soul Stress (or take 1 irreducible non-lethal damage if Soul Stress isn't a regularly tracked resource for non-Wraiths) from the jarring planar displacement.
No Attacks of Opportunity: Your movement while Phase Walk is active does not provoke attacks of opportunity as you slip ethereally past foes.
Traversal Focus: This ability is primarily for movement and bypassing obstacles. While Phase Walk is active, you do not inherently gain other benefits associated with being fully in the Spectral Realm (such as resistance to physical damage, the ability to see purely ethereal spirits if you couldn't already, or your normal attacks dealing Soul damage) unless another active ability or perk grants these simultaneously.
Soul Bolt (Soul Reaver Core Class Ability)
Drawing upon their unique connection to the Spectral Realm and the echoes of potent souls, the Soul Reaver can unleash a damaging bolt of pure spiritual energy.
Action Cost: 1 Action
Cost: 0 Soul Energy (SE)
This makes it an at-will ranged attack, akin to a basic weapon attack for martial classes or a cantrip for casters.
Range: 60 feet (12 squares)
Target: One creature or object.
Attack Roll: You make a ranged spell attack. Roll a dice pool equal to your Soul attribute + your Focus skill against the target's Defense Value (DV).
Effect on a Hit:
The target is struck by a shimmering bolt of spectral energy and suffers 3 Soul damage.
Spectral Strike: This damage is spiritual in nature. It bypasses (ignores) all non-magical physical Armor the target may have.
Soul Bolt can affect ethereal or incorporeal creatures as if they were solid.
Effect on a Miss: The bolt dissipates harmlessly.
Soul Reaver's Perception (Passive Class Feature)
Your unique existence, treading the line between the Material and Spectral Realms and haunted by echoes of what was and could be, sharpens your senses against hidden dangers and unseen entities.
Trap Intuition:


When you move within 10 feet (2 squares) of any hidden trap (whether mundane, magical, or spectral in nature), you automatically receive a chance to notice it. The GM will grant you an Observation skill check against the trap's detection DR, even if you haven't declared that you are actively searching.
Furthermore, you gain a permanent +1 die bonus to any Observation checks you make specifically to locate, understand the workings of, or determine how to disarm traps.
Spirit Kenning:


You possess an innate and constant awareness of spiritual presences. You automatically sense the general presence (a feeling, shimmer, or whisper), approximate number (e.g., "a lone entity," "several faint traces," "a strong convergence"), and rough direction of any hidden, disguised, invisible, or ethereal spirits within 30 feet (6 squares) of you. This basic awareness does not require a skill check.
To discern more specific details about these spirits (such as their precise nature, exact current location if mobile, emotional state, specific intent, or weaknesses), you must typically make an appropriate skill check (e.g., Observation, Soul + Insight, Will + Forbidden Knowledge, or a relevant social skill if attempting communication). For such checks to learn more about spirits you have passively sensed, you gain a +1 die bonus.

Suggested Skills for Point Allocation:
Weapon Mastery: Especially if wielding a Reaver-like weapon.
Observation: Synergizes with their passive ability.
Glyphcasting or Rituals: For the "Hybrid Caster" aspect, depending on the desired type of magic.
Forbidden Knowledge: Given Raziel's journey and connection to fate.
Concentration: To maintain concentration on spectral abilities.
Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Echo Resonance
Effect (Passive): When you personally defeat an enemy (i.e., your attack or ability reduces them to 0 HP or otherwise vanquishes them), you absorb a fragment of their fading spiritual energy. You immediately gain +1 Soul Energy (SE). This cannot cause you to exceed your maximum Soul Energy.
Lvl 2: Ghost Touch
Effect (Passive & Active): Your affinity with the spectral allows you to interact with ethereal constructs. You can physically touch and attempt to manipulate spectral locks, spiritual wards, or ghostly barriers as if they were solid.
To disable such a spectral mechanism, you typically make an appropriate skill check (e.g., Shadow + Thievery for intricate mechanisms, or Soul + Focus for wards of will) against a Difficulty Rating (DR) set by the GM. This perk grants you the ability to make such an attempt where others could not.
Lvl 3: Spirit Chain
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Effect: You unleash a chain of spectral energy at one creature you can see. Make a spell attack roll (using Soul + your primary spellcasting skill like Glyphcasting or Rituals, versus the target's Defense Value).
On a hit: The target suffers 2 Soul damage (this damage type bypasses physical Armor). The target must then succeed on a DR 2 Might save or be pulled up to 15 feet (3 squares) directly towards you and become Stunned for 1 round (unable to take Actions or Move on their next turn, and no Reactions until their turn after that).
If the Might save succeeds, the target is pulled only 5 feet (1 square) and is not Stunned.
Lvl 4: Soul Fortify
Effect (Passive): Whenever you expend one or more Soul Energy points to activate one of your Soul Reaver class abilities or cast a spell, your spirit bolsters your physical form. You immediately gain Temporary Hit Points equal to the number of Soul Energy points spent. These Temporary HP last for 1 minute or until depleted. Gaining new Temporary HP from this perk replaces any existing Temporary HP granted by it.
Lvl 5: Echo Sweep
Effect (Enhancement to Soul Bolt): When your "Soul Bolt" core ability successfully hits its primary target, arcs of spectral energy lash out. Choose up to two additional creatures within 5 feet (1 square) of the original target. These secondary targets automatically suffer Soul damage equal to half the damage dealt to the primary target (rounded down, minimum 1 Soul damage). No additional attack roll is needed for these secondary targets.
Lvl 6: Dual Form
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Duration: 1 minute, or until destroyed, or dismissed (Bonus Action).
Effect: You summon a spectral, semi-translucent duplicate of yourself in an unoccupied space you can see within 15 feet (3 squares).
The Dual Form has Hit Points equal to (your Character Level + your Soul attribute). It uses your Defense Value but has 0 Armor.
It acts on your initiative. On your turn, you can use your Bonus Action to mentally command it to move up to its speed (equal to yours) and take one of the following actions:
Melee Strike: Make a melee attack using your Soul attribute + an appropriate combat skill, dealing 2 Soul damage on a hit.
Assist Ally: Grant +1 die to the next attack roll or skill check of an ally adjacent to the Dual Form.
Interact: Perform a simple object interaction.
The Dual Form cannot use your perks or more complex abilities unless improved by later perks.
Lvl 7: Ethereal Blink
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Frequency: Once per scene.
Effect: You briefly shift fully into the Spectral Realm and re-emerge, instantly teleporting up to 10 feet (2 squares) to an unoccupied space you can see. This movement does not provoke attacks of opportunity.
Lvl 8: Soul Brand
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Duration: 1 minute, or until the target is defeated.
Effect: You affix a glowing, spectral brand onto one creature you can see. For the duration, all your attacks (weapon or spell) against the branded target deal an additional +2 damage. This bonus damage is Soul-type if the original attack was Soul-type or magical; otherwise, it matches the attack's type. You can only have one Soul Brand active at a time; branding a new target immediately ends the previous brand.
Lvl 9: Reaver Ascension
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 3 Soul Energy.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Duration: 1 minute.
Effect: You channel the fierce, soul-devouring power reminiscent of the Reaver blade, transforming your spiritual essence. For the duration:
Your melee weapon attacks (or unarmed strikes if you fight that way) are wreathed in visible spectral fire, dealing an additional +2 Soul damage (this damage bypasses physical Armor).
You gain +1 die on all melee attack rolls and on saves against fear or domination effects.
Your appearance becomes more menacing, with spectral energy visibly emanating from you and your weapon.
Lvl 10: Riftstorm
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 3 Soul Energy.
Range: Target a point you can see within 60 feet (12 squares).
Area of Effect: 15-foot (3 squares) radius sphere.
Duration: Until the end of your next turn (1 full round).
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: You tear a hole between the Material and Spectral Realms, creating a swirling vortex of temporal distortions and raw soul energy.
The area within the Riftstorm is difficult terrain and lightly obscured by spectral mists.
Any creature (friend or foe, unless specific perks grant immunity) that starts its turn within the Riftstorm or enters it for the first time on a turn becomes temporally dislocated: on its turn, it can take EITHER an Action OR a Move action (not both), and cannot take Bonus Actions or Reactions while affected.
Ranged attack rolls made into, out of, or through the Riftstorm suffer a -1 die penalty.



Level 11: Perfected Phase
Effect: Your "Phase Walk" ability can now be used a number of times per rest equal to your Will attribute (minimum 2 uses). Additionally, while fully phased into the Spectral Realm (such as via your race's Wraith Phasing ability, if applicable, or similar effects), you gain +2 dice on your Stealth checks and your spectral movements are utterly silent.
Level 12: Soul Flayer
Effect: When you achieve a Critical Hit with your "Soul Bolt" ability or a soul-infused weapon attack (e.g., during "Reaver Ascension"), the target takes an additional +2 Soul damage (this damage type bypasses physical armor). Furthermore, on any such Critical Hit, the target must also make a DR 2 Will save or be Stunned for 1 round as their spirit is momentarily overwhelmed.
Level 13: Unbound Reaver
Effect: The power of your "Reaver Ascension" (Lvl 9 perk) now lasts twice as long. (If its original duration was not specified in rounds/minutes, assume it now lasts for a significant combat or for 5 minutes). While Reaver Ascension is active, your melee weapon is wreathed in spectral energy, increasing its reach by 5 feet (1 square) as spectral tendrils lash out.
Level 14: Temporal Foresight
Effect: Your connection to time's echoes grants you brief, life-saving premonitions. Once per short rest, when an enemy declares an attack against you but before they roll their attack dice, you can use your Reaction to impose a -2 dice penalty on their attack roll for that specific attack.
Level 15: Echoing Duplicates
Effect: Your "Dual Form" (Lvl 6 perk) spectral clone is now more substantial. It has Hit Points equal to your character level + your Soul attribute. Once during its existence, it can attempt to use your "Spirit Chain" ability (using your attributes and skill bonuses for the check). If the clone successfully uses Spirit Chain (i.e., the target is pulled and stunned), it dissolves immediately after the effect resolves, its energy expended.
Level 16: Ethereal Supremacy
Effect: Once per long rest, as an Action, you can merge completely with the Spectral Realm for up to 1 minute, becoming truly Ethereal. While in this state:
You are invisible to creatures that cannot see into the Spectral Realm.
You can move through creatures and solid objects of any thickness as if they were difficult terrain (if you end your turn inside an object, you are shunted to the nearest unoccupied space and suffer 1 point of Soul Stress).
You reduce all damage taken from non-magical Material Realm sources by an amount equal to your Soul attribute (minimum 1). Magical attacks or weapons that can specifically harm ethereal beings affect you normally.
You can only affect other ethereal beings or directly target a creature's soul/spirit (e.g., with Soul Bolt, or if your weapon is soul-infused). You cannot physically interact with the Material Realm otherwise. This state ends early if you choose to dismiss it (Bonus Action) or are forced out by specific anti-ethereal effects.
Level 17: Soul Siphon Mastery
Effect: Your "Echo Resonance" perk (Lvl 1: Gain +1 Soul Energy on kill) is enhanced: you now gain +1 Soul Energy whenever you successfully deal Soul damage to a creature with a Soul Bolt or a soul-infused melee attack (this can only trigger once per target per turn, and is in addition to the on-kill bonus from Echo Resonance). Furthermore, when you personally defeat an enemy designated as significant by the GM, you can draw in a substantial portion of their spiritual essence, immediately regaining a flat 3 Soul Energy.
Level 18: Chronal Echoes
Effect: Your mastery over temporal energies linked to the Reaver deepens.
Your "Ethereal Blink" (Lvl 7 perk) is enhanced: You can now use Ethereal Blink a number of times per scene equal to your Will attribute (minimum of 2 uses per scene). It remains a Bonus Action to activate.
Additionally, when you use "Riftstorm" (Lvl 10 perk), you are immune to its time-disrupting effects, and you can designate one additional ally who was within the Riftstorm's area of effect at casting to also be immune.
Level 19: Ascended Soul Brand
Effect: Your "Soul Brand" (Lvl 8 perk) now inflicts deeper spiritual wounds. The bonus damage dealt to the branded target by your attacks increases to be equal to your Soul attribute value (minimum +1 bonus damage). Additionally, while Soul Brand is active on a target, your attacks against them ignore any specific resistance they have to Soul damage (but not outright immunity). Your first Critical Hit against the branded target also applies the "Soul Lock" effect (Target cannot be healed or resurrected for 1 round) without requiring a saving throw from the target.
Level 20: Reaver Incarnate
Effect: You embody the full, terrifying potential of the Soul Reaver. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can become a Reaver Incarnate for 1 minute:
Your form shifts, becoming more spectral and menacing, wreathed in soulfire. You are considered to be under the effects of "Reaver Ascension" for the duration, and your soul-infused weapon attacks deal an additional +4 Soul damage.
You can use your "Ethereal Blink" ability as a free action once during each of your turns (if you have the Ethereal Blink perk).
Your Soul Bolt attacks now always inflict the additional +2 Soul damage from your "Soul Flayer" (Lvl 12) perk on every hit (the DR 2 Will save to avoid being Stunned from Soul Flayer still only applies if the Soul Bolt was a Critical Hit, as per normal critical hit rules).
You gain a spectral flight speed equal to your normal movement speed, allowing you true, untethered aerial movement.




Shadowmancer
Starting Skill Points: 6
Starting HP: 8
HP Per Level: +4
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every level
Role: Stealth / Controller / Summoner
Core Stats: Shadow, Soul
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.
Class Abilities:
Cloak of Mist (Shadowmancer Core Class Ability)
By manipulating the veiling energies from the darkness between realms, the Shadowmancer can temporarily weave a personal shroud of mist and shadow, allowing for a moment of perfect, supernaturally-aided stealth.
Frequency: Once per short rest. (This is inferred from the Level 19 perk "Untraceable Phantom," which grants additional uses).
Activation: As a Bonus Action on your turn.
Duration: The effect applies to a single, discrete Stealth-related action or attempt to become hidden that you undertake immediately after activating this ability on the same turn.
Effect: When you activate Cloak of Mist, you are momentarily enveloped in a swirling confluence of illusory mists and clinging shadows that perfectly muffle your sound and obscure your form from mundane senses. For one single Stealth skill check you make immediately following this activation:
You automatically succeed on that Stealth check. This means you achieve the desired outcome of that specific stealthy action without needing to roll dice (e.g., you successfully become Hidden if basic conditions for cover or concealment are present, you move silently past a specific guard without alerting them, you pickpocket an item flawlessly, etc.).
The supernatural mists and shadows ensure that, for this one action, your execution is flawless and goes unnoticed by normal observation. The concealing effect dissipates immediately after the discrete Stealth action is completed or the attempt to Hide is resolved.
Limitations:
Not True Invisibility: While this ability makes your chosen stealthy action perfectly executed and unnoticed by normal senses for that moment, it does not grant ongoing invisibility if you are in plain sight without any cover or means to remain unseen after the action. For example, if you use it to silently approach someone in a well-lit open room, they will see you after your approach unless you immediately take cover or use another ability.
GM Discretion for Implausible Actions: If you attempt to use Cloak of Mist for an action that is narratively implausible even with perfect stealth (e.g., attempting to hide by "blending in" with a bare, brightly lit white wall while multiple guards are staring directly at you from 5 feet away), the GM may rule that "automatic success" results in the best possible outcome under those extreme circumstances, which might be creating a brief moment of confusion or distraction rather than achieving a fully Hidden status against all observers.
Specific Detection: This ability primarily foils mundane senses and standard observation. Creatures with specialized senses (like blindsight, tremorsense tuned to your exact location, or potent magical truth-seeing abilities) might still be able to detect you or your action, though the GM might grant you a strong circumstantial bonus (e.g., they make their detection roll with a significant dice penalty like -3 dice) due to the supernatural nature of the mist.
Shadow Familiar (Shadowmancer Core Class Ability)
You can reach into the veiled darkness between realms to call forth or coalesce a minor shadowy entity to serve as your familiar.
Initial Summoning & Dismissal:


Ritual: You learn a special ritual that takes 10 minutes of uninterrupted concentration and costs 1 Soul Energy to perform. Upon completion, your Shadow Familiar manifests.
Persistence: You can only have one Shadow Familiar at a time. It remains with you until it is reduced to 0 Hit Points, you dismiss it, or you perform the ritual again to summon a new familiar (causing any current one to dissipate).
Dismiss: You can dismiss your familiar as a Bonus Action, causing it to melt back into ambient shadows.
Resummoning: If your familiar is destroyed, you can perform the 10-minute ritual again after completing a short rest to call forth a new one (this still costs 1 Soul Energy). If you simply dismissed it, you can resummon it with the ritual without an SE cost.
Form & Nature:


Your Shadow Familiar is a Small creature composed of animate, pliable darkness. It often assumes a subtle, unobtrusive animalistic shape made of shadow (like a cat, raven, rat, or spider) or may appear as a more amorphous patch of deeper, mobile gloom.
It is a magical entity, not a true beast.
Statistics & Traits:


Hit Points: Equal to (Your Character Level x 2) + your Soul attribute.
Defense Value (DV): 2 (its shadowy form is naturally elusive). It has 0 Armor.
Speed: 30 feet (6 squares).
Senses: Darkvision up to 60 feet.
Skills: The familiar is inherently stealthy; it gains +2 dice on all Stealth checks it makes.
Shadow Form: The familiar can move through other creatures' spaces as if they were difficult terrain. It can squeeze through tiny openings (at least 1 inch wide) without penalty. While in dim light or darkness, it is invisible; it becomes visible if it enters bright light or takes an action other than Hide or Move.
Vulnerabilities: The Shadow Familiar is vulnerable to Radiant damage (takes double damage from Radiant sources). If it ends its turn in an area of bright sunlight, it takes 1 automatic Soul damage.
Control & Actions:


Initiative: The familiar acts on your initiative count, taking its turn immediately after yours.
Commands: On your turn, you can use a Bonus Action to mentally command your familiar if it is within 60 feet (12 squares) of you. You dictate its movement and which of its available actions it will take on its turn. If you do not issue a command, the familiar takes the Dodge action (if applicable in your system, meaning attacks against it have -1 or -2 dice) and attempts to stay in a shadowy area near you.
Available Actions for the Familiar (it can take one of these when commanded):
Move: Move up to its speed.
Scout: The familiar uses its action to keenly observe its surroundings. (This facilitates the Sensory Link ability).
Distracting Shadows: The familiar harasses one creature within 5 feet of it. That creature suffers a -1 die penalty on its next attack roll or Perception/Observation check made before the end of its next turn.
Help: The familiar aids you or one of your allies in an action. The chosen friendly creature gains +1 die on their next attack roll against a creature within 5 feet of the familiar, OR on their next skill check if the familiar could plausibly assist (e.g., creating a diversion for a Stealth check).
Hide: The familiar makes a Stealth check to hide.
Interact: Perform a simple object interaction (e.g., nudge a small object, pull a thin cord). It cannot manipulate complex items or carry anything of significant weight.
Sensory Link:


While your familiar is within 100 feet of you, you can use an Action on your turn to close your own eyes and ears and perceive through your familiar's senses instead. This lasts until the start of your next turn or until you end it as a free action. While using this link, you are considered deaf and blind with regard to your own body's senses.
Attacks: The base Shadow Familiar cannot make attacks that deal direct damage. Its role is primarily utility, stealth, and minor debuffing. (Later perks like "Empowered Shadow Beast" can grant it offensive capabilities).

Advantage in Darkness (Shadowmancer Passive Class Feature)
Your deep connection to the shadows and the veiled energies between realms allows you to thrive where light fades, granting you a distinct edge in dim light and darkness.
Activation Condition: This passive ability is active whenever you, the Shadowmancer, are physically situated within an area of dim light or darkness. This includes mundane conditions (e.g., twilight, poorly lit rooms, moonless nights) as well as areas of magical darkness, unless a specific magical effect explicitly negates such benefits.


Mechanical Benefits: While this condition is met, you gain the following:


Shadowed Prowess (Stealth): You gain a +2 dice bonus (Moderate Advantage) on all Stealth skill checks you make. This reflects your enhanced ability to hide, move silently, and remain unseen when enveloped by shadows.
Attacking from the Gloom (Offense): You gain a +2 dice bonus (Moderate Advantage) on attack rolls (for weapon attacks or offensive spells) you make, provided at least one of the following conditions is true:
You are in dim light or darkness, and your target is in an area with a brighter level of illumination than you.
Your target is unable to effectively see you or into the area of dim light/darkness you occupy (e.g., they lack appropriate darkvision, or they are suffering from the Blinded condition). This bonus typically does not apply if your target can perceive you just as clearly as you can perceive them despite the ambient darkness (e.g., both parties have excellent darkvision and are in the same shadowy area).
Synergy with Own Magic: Unless stated otherwise, magical darkness or obscuring mist that you create (e.g., via "Smoke Veil" or "Dusk Cascade") does not impede your own senses, allowing you to fully benefit from this "Advantage in Darkness" when acting from within such effects against targets outside or those blinded within them.

Suggested Skills for Point Allocation:
Stealth: Core to their concept and abilities.
Deception: For manipulation and misdirection.
Thievery: For infiltration and sabotage.
Possession or Rituals: To support "Controller / Summoner" aspects, potentially for their Shadow Familiar.
Observation: To detect threats or opportunities while hidden.
Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Dagger in the Dark
Effect (Passive): When you make a successful attack roll against a creature that is unaware of your presence (e.g., you are hidden from it) or that cannot see you (e.g., it's Blinded, or you are in complete darkness and it lacks darksight), your attack deals an additional +1 damage. This bonus damage is of the same type as your attack.
Lvl 2: Mist Form
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Effect (Reactive): If you fail an Evasion skill check (whether to avoid an attack or a damaging area effect), you can choose to use this perk. You may reroll the failed Evasion check. You must use the result of the second roll. You decide to use this after the failure of the first roll is known.
Lvl 3: Echoform
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Duration: 1 minute, until it takes any damage (at which point it dissipates), or until you dismiss it (no action required).
Effect: You create a shadowy, illusory duplicate of yourself in an unoccupied space adjacent to you.
The Echoform looks identical to you at the time of its creation. It is stationary and cannot take any actions.
While the Echoform is active and within 30 feet of you, if an enemy targets you with an attack, you can use your Reaction to cause that single attack to target the Echoform instead. The Echoform is then immediately dispelled by the attack.
An enemy can use their Action to make an Insight or Observation check against a Difficulty Rating (DR) of 2; success means they identify it as an illusion.
Lvl 4: Blind Hex
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature you can see.
Effect: You whisper a hex of clinging shadows. The target must succeed on a DR 2 Will save.
On a failed save: The target is Blinded until the end of its next turn. While Blinded, it suffers a -3 dice penalty on attack rolls and Perception/Observation checks relying on sight, and attacks against it gain a +2 dice bonus.
On a successful save: The target only suffers a -1 die penalty on its next attack roll or Perception/Observation check made before the end of its next turn.
Lvl 5: Dimstep
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Frequency: Usable a number of times equal to your Soul attribute per short rest (minimum 1 use).
Effect: If you are currently in an area of dim light or darkness, you can instantly teleport to another unoccupied space you can see that is also in dim light or darkness, up to a range of 30 feet (6 squares). This movement does not provoke attacks of opportunity.
Lvl 6: Dusk Cascade
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Range: Target a point you can see within 60 feet (12 squares).
Area of Effect: A 10-foot (2 squares) radius sphere of swirling magical darkness and disorienting shadows erupts from the target point.
Duration: Until the start of your next turn.
Effect: The area is filled with magical darkness (even blocking darkvision for creatures not attuned to such magic, like yourself). Any creature (other than you) that starts its turn within the area or enters it for the first time must make a DR 2 Will save.
On a failed save: They are Blinded while within the area and for 1 round after the Dusk Cascade ends or they leave it.
On a successful save: They are only Blinded while they remain within the area of the Dusk Cascade.
Lvl 7: Phantom Veil
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Frequency: Once per scene.
Effect: You can attempt a Stealth check to become hidden even if you are currently being directly observed by one or more creatures. To use this, there must be at least some dim light, shadow, or minor visual obstruction (like mist or dust) within 5 feet of you that you can momentarily blend into. This Stealth check is made with a -1 die penalty due to the difficulty of vanishing under observation. If successful, you become hidden.
Lvl 8: Umbral Snare
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature you can see that is standing in an area of dim light or darkness, or is adjacent to a significant source of shadow.
Duration: A number of rounds equal to your Soul attribute, or until the target breaks free or the shadow source is eliminated.
Effect: Tendrils of living shadow erupt to grasp the target. The target must succeed on a DR 2 Evasion save (to dodge) or a DR 2 Might save (to break through as they form) – target chooses.
On a failed save: The target is Rooted (cannot move from their current space, including any forced movement). They can still take other actions. A Rooted creature can use its Action on its turn to attempt a fury check against the original DR to break free.
On a successful save: The target’s speed is halved for 1 round as shadows momentarily cling to them.
Lvl 9: Veil of Nosgoth
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 3 Soul Energy.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Duration: 1 minute.
Effect: You partially pull your form through the Veil into the shadowy space between realms, becoming an incorporeal phantom. For the duration:
You gain resistance to non-magical bludgeoning, piercing, and slashing damage (reduce all such damage you take by 2 points).
You can move through other creatures and obstacles as if they were difficult terrain. If you end your turn inside an obstacle, you are shunted to the nearest unoccupied space and suffer 1 point of Soul stress.
You gain a +2 dice bonus on Stealth checks.
While your attacks and spells originate from this semi-incorporeal state, they affect targets normally unless an ability says otherwise.
Lvl 10: Night Unbound
Effect (Passive / Enhancement): Your mastery allows you to direct your spells through the medium of shadow and the Veil itself. When you cast a Shadowmancer spell (or any spell that deals Shadow or Soul damage, or creates illusions/darkness) that normally requires you to see the target or point of origin, you can ignore this requirement if:
You are aware of the target's/point's approximate location (e.g., "the guard in the next room," "the center of that obscuring fog").
The target/point is within the spell's maximum range.
There is a path, however indirect, for shadows or spectral energy to reach (e.g., not through solid magically-warded stone, but perhaps under a door, through a keyhole, or via the Spectral Realm). If you are casting an attack spell this way against a target you cannot directly see, that attack roll is made with a -2 dice penalty. Area of effect spells are centered as accurately as the GM deems possible based on your awareness.
Level 11: Umbral Familiar
Effect: Your "Shadow Familiar" evolves. It gains Hit Points equal to (your Level x 2) + your Soul attribute. Additionally, once per scene, your familiar can execute a special maneuver: choose to either impose a -1 die penalty on one enemy's next attack roll within 5 feet of the familiar OR grant an ally within 5 feet of the familiar +1 die to their next Stealth check as it creates a localized disturbance of shadow.
Level 12: Master of Misdirection
Effect: The Difficulty Rating (DR) for enemies to disbelieve your illusion spells or resist your "Blind Hex" (Lvl 4) and "Dusk Cascade" (Lvl 6) effects is increased by 1 (e.g., if a save was DR 2, it is now DR 3). Furthermore, your "Echoform" (Lvl 3) shadow double now persists for an additional round.
Level 13: Phantom Steps
Effect: Your "Phantom Veil" (Lvl 7: hide while observed) can now be used twice per scene. Additionally, when you successfully use Stealth to become hidden, you can move up to your full speed during that same turn without automatically breaking stealth, provided you remain in dim light or darkness and do not take any other actions besides movement.
Level 14: Grasping Shadows
Effect: Your "Umbral Snare" (Lvl 8) becomes more potent. Targets ensnared by it now require an additional success (e.g., if it was DR 2 to break free, it's now effectively DR 3 or requires an extra success on an opposed check). Additionally, you can now target up to two creatures with a single use of Umbral Snare if they are within 10 feet of each other.
Level 15: One with the Night
Effect: Your connection to shadows deepens. Your "Dimstep" (Lvl 5) range is increased by 10 feet (2 squares). Furthermore, while you are in dim light or darkness, you gain +1 to your Defense Value (DV) as shadows cling to you, obscuring your form.
Level 16: Nightmare Weaver
Effect: Once per scene, as an Action, you can target one creature you can see within 30 feet (6 squares) and flood its mind with phantasmal terrors. The target must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failure, it is Frightened for 1 minute and, on its next turn, it must use its action to attack the nearest creature to it (ally or foe), believing it to be a monstrous threat. If no other creature is within its reach or range, it cowers. The target can repeat the Will save at the end of each of its turns, ending the effect on a success.
Level 17: Shadow Simulacrum
Effect: Your "Echoform" (Lvl 3) ability is significantly enhanced. You can now create two shadow doubles simultaneously. These doubles can move independently (though they share your actions if you command them to do something specific). Furthermore, once per scene, you can choose to swap places with one of your shadow doubles instantly as a Bonus Action (range 30 feet).
Level 18: From the Dark Between Worlds
Effect: You learn to call forth more potent entities from the shadowy veil. Once per long rest, instead of summoning your regular Shadow Familiar, you can spend 10 minutes in a ritual to summon a "Greater Shadow Beast." This creature is more powerful (GM provides stats, perhaps equivalent to a challenging solo monster for its level, with 2-3 distinct shadow-based abilities) and lasts for 1 hour or until destroyed. You can only control one such Greater Shadow Beast at a time.
Level 19: Cloak of Mist Perfected
Effect: Your "Cloak of Mist" core ability (Auto-succeed on Stealth roll) can now be used twice per short rest (this assumes its base use was once per short rest or scene; adjust if its original frequency was different). Additionally, any creature that successfully uses an Observation or Insight check to see through one of your illusion spells or your "Phantom Veil" is so convinced by its initial reality that they suffer a -1 die penalty on their next attack roll or skill check as they momentarily doubt their own senses.
Level 20: Lord of Shadows
Effect: You achieve ultimate mastery over shadows and deception. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can become a true Lord/Lady of Shadows for 1 minute:
You are permanently invisible, even while attacking or casting spells, unless you choose to reveal yourself. Creatures relying on senses other than normal sight (like blindsight or scent) might still detect you, but with a significant dice penalty (e.g., -3 dice) to their checks.
You can use "Dimstep" as a Bonus Action at will, with no limit on uses per scene, for the duration.
You can cast any of your Shadowmancer illusion or shadow-control spells that normally require an Action as a Bonus Action instead.
Your "Shadow Familiar," if active, becomes an "Umbral Alpha" for the duration, gaining +2 successes on all its actions and its attacks deal an additional +2 Soul damage.



Sangromancer
Starting Skill Points: 6
Starting HP: 9
HP Per Level: +5
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every  level 
Role: Blood Mage / Battlefield Control
Core Stats: Blood, Soul
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.
Class Abilities:

Hemorrhage (Sangromancer Core Class Ability)
With a subtle gesture or whispered incantation, you exert your will over the vital fluids within a target, causing internal ruptures, thinning their blood, or opening unseen wounds that seep life essence.
Action Cost: 1 Action


Cost: 1 Blood Point (BP)


Range: 30 feet (6 squares)


Target: One living creature you can see that possesses blood or similar vital fluids. (Constructs, most elementals, and certain types of undead may be immune at the GM's discretion).


Duration of Bleed: A number of rounds equal to your Soul attribute (minimum 1 round).


Effect: The targeted creature must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Might save as their body attempts to resist the unnatural bleeding.


On a failed save: The target gains the Bleeding (Hemorrhage) condition for the duration. A creature suffering from Bleeding (Hemorrhage):
Suffers 2 physical damage at the start of each of its turns. This damage represents blood loss and internal trauma and typically bypasses the target's Armor as it is not a direct external blow.
On a successful save: The target suffers only 1 immediate physical damage from the initial shock to their system but does not gain the Bleeding (Hemorrhage) condition.
Stopping the Bleed:


The Bleeding (Hemorrhage) condition ends automatically if its duration expires.
An affected creature or an ally adjacent to them can use an Action to attempt to staunch the bleeding. This requires a successful DR 2 skill check (typically using Medicine, though a character with magical healing might use a relevant magical skill like Rituals with GM approval to suppress the magical nature of the bleed). Success ends the Bleeding (Hemorrhage) condition.
Some potent magical healing effects might also explicitly end bleeding conditions.
Multiple Applications:


If you successfully apply Hemorrhage to a target already suffering from your Bleeding (Hemorrhage) condition, the new duration replaces the old one (if the new application's duration would be longer). The damage per round from multiple applications of your Hemorrhage does not stack.
Blood Puppet (Sangromancer Core Class Ability)
You extend your will through the vitae of a wounded enemy, twisting their own lifeblood to make them a temporary, unwilling marionette.
Action Cost: 1 Action


Cost: 2 Blood Points (BP)


Range: 30 feet (6 squares)


Target: One living creature you can see that is currently suffering from a Bleeding status effect (e.g., from your Hemorrhage ability or another source). Constructs, most elementals, and certain types of undead (GM's discretion) are typically immune.


Duration: Until the end of the target's next turn (if the save is failed).


Effect: You attempt to seize control of the target's physical actions by mystically manipulating their flowing blood. The target must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Will save to resist your insidious influence.


On a failed save: You gain control over the target until the end of its next turn. On that turn, you telepathically dictate the target's Move, Action, and Bonus Action (if it has one).
The commanded actions cannot be blatantly and pointlessly suicidal (like forcing it to jump off a cliff if it's not already near one or if doing so serves no immediate tactical purpose for you). However, the puppet can be made to attack its allies, move into dangerous positions, provoke attacks of opportunity, or use its abilities ineffectively or harmfully towards its own side.
The target is aware that its actions are not its own. Once the target has completed its turn under your control, this effect ends.
On a successful save: The target manages to fight off your direct control but is left psychically shaken and disoriented from the intrusive attempt. It suffers a -1 die penalty on all attack rolls it makes during its next turn.
Limitations:


You can only control one creature with Blood Puppet at a time. Using Blood Puppet successfully on a new target while a previous one is still under your control immediately ends the effect on the first target.
This specific ability does not grant you access to the target's thoughts, memories, or knowledge beyond what is necessary to direct its physical actions.
Resurgent Vitae (Sangromancer Passive Class Ability)
Your profound connection to the ebb and flow of life essence, and your mastery over blood itself, allows your body to knit wounds and recover with unnatural celerity when you are grievously injured.
Activation Condition: This passive ability automatically becomes active whenever your current Hit Points are at or below 25% of your maximum Hit Points. It ceases to be active if your current HP rises above this threshold.


Mechanical Effects: While "Resurgent Vitae" is active and you are conscious (i.e., not at 0 HP and incapacitated/dying):


Instinctive Mending (Regeneration): At the very start of each of your turns, you automatically regain 1 Hit Point. This represents your body instinctively using ambient life energy or your own deep knowledge of sangromancy to seal minor wounds and staunch bleeding without conscious effort.
Enhanced Receptivity to Healing: Any Hit Points you regain from spells, abilities (including your own "Vital Leech" perk or "Blood Pact" transfers from an ally), alchemical potions, or other direct healing sources are increased by +2 HP. For example, if an ally's healing spell would normally restore 5 HP, you would regain 7 HP instead. This bonus does not apply to the 1 HP gained from the "Instinctive Mending" part of this feature itself.
Limitations:


The "Instinctive Mending" does not function if you are at 0 HP and dying or stabilized; you must be conscious with at least 1 HP for it to trigger at the start of your turn.
These benefits do not help against effects that prevent healing or cause instant death without reducing HP to the threshold first.

Suggested Skills for Point Allocation:
Rituals: Central to blood sorcery.
Forbidden Knowledge: For understanding dark alchemical arts and Hylden rituals.
Concentration: For maintaining complex blood spells.
Presence or Persuasion: For controlling or influencing through their powers.
Craft (Alchemy if detailed): For alchemical aspects.

Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Blood Memory
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Activation: As an Action, you focus your will, tasting the lingering echoes of vitae used in previous incantations.
Effect: Choose one spell you have cast since your last long rest that had a limited number of uses (e.g., a "per long rest" spell, or if your system uses spell slots, one that expended a slot). You regain one expended use of that specific spell. You must still pay any resource costs (like Blood Points or Soul Energy) associated with casting the spell when you use this recalled casting. This does not allow you to cast spells you do not know or prepare.
Lvl 2: Vital Leech
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 1 Blood Point.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One living creature you can see.
Effect: You extend a shimmering tendril of blood-infused energy or directly draw upon the target's life force. Make a spell attack roll (using Soul + your primary spellcasting skill like Rituals, versus the target's Defense Value).
On a hit: The target suffers 3 Soul damage (this damage bypasses physical Armor). You then immediately regain Hit Points equal to the actual Soul damage dealt to the target (so, if they had a specific resistance that reduced the damage, you heal for the reduced amount).
Lvl 3: Crimson Bind
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Blood Points.
Range: Target a point on the ground you can see within 60 feet (12 squares).
Area of Effect: A 10-foot (2 squares) radius circle centered on the target point.
Duration: A number of rounds equal to your Soul attribute, or until a creature breaks free.
Effect: Thick, grasping tendrils of animated blood erupt from the ground. Each creature within the area when the spell is cast, or that enters the area for the first time on a turn, must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Might save (to power through) or a DR 2 Evasion save (to dodge the grasping tendrils) – target chooses.
On a failed save: The creature is Rooted (cannot move from its current space; this includes any forced movement). It can still take other actions. A Rooted creature can use its Action on its turn to attempt another fury check against the original DR to break free.
On a successful save: The creature's speed is halved while it remains within the affected area.
Lvl 4: Fleshcraft
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 1 Blood Point and 1 Soul Energy.
Target: One mostly intact corpse of a Medium or Small creature that has been dead for no more than one hour, which you must be able to touch.
Duration: The crafted item lasts for 1 hour, or until it is broken or you use this ability again.
Effect: You mystically manipulate the bone, sinew, and solidified blood of the corpse, gruesomely reshaping it into a single melee weapon of your choice (e.g., a bone sword, a sinew-lashed axe, a sharpened rib dagger). This weapon has game statistics comparable to a standard mundane weapon of its type (e.g., a bone sword might have the same damage and traits as an Iron Longsword from your equipment list). The weapon is visibly and unnervingly organic. You can only maintain one such fleshcrafted weapon at a time; creating a new one causes any previously crafted weapon to rapidly decay into unusable gore.
Lvl 5: Vein Strike
Effect (Passive): Your attacks hone in on already damaged vasculature. When you make a successful attack roll (with a weapon or a damaging spell) against a creature that is currently suffering from a Bleeding status effect, your attack deals an additional +2 damage. This bonus damage is of the same type as the original attack.
Lvl 6: Blood Pact
Action Cost: 1 Action to initiate the pact.
Cost to Initiate: 1 Blood Point (from the Sangromancer).
Target: One willing creature you touch.
Duration: 10 minutes, or until either participant ends it (no action required), or if the participants move more than 60 feet (12 squares) apart.
Effect: You create a mystical link of shared vitality. While the pact is active, either you or the bonded ally can use a Bonus Action on your respective turns to transfer Hit Points to the other. The giver chooses to lose a number of their current HP (up to a maximum equal to their own Will attribute). The receiver then gains that many Hit Points (this cannot raise them above their maximum HP). This transfer is direct and vital, bypassing normal limitations on magical healing unless specifically countered by powerful anti-life magic (GM discretion).
Lvl 7: Wound Echo
Effect (Passive): The wounds you inflict with your blood magic are particularly persistent. The duration of any Bleeding status effect that you personally inflict on a target through a Sangromancer class ability or spell is increased by 1 additional round.
Lvl 8: Bloodburst
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Blood Points.
Range: Target one creature you can see within 60 feet (12 squares) that is currently suffering from a Bleeding status effect.
Area of Effect: The target creature and all other creatures (friend or foe, unless modified by later perks) within a 5-foot (1 square) radius of that primary target.
Effect: You cause the spilled and circulating blood of the primary target (and any other bleeding creatures in the radius) to violently and explosively expand. The primary target and all other creatures in the radius suffer 4 Soul damage (this damage bypasses physical Armor). Each affected creature can make a DR 2 Evasion save. On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.
Level 9: Sanguine Transfiguration
Lore: The Sangromancer temporarily transcends the normal limits of their physical form by achieving a profound unison with the essence of blood itself, becoming a conduit of flowing, empowered vitae.
Action Cost to Activate: 1 Bonus Action
Frequency: Once per long rest
Duration: 1 minute
Effect: You suffuse your being with pure, animate blood magic, undergoing a temporary transfiguration. For the duration, you gain the following benefits:
Empowered Sangromancy: The Blood Point (BP) cost of all your Blood spells is reduced by 1 (to a minimum of 1 BP).
Flowing Form: Your physical form becomes semi-fluid and blood-like. You gain a +10 feet bonus to your movement speed, and your movement does not provoke attacks of opportunity.
Leeching Essence: Once per turn, when you deal damage to at least one creature with a Blood spell, you immediately regain Hit Points equal to your Soul attribute.


Lvl 10: Hemodominate
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 3 Blood Points and 3 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature you can see that is currently suffering from a Bleeding status effect, is not mindless, and can understand a language (or is susceptible to telepathic commands).
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: You weave your will into the target's own vitae, attempting to seize control of their actions. The target must make a DR 3 Will save.
On a failed save: You gain full mental control over the target. It acts on its own initiative but obeys your telepathic commands on its turn to the best of its ability for the duration. Commanded actions cannot be obviously suicidal (like jumping off a cliff for no reason), but can include attacking its allies or putting itself in extreme danger. If the dominated target takes damage from any source other than itself, it can make a new Will save against the original DR at the end of that turn, ending the effect on a success. The effect also ends if your concentration is broken.
On a successful save: The target is immune to your Hemodominate ability for the next 24 hours.
Level 11: Profound Hemorrhage
Effect: Your "Hemorrhage" core ability becomes more debilitating. Targets actively bleeding from your Hemorrhage now also suffer a -1 die penalty on all skill checks relying on Might or Evasion due to weakness and blood loss. Additionally, the base damage per round of your Hemorrhage increases by 1.
Level 12: True Fleshcrafting
Effect: Your "Fleshcraft" (Lvl 4 perk) ability is enhanced. You can now expend an Action and target one fresh Medium-sized corpse (or two Small corpses) within 30 feet. The corpse(s) animate as a "Bloodied Servitor" under your command for 10 minutes. A Bloodied Servitor has HP equal to (your Level x 2), moves at 20 feet, and makes one melee attack dealing 3 physical damage (gaining +1 success to hit if its target is bleeding). You can control a number of Servitors equal to your Soul attribute. If you attempt to animate more, the oldest one crumbles.
Level 13: Voracious Siphon
Effect: Your "Vital Leech" (Lvl 2 perk) becomes significantly more potent. The amount of HP you heal from Vital Leech is increased by an amount equal to your Soul attribute. Furthermore, the target, if they fail a DR 2 Will save against the leeching effect, also loses 1 Blood Point (if they have them) or suffers a -1 die penalty on their next attack roll as their spiritual energy is sapped.
Level 14: All-Seeing Blood Scent
Effect: Your passive ability to "feel the pulse of every living thing" intensifies. You are constantly aware of the presence and general direction of any living creature with blood (or similar vital fluids) within 60 feet (12 squares), even through solid barriers, though you cannot pinpoint their exact location or numbers without focus. As an Action, you can focus this sense for one minute to learn the precise number of such creatures, their rough distance, and their current physical state (e.g., unharmed, lightly wounded, near death).
Level 15: Master Puppeteer
Effect: Your control over "Blood Puppet" (core ability) and "Hemodominate" (Lvl 10 perk) is refined. Targets under these effects now act with unnatural coordination if you desire, gaining +1 die on attack rolls you force them to make. Alternatively, once per controlled puppet per turn, you can force them into a reckless action, causing them to suffer an attack from another enemy as if that enemy had gained +1 success on their attack roll. The duration of your basic "Blood Puppet" ability is extended by an additional round.
Level 16: Plague of Clots
Effect: Once per short rest, as an Action, you can touch one creature or imbue a weapon you are holding with this power for a single attack. If the attack hits (or you touch the creature), the target must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failure, its blood congeals and rebels. For the next minute, the target's Speed is halved, and they cannot benefit from any magical healing; any attempt to magically heal them instead causes 2 Soul damage. They can attempt the Might save again at the end of each of their turns to end the effect.
Level 17: Heartblood Invigoration
Effect: Your mastery over your own vitae and that of others allows for rapid recovery. When you cast a spell or use an ability that costs Blood Points (BP), reduce its BP cost by 1 (to a minimum of 0 BP for abilities that originally cost 1 BP). Additionally, your "Blood Memory" (Lvl 1 perk) now allows you to recall and cast the chosen spell without spending any of its original resource costs (BP, HP, or Soul Energy).
Level 18: Sanguine Eruption
Effect: Your "Bloodburst" (Lvl 8 perk) AoE is now more devastating. The radius of the explosion increases by 5 feet (to a 10-foot radius around the bloodied foe, for example, if it was 5ft). All targets caught in the blast (including the original target if they survive) now also must succeed on a DR 2 Might save or be knocked prone. You can now shield a number of allies equal to your Soul attribute within the blast radius from all effects of your Bloodburst.
Level 19: Crimson Transfusion
Effect: Your "Blood Pact" (Lvl 6 perk) can now be used more effectively and with greater range. The range at which you can form or maintain the Blood Pact increases to 30 feet (6 squares). When you transfer HP to an ally, you can choose to transfer an additional amount up to your Soul attribute at no extra cost to yourself (e.g., if you spend 5 HP, they can receive 5 + Soul HP). When an ally transfers HP to you, you receive an additional amount equal to your Soul attribute. This extra transfusion can only occur once per pact target per scene.
Level 20: Avatar of Living Vitae
Effect: You reach the pinnacle of sangromancy, able to command blood on an epic scale. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can embody the Avatar of Living Vitae for 1 minute:
You are constantly aware of the precise location and current HP of all creatures with blood within 120 feet.
Any of your Sangromancer abilities or spells that target or are enhanced by a creature bleeding (e.g., Vein Strike, Hemodominate, Blood Puppet) automatically treat targets as if they are bleeding, and if they are bleeding, these abilities gain the effect of +1 automatic success on any required check or save you make (or impose +1 DR if the target saves).
Once during this state, as an Action, you can attempt to exsanguinate all hostile creatures within a 30-foot radius centered on you. Each target must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failure, they suffer 8 direct Health Point loss (bypassing armor) and are Stunned for 1 round. On a success, they suffer 4 HP loss and are not Stunned. For each creature from which you drain HP this way, you regain 1 Blood Point.
Your "Vital Leech" ability, if used during this time, also allows you to heal one ally within 30 feet for the same amount you heal yourself



Glyph Seeker
Starting Skill Points: 6
Starting HP: 8
HP Per Level: +5
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every level
Role: Support / Utility Caster
Core Stats: Soul, Will
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.
Class Abilities:
Glyph of Flame (Glyph Seeker Core Class Ability)
You are skilled in the precise inscription of arcane sigils that can unleash contained magical effects. The Glyph of Flame is a common, yet effective, trap that detonates with fiery energy.
Action Cost to Inscribe: 1 Action
Cost: 1 Soul Energy (SE)
Placement: You must touch a willing creature or an unoccupied physical surface (such as a section of floor, a wall, a door, a chest, etc.) where you inscribe the faintly glowing glyph. The glyph is roughly 6 inches in diameter.
Number Active & Duration:
You can maintain a number of your active Glyphs of Flame simultaneously equal to your Will attribute (minimum 1). If you attempt to create a new Glyph of Flame that would exceed this limit, your oldest active Glyph of Flame immediately and harmlessly fades.
An inscribed glyph remains magically charged and ready to trigger for up to 10 minutes, or until it is triggered, or until it is dispelled by magical means.
Detection: The dormant glyph is subtle. A creature actively searching the area must succeed on an Observation check against a Difficulty Rating (DR) equal to 1 + your Glyphcasting skill rank to notice it before it triggers. (Your own "Auto-detect hidden glyphs" passive helps you find other glyphs, not hide your own better).
Trigger Condition:
You can set one of two trigger conditions when you inscribe the glyph:
Proximity: The glyph triggers when any creature (other than you or specific allies you mentally designated at the time of casting) moves into the glyph's exact space or into any space within 5 feet (1 square) of the glyph.
Touch: The glyph triggers when any creature (other than you or designated allies) physically touches the inscribed object or surface.
Effect upon Trigger:
When the glyph is triggered, it immediately erupts in a burst of magical fire.
All creatures within a 5-foot (1 square) radius sphere, centered on the glyph's location, are caught in the fiery blast. (This includes the triggering creature if they are within this radius).
Creatures within the area of effect suffer 3 Fire damage.
Each affected creature can make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Evasion save. On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.
The glyph is expended once it triggers. Flammable objects in the area that are not worn or carried may ignite.


Seal of Binding (Glyph Seeker Core Class Ability)
You inscribe a potent sigil of arcane law, either in the air before you or directly upon a manifested entity, attempting to anchor it against its will and disrupt its connection to the energies that sustain its presence or mobility.
Action Cost: 1 Action


Cost: 1 Soul Energy (SE)


Range: 30 feet (6 squares)


Target: One creature you can see within range that you identify as a "Summoned Entity."


Definition of "Summoned Entity": This ability primarily affects creatures explicitly brought to the current location or plane via a summoning spell, ritual, or magical animation (e.g., elementals conjured by a sorcerer, spirits bound into service, freshly animated magical constructs not yet fully independent, entities temporarily pulled from other dimensions). It is less effective or ineffective against naturally occurring creatures of Nosgoth, self-willed undead who are not currently bound (like free-willed vampires or risen corpses animated by ambient necromancy), or extra-planar beings who have established a permanent or independent presence in the world. The GM has final discretion on what qualifies based on the creature's nature and origin.
Duration: A number of rounds equal to your Will attribute (minimum 1 round), or until the target succeeds on a save to break free.


Effect: You project the Seal of Binding towards your target. The targeted Summoned Entity must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Will save to resist the glyph's restrictive power.


On a failed save: The creature is Immobilized (Bound) by shimmering arcane lines of force for the duration. While Bound:
It cannot willingly move from its current space by any means (including walking, flying, burrowing, or short-range teleportation like blinks). If it is currently flying, it remains hovering in place.
It can still take actions that do not require it to change its location (such as making attacks, casting spells with somatic components if its limbs are not fully constricted, or using mental abilities).
At the end of each of its turns, the Bound creature can use its Action to attempt another Will save against the original DR. On a success, it breaks free from the Seal of Binding, and the effect ends.
On a successful initial save: The creature shrugs off the full effect but is still momentarily hampered. Its movement speed is halved for its next turn.
Limitations:


You can typically only have one creature affected by your Seal of Binding at a time. Successfully applying the Seal to a new target causes the Seal on any previous target to immediately dissipate.
The visual manifestation of the Seal (e.g., glowing chains, a constricting symbol on the creature) is apparent.

Glyph-Lore Intuition (Glyph Seeker Passive Class Ability)
Your deep and constant immersion in the study of arcane symbols, wards, and magical geometry has permanently attuned your senses to their presence, allowing you to notice what others would invariably miss.
Automatic Detection of Glyphic Presence:


You automatically become aware of the presence and specific location of any active, dormant, or even partially faded magical glyph, sigil, runic inscription, or similar symbolic magical construct (hereafter referred to as "glyphs") within 15 feet (3 squares) of you.
This detection functions even if the glyph is hidden by mundane or magical means (unless shielded by exceptionally potent anti-detection magic, GM's discretion).
You do not need to be actively searching to detect these glyphs; the GM will inform you when you come within range of such an inscription. This detection typically requires line of effect (e.g., you might sense a glyph on the other side of a normal wooden door you are adjacent to, but not through several feet of solid stone or lead).
Rudimentary Identification:


Upon automatically detecting a glyph via this feature, you also instantly gain a basic, intuitive understanding of its general purpose or school of magic (no roll required). The GM will provide a one or two-word descriptor, such as: "Warding (Defensive)," "Trap (Elemental - Fire)," "Illusion (Concealment)," "Summoning (Binding)," "Teleportation (Spatial)," "Curse (Debuff)," "Communication (Scrying)," or "Empowerment (Buff)."
You also get a general sense of its power level (e.g., "faint/minor," "moderate," "potent/strong").
Detailed Analysis Requires Skill:


While this passive ability reveals the presence, location, and general nature of glyphs, understanding their specific trigger conditions, precise effects, the exact wording of runes, Difficulty Rating (DR) to resist (if any), safe methods of disarming, or the identity of their creator typically requires you to spend an Action to actively examine the glyph and make an appropriate skill check (usually Soul + Glyphcasting or Will + Observation). Your other class perks (like "Sigil Scrivener's Acuity") may grant bonuses to these active examination checks.
Limitations:


This ability is specifically attuned to magically inscribed symbols, runes, and glyphs. It does not automatically detect purely mundane traps (unless those traps incorporate magical glyphs as part of their trigger or effect), natural hazards, or illusions that are not glyph-based in their construction.
Glyphs created by beings of immense power (e.g., the Elder God, an Ascended Vampire Lord, or ancient entities predating the Pillars) or those protected by unique, plot-level wards might only register as an overwhelming or "unreadable" magical presence at the GM's discretion until further investigated.
Suggested Skills for Point Allocation:
Glyphcasting: Their primary skill for magic.
Rituals: For broader utility and support casting.
Forbidden Knowledge: Especially if an exiled Hylden researcher.
Craft: For creating glyphs, relics, or functional wards.
Observation or Concentration: To detect and precisely manipulate glyphs.

Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Glyph Channel
Effect (Passive): Your understanding of arcane geometry allows you to project your glyphs further. The maximum range at which you can place any of your glyph spells is increased by 5 feet (1 square). If a glyph spell you cast creates an area of effect (like a burst), its radius is also increased by 5 feet (1 square).
Lvl 2: Arcane Focus
Effect (Passive): You are adept at reclaiming residual energies from your structured magic. Whenever you successfully cast a glyph spell that costs Soul Energy, you immediately regain 1 Soul Energy (SE) after the glyph is placed. This cannot cause you to exceed your maximum Soul Energy pool and can only trigger once per glyph cast.
Lvl 3: Glyph Recall
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Range: Affects one of your active, non-triggered glyphs within 60 feet (12 squares) that you can see or are aware of.
Effect: You can telekinetically lift and reposition one of your existing, undetonated glyphs. You can move it to any valid new surface or location within 30 feet (6 squares) of its original position. The new location must be within your line of sight and also within what would have been the glyph's original maximum placement range from you. The glyph retains all its properties (charges, trigger conditions, etc.).
Lvl 4: Shock Sigil
Effect (Passive): You learn to weave secondary energy patterns into your glyphs. Whenever one of your glyph spells is triggered and successfully affects one or more targets (either by dealing damage or imposing a condition), each affected target also suffers an additional +1 electrical damage as a minor jolt of arcane energy is discharged.
Lvl 5: Chrono-Ward Ritual
Effect (Enhancement to Glyph Casting): When you cast any glyph spell, you can choose to imbue it with a Chrono-Ward Ritual. You can pre-set a delay for its activation, ranging from 1 round up to 1 minute, after its normal trigger conditions have been met. You define this delay when you first cast and place the glyph. (For example, a glyph triggered by proximity might not detonate until 2 rounds after a creature enters its trigger zone).
Lvl 6: Chrono Sigil
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature or unattended object you can see.
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Effect: You inscribe a potent, shimmering Chrono Sigil upon the target.
Target Creature: The creature must succeed on a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Will save. On a failure, its personal timeline stutters violently; it loses its next main Action (it can still use its Move and a Bonus Action, if available, but cannot perform its primary Action). On a success, it only loses its next Bonus Action.
Target Object: If targeted at a simple mechanical trap, device, or ongoing non-magical process, its next activation or phase of operation is delayed by 1 full round. This cannot affect complex magical items or powerful artifacts without GM approval.
Lvl 7: Glyph Sentinel
Effect (Passive): Your glyphs possess a rudimentary magical awareness. Any glyph you create that has a trigger based on creature presence or proximity (e.g., "when a creature comes within 5 feet") can now also be triggered by creatures that are hidden, stealthed, or under the effects of mundane or magical invisibility, as if those creatures were normally visible. The creature must still meet the glyph's other trigger conditions.
Lvl 8: Seal of Fire
Action Cost: 1 Action (to place the glyph).
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Placement Range: Can be inscribed on a surface you can see within 30 feet (6 squares).
Area of Effect: When triggered (e.g., by proximity, a specific condition you set, or your remote command via Glyph Recall), it explodes in a 10-foot (2 squares) radius burst.
Effect: All creatures caught in the fiery blast suffer 5 fire damage. Affected creatures can make a DR 2 Evasion save.  On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.The flames then dissipate.
Lvl 9: Nexus Glyph
Activation: An option chosen when you cast a glyph spell you know.
Cost: The chosen glyph spell's normal Soul Energy cost +1 additional Soul Energy.
Effect: You can intricately weave two distinct magical effects into a single glyph.
Elemental Combo: If casting a damaging elemental glyph (e.g., Glyph of Flame, Seal of Fire), you can infuse it with a second elemental type you can also manipulate (e.g., fire, frost, shock). When triggered, it deals its primary damage as normal, plus an additional +2 damage of the chosen secondary elemental type.
Effect Combo: Alternatively, you can combine two different non-damaging glyph effects that you know (e.g., a glyph that attempts to Root and also impose a -1 die penalty on saves) into one Nexus Glyph. Targets make saves against each effect, but if they fail the save against the first effect, they suffer a -1 die penalty on their save against the second effect from the same glyph.
Lvl 10: Archglyph
Casting Time: 10 minutes of uninterrupted ritualistic inscription.
Cost: 5 Soul Energy (one-time cost for its creation).
Placement: Inscribed on a fixed surface or a specially prepared, immobile object.
Frequency: You can only have one Archglyph active at a time. Creating a new Archglyph causes the previous one to fade harmlessly.
Effect: You create a master glyph that serves as a powerful, permanent (until dispelled or destroyed) guardian or ward. Choose one form for your Archglyph when created:
Sentinel Construct: A hovering, Medium-sized guardian of pure arcane geometry appears, bound to protect the Archglyph's location (e.g., HP: Your Level x 2; Armor: 2; DV: 2; one ranged attack per turn dealing 3 Soul damage with a range of 30 feet; follows simple commands like "attack intruders" or "guard this passage"). It cannot move more than 60 feet from the Archglyph's inscription point.
Great Ward: A powerful, wide-area defensive ward. For example, an area of 20-foot radius around the Archglyph might require enemies to make a DR 2 Will save to enter, or it might periodically pulse, dealing 2 Soul damage to all hostile creatures within it once every minute. The specific stats and abilities of the Archglyph are subject to GM approval but should be significantly more potent and lasting than standard glyphs.
Level 11: Resonant Frequencies
Effect: Your understanding of magical harmonics improves. When you cast a glyph spell that deals elemental damage (e.g., "Glyph of Flame," "Seal of Fire," or the "Shock Sigil" effect), that damage is increased by +2. Additionally, if a creature fails its saving throw against one of your damaging elemental glyphs, they also suffer a minor secondary effect for 1 round: Fire glyphs cause -1 die to their next Evasion check; Frost glyphs reduce speed by an additional 5 feet; Shock glyphs give them -1 die to concentration checks.
Level 12: Interwoven Wards
Effect: You can now intricately link up to three of your active glyph spells or magical wards within 30 feet of each other. If one of these linked glyphs/wards is triggered or successfully dispelled by an enemy, you can use your Reaction to immediately trigger one other linked glyph in the network, or to increase the DR to dispel another linked ward by +1 for the next minute.
Level 13: Master Sigil Carver
Effect: You gain +2 dice on all skill checks made to identify, understand the function of, or disable/dispel magical traps, wards, or glyphs created by others. Furthermore, once per short rest, if you successfully disable an enemy's magical trap or glyph, you can immediately convert its remaining energy, regaining 1 Soul Energy.
Level 14: Axiomatic Reinforcement
Effect: Your "Seal of Binding" (core ability that immobilizes summoned foes) can now affect any single creature (not just summoned ones) for 1 round on a failed DR 2 Will save. Additionally, your "Glyph Sentinel" (Lvl 7 perk) is improved: glyphs with this property now also grant you a brief mental ping when triggered, informing you of the triggering creature's general type (e.g., humanoid, beast, undead).
Level 15: Temporal Anchor Glyphs
Effect: Your mastery of temporal magic deepens. Your "Chrono-Ward Ritual" (Lvl 5 perk) can now delay a glyph's activation indefinitely until a trigger condition you define occurs (even days later, if the glyph itself persists). Your "Chrono Sigil" (Lvl 6 perk) becomes more potent: if it hinders a target's actions, the target now also cannot use Reactions until the end of their next turn. If Chrono Sigil creates an area of distorted time, creatures starting their turn within it also suffer a -1 die penalty to their attack rolls while inside.
Level 16: Imbued Glyphic Matrix
Effect: Once per short rest, as an Action, you can inscribe a complex but temporary glyphic matrix onto a weapon, shield, or piece of armor for yourself or a willing ally you touch. This matrix lasts for 10 minutes or until its power is discharged. Choose one effect:
Weapon Matrix: The weapon deals an additional +2 damage of an element type you can normally use in your glyphs (e.g., fire, frost, shock) on its next 3 successful hits.
Shield/Armor Matrix: The item grants +1 to the wearer's Defense Value (DV) against the next 3 attacks targeting them. The matrix visibly fades as its charges are expended.
Level 17: Nexus Harmonization
Effect: Your "Nexus Glyph" (Lvl 9 perk) is perfected. When you create a Nexus Glyph combining multiple elemental or energy types, targets affected by it suffer an additional -1 die penalty to their saving throw against its effects for each different element beyond the first (e.g., a Fire/Frost/Shock glyph imposes a -2 dice penalty to the save). Alternatively, if your Nexus Glyph applies control or debuff conditions, you can now apply up to three such conditions from spells you know (targets still save against each, but the DR for each subsequent save increases by 1 if they failed the previous one from the same glyph).
Level 18: Archglyph Synthesis
Effect: You can now have your "Archglyph" (Lvl 10 perk) guardian manifest in more versatile ways. You can choose to have two less powerful Archglyph guardians active simultaneously (each at about 60% of the normal one's power/HP, GM determines stats) instead of one full-strength one. Alternatively, your single Archglyph guardian gains one additional ability from a lower-level glyph spell you know (e.g., your guardian might also be able to cast a weak version of Glyph of Flame or Shock Sigil once per scene).
Level 19: Glyphs of Unseen Paths
Effect: Once per long rest, you can spend 10 minutes inscribing a pair of master travel glyphs on two fixed surfaces no more than one mile apart. For the next hour, any creature you designate can step into one glyph and instantly emerge from the other. Each glyph can only be used for a one-way trip by a number of creatures equal to your Soul attribute before the connection fades. You can only have one such pair of travel glyphs active at a time.
Level 20: Prime Weaver of Order
Effect: You have become a true master of arcane geometry and the fundamental laws of magic. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can enter a state of perfect arcane resonance for 1 minute:
The Soul Energy cost of all your glyph spells is reduced by 1 (to a minimum of 0).
Any glyph you cast during this time is automatically created with the benefits of your "Amplified Sigils" (Lvl 11) perk without needing to choose.
You can maintain concentration on one additional warding or ongoing glyph effect.
Once during this minute, you can use a Bonus Action to instantly end any one ongoing hostile magical effect (spell, curse, or enemy glyph) within 60 feet that has a DR equal to or less than your (Soul + Glyphcasting skill) total. No roll is needed for this targeted dispel.


Dreadblade
Starting Skill Points: 5
Starting HP: 9
HP Per Level: +5
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every level
Role: Assassin / Burst Damage
Core Stats: Shadow, Fury
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.
Class Abilities:
Blink Strike (Dreadblade Core Class Ability)
You master a sliver of shadow magic or hyper-natural speed, allowing you to vanish and reappear in an instant to deliver a precise strike.
Action Cost: 1 Action, 1 Soul Energy


Frequency: You can use Blink Strike twice per short rest.


Requirements: You must have a melee weapon equipped.


Effect: When you use Blink Strike, the following occurs:


Teleport: You instantly teleport from your current position to an unoccupied space you can see within 30 feet (6 squares). This movement is a blur of shadow or speed and does not provoke attacks of opportunity.
Attack: Immediately after teleporting, if there is at least one enemy creature adjacent (within 5 feet/1 square) to your new location, you can make a single melee weapon attack against one such creature. This attack is part of the same Action used for Blink Strike.
Disorienting Assault: Due to your sudden and disorienting reappearance, you gain a +1 die bonus on this specific melee attack roll.
Damage & Other Effects: If the attack hits, it deals your normal weapon damage plus any other applicable bonuses from your abilities or perks (e.g., if your "Venom Edge" is active on your weapon, or if conditions for "Shiv Surge" or your "Auto-crit from stealth" passive are met).

Venom Edge: Venom Edge (Dreadblade Core Class Ability)
You have mastered the art of concocting or channeling magical venoms, coating your blade or ammunition with toxins that wrack your foes with debilitating effects.
Action Cost to Apply: 1 Bonus Action.
Uses/Doses: You can prepare and apply a number of doses of this magical venom equal to your Shadow attribute (minimum 1 dose). You regain all expended uses after completing a short rest. Each use of this ability applies one dose of venom.
Application: When you use this ability, you coat one melee weapon you are currently wielding, OR up to three pieces of ammunition (such as arrows, bolts, or throwing daggers). The applied venom remains potent on the weapon or ammunition for 1 minute or until it is delivered by a successful attack.
Delivery & Effect: The next time you successfully hit a living creature with an attack using a venom-coated weapon or piece of ammunition, the venom is delivered in addition to the attack's normal damage and other effects.
Immunity Note: Creatures that lack vital biological processes (such as most constructs or elementals) or those specifically immune to poison effects are generally unaffected by this venom (GM's discretion for unique creatures).
The creature struck by the venom must immediately make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Might save to resist its effects.
On a failed save: The creature becomes Poisoned for 1 minute. A creature Poisoned in this way suffers a -1 die penalty on all of its attack rolls and skill checks for the duration. At the end of each of its turns, the Poisoned creature can make another Might save against the original DR (DR 2) to end this effect on itself prematurely.
On a successful save: The creature manages to fight off the main debilitating effects of the venom, suffering no ill effects beyond the normal damage of your attack.
Magical Nature:
This is a magical poison. As such, it may affect creatures resistant to common, non-magical poisons (GM's discretion). The potency of this base venom (represented by the DR 2 save) is a foundation that can be improved by higher-level Dreadblade perks (like "Virulent Toxins").

Auto-Crit From Stealth (Dreadblade Passive Class Feature)
You are a natural predator from the shadows, your strikes from concealment delivered with uncanny and devastating precision.
Trigger Conditions: This ability applies when you meet all the following conditions:


You are making a melee or ranged weapon attack.
You are successfully Hidden from your target at the moment you initiate the attack (i.e., the target is unaware of your precise location and hostile intent).
This attack is the one that breaks your Hidden status.
Effect: If your attack roll successfully hits the target (i.e., your number of successes meets or exceeds the target's Defense Value - DV), that hit is automatically considered a Critical Hit for the purpose of applying its effects, even if your dice roll did not meet the usual requirements for a critical hit (rolling 3+ successes or exceeding DV by 2+).


As a Critical Hit, you may choose one of the following benefits (or as further defined by your game's general Critical Hit rules):
Bonus Damage: Your attack deals additional damage. This could be a flat amount (e.g., +2 or +3 damage) or another defined critical damage bonus.
Inflict Status Effect: You inflict a tactical status effect on the target from the approved list for critical hits (e.g., Staggered, Bleeding, Prone).
Bypass Armor: Your attack ignores a specified amount of the target's Armor (e.g., bypasses 1 or 2 points of Armor).
The choice of critical effect is made after the hit is confirmed but before damage (if any) is applied.
Frequency:


This passive ability applies to the first successful attack you make after achieving a Hidden status.
If you successfully become Hidden again later in the same combat (e.g., via "Smoke Veil" or "Phantom Veil"), this passive can apply again to your next attack made from that new Hidden state.
Stacking with Other Abilities:


This "Auto-Crit From Stealth" effect can stack with other perks that provide bonuses for attacking from stealth or an unseen position (such as "Dagger in the Dark" or "Shiv Surge"). For example, your attack from stealth would be a Critical Hit and also deal the bonus damage from "Shiv Surge."
Interaction with "Shadow Ambush" (Lvl 7 perk): If your "Shadow Ambush" perk grants you an additional free attack when leaving stealth, that additional attack also benefits from this "Auto-Crit From Stealth" passive, provided its conditions are met (i.e., it's made from a Hidden state against an unaware target). This can lead to a potent opening barrage.

Suggested Skills for Point Allocation:
Stealth: Essential for their assassin role and passive.
Weapon Mastery: For delivering precise, lethal strikes.
Thievery: For infiltration and bypassing obstacles.
Evasion: To avoid retaliation after an attack.
Observation: To identify targets and weaknesses.
Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Cutthroat’s Reflex
Effect (Passive): Your predatory instincts and swiftness are preternaturally honed. You gain a permanent +2 dice bonus to your Initiative rolls at the start of combat.
Lvl 2: Blade Feint
Activation: When you take the Attack action to make a melee weapon attack, you can declare you are using Blade Feint before making your attack roll.
Frequency: Usable a number of times equal to your Shadow attribute per short rest (minimum 1 use).
Effect: If your declared Blade Feint melee attack successfully hits the target, in addition to its normal effects, the target is momentarily caught off-guard by your deceptive maneuver. The target suffers a -1 penalty to their Defense Value (DV) against the very next attack made against them (from any source) before the end of your next turn.
Lvl 3: Smoke Veil
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Effect: You instantly create a 10-foot (2 squares) radius cloud of thick, obscuring smoke (or roiling magical shadow-mist) centered on yourself. This area is considered heavily obscured: creatures effectively suffer from the Blinded condition when trying to see anything through it or within it (e.g., -3 dice penalty to Perception checks and attacks requiring sight into, out of, or within the cloud; attacks against creatures in the cloud gain +2 dice if the attacker is outside and unaffected). The veil lasts for 1 minute or until dispersed by a strong wind or magical effect. You, being its creator, can see normally within your Smoke Veil.
Lvl 4: Shiv Surge
Effect (Passive): When you make any successful attack (weapon or damaging spell) against a target that is unaware of your presence or from whom you are hidden at the moment of attack, that attack deals an additional +2 damage. This bonus damage is of the same type as the attack. (This stacks with "Dagger in the Dark" if both conditions apply to a melee weapon attack).
Lvl 5: Lethal Flow
Activation (Reactive): Immediately triggers when you personally reduce an enemy creature to 0 Hit Points with a melee attack.
Effect: You can use your Reaction to immediately move up to 15 feet (3 squares). This movement does not provoke attacks of opportunity from any enemy.
Lvl 6: Phantom Rush
Activation (Triggered Buff): When you personally reduce an enemy creature to 0 Hit Points.
Effect: A surge of shadowy adrenaline courses through you. For the remainder of your current turn:
Your base movement speed is increased by +10 feet (2 squares).
Your next single melee attack roll made this turn gains +1 die.
Lvl 7: Shadow Ambush
Activation (Triggered): Occurs when you make your first melee attack in an encounter from a hidden or stealthed position against an enemy who is unaware of your presence.
Effect: When you make this initial melee attack that breaks your stealth, you may immediately make one additional melee weapon attack against the same target as a free action. This second attack also benefits from any bonuses you would normally receive for attacking from an unseen or hidden position (such as Shiv Surge or your "Auto-crit from stealth" passive).
Lvl 8: Blur Step
Frequency: Once per scene.
Activation (Reactive): When an enemy's melee attack roll against you achieves enough successes to hit your Defense Value (DV).
Effect: You can use your Reaction to become a momentary blur of shadow and motion. The triggering melee attack automatically misses you.
Lvl 9: Death’s Whisper
Action Cost: 1 Action (as part of making a melee attack).
Target: A living creature you hit with a melee attack that has 15 Hit Points or fewer (or is below 25% of its maximum HP, if the GM prefers that for more powerful foes).
Effect: If your melee attack hits a qualifying low-health target, instead of dealing normal damage, you whisper a fatal incantation or strike a hidden vital point. The target must succeed on a Difficulty Rating (DR) 3 Might save (representing their physical will to live against a precise, lethal blow).
On a failed save: The target dies instantly.
On a successful save: The target takes your normal weapon damage + an additional 5 damage from the potent attempt.
Lvl 10: Assassinate
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Conditions: Can only be attempted if you are undetected by the target, and the target is unaware of any immediate hostile intent from you.
Target: One living creature susceptible to critical hits or precision-based death (GM's discretion for creatures without discernible vital anatomy like oozes or massive elementals).
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: You attempt a single, perfectly aimed strike intended to end the target's life. The target must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 4 Might or Evasion save (target's choice – to either physically resist the blow's lethality or make a desperate last-second evasion).
On a failed save: The target dies instantly. If the GM rules the target is too powerful or lacks vitals for an instant kill (e.g., a major antagonist or unique entity), they instead suffer massive damage equal to (your Level x 3) bypassing Armor.
On a successful save: The attack is a painful, glancing blow but not instantly fatal. The target takes your normal weapon damage + additional damage equal to your Character Level. You are no longer undetected after the attempt.


Level 11: Lingering Gloom
Effect: Your "Smoke Veil" (Lvl 3 perk) now fills an area twice as large (e.g., 20-foot radius instead of 10-foot, if it was a radius) and lingers for an additional 2 rounds. Enemies starting their turn within the Smoke Veil suffer a -1 die penalty to Perception checks and attack rolls due to the disorienting, shadow-infused fog.
Level 12: Spectral Sepsis
Effect: Your "Venom Edge" (core ability) can now be infused with more potent spectral energies. When you apply Venom Edge, you can choose for the poison to deal Soul damage instead of its normal type. If you do, the target must also make a DR 2 Will save or have their connection to positive/healing energies disrupted for 1 minute; any magical healing they receive during this time is halved.
Level 13: Flashing Phantom
Effect: Your "Blink Strike" (core ability) becomes more fluid and disorienting. After successfully hitting with the attack portion of Blink Strike, you may immediately make a free 5-foot (1 square) step that does not provoke attacks of opportunity. Additionally, the first time each scene you use Blink Strike, its Soul Energy or resource cost (if any) is waived.
Level 14: Vitals Seeker
Effect: The bonus damage from your "Shiv Surge" perk (Lvl 4, assumed +2 damage if unseen) is increased by an additional +2 damage (totaling +4 if unseen). Furthermore, when you trigger your "Auto-crit from stealth" passive, if the target is a living humanoid or beast, you strike a major artery or nerve cluster. The target begins bleeding for 2 damage per round for 2 rounds (this does not stack with other bleed effects from you unless specified).
Level 15: Unending Barrage
Effect: Your "Lethal Flow" (Lvl 5) and "Phantom Rush" (Lvl 6) perks are enhanced. If you defeat an enemy and trigger either of these perks, you also regain your Reaction for the round if you had already used it. Additionally, if you use the bonus movement from these perks to engage a new target, your "Blade Feint" (Lvl 2) effect can be applied to this new target as a free action if you hit them this turn.
Level 16: Untouchable Shadow
Effect: Your "Blur Step" (Lvl 8 perk: dodge one melee attack per scene) can now be used twice per scene. Furthermore, when you successfully use Blur Step to dodge an attack, you can immediately move up to 10 feet (2 squares) as part of the same Reaction, without provoking attacks of opportunity from the dodged attacker.
Level 17: Whispers of Certain Doom
Effect: Your "Death’s Whisper" (Lvl 9 perk) execute threshold is improved: you can now use it when a target is at or below 25% of their maximum HP (or an equivalent higher flat HP threshold set by GM). Your "Assassinate" (Lvl 10 perk) attempt is also more terrifying: if the target survives your Assassinate attempt (e.g., they pass their save), they are still Frightened of you for 1 minute, suffering a -2 dice penalty on any action that would directly target or oppose you.
Level 18: One with the Void
Effect: Once per long rest, as a Bonus Action, you can fully merge your essence with the shadows for 1 minute. During this time:
You gain +2 dice on all Stealth checks and Evasion attempts.
You treat dim light as darkness for the purpose of hiding or using abilities that require darkness.
Your "Venom Edge" poison, if applied during this state, is infused with void energy, and its DR for any save to resist its effects is increased by +1.
Level 19: Phantom Assassin
Effect: You become a master of the unseen kill. Your "Shadow Ambush" (Lvl 7 perk: free attack when leaving stealth) no longer expends your ability to make a normal attack during your Action that turn (effectively giving you an extra attack when you ambush). Additionally, when you make an attack from stealth against a target that is unaware of your presence, that target has a -1 penalty to their Defense Value (DV) against that attack.
Level 20: Wraith Walker's Apotheosis
Effect: You are a legend whispered in fear, a true blade in the dark. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can achieve a state of perfect assassination for 1 minute:
Your movement speed is doubled, and you can move through other creatures and obstacles as if they were difficult terrain (you cannot end your turn inside an obstacle or creature).
Your "Auto-crit from stealth" passive applies to every attack you make against a target that has not yet acted in the current combat round OR is unaware of you.
You can use your "Blink Strike" ability as a Bonus Action each turn without expending its normal uses.
Any target damaged by your "Venom Edge" during this state must immediately succeed on a DR 3 Might save or be Paralyzed for 1 round by an unnaturally potent toxin.



Warden of Balance
Starting Skill Points: 6
Starting HP: 10
HP Per Level: +5
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every  level 
Role: Judge / Fate Caster / Support
Core Stats: Will, Soul
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.
Class Abilities:
Time Stasis (Warden of Balance Core Class Ability)
Channeling your deep understanding of temporal mechanics and the flow of fate, you can briefly excise a target from the normal stream of time, locking them in a localized field of stasis.
Action Cost: 1 Action


Cost: 2 Soul Energy (SE)


Frequency: Once per short rest


Range: 30 feet (6 squares)


Target: One creature or one unattended object you can see within range.


Duration: Until the end of your (the Warden's) next turn if the target is a creature; or up to 1 minute for an object (see below).


Effect on a Creature: You attempt to shunt the target into a micro-loop of frozen time. The targeted creature must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Will save to resist being caught in the temporal lock.


On a failed save: The creature is trapped in Time Stasis until the end of your next turn. While in Time Stasis:
Frozen: The creature is completely frozen in place. It cannot take any Actions, Bonus Actions, or Reactions, and it cannot move or be moved by any means. Its initiative position is held.
Suspended Animation: The creature is held in temporal suspension. It is immune to all further damage, healing, conditions, and any other effects (beneficial or harmful) from outside the stasis field for the duration. Any ongoing effects on the target (like bleeding, regeneration, or spell durations) are paused and do not progress while it is in stasis; these effects resume from where they left off once the stasis ends.
When the Time Stasis ends, the creature returns to the normal flow of time and can act normally on its next available turn. Paused effects resume their countdown.
On a successful save: The creature resists the full stasis but is still caught in a minor temporal distortion. Its movement speed is halved, and it cannot take Reactions until the end of its next turn.
Effect on an Object:


If you target an unattended object (no larger than a 5-foot cube, e.g., a falling rock, a closing door, a triggered trap mechanism before it fully resolves), it is automatically frozen in place for up to 1 minute. You can dismiss this effect on an object earlier as a Bonus Action. This can halt simple mechanical processes or hold an object in place against normal physical forces (like gravity for a short period). Complex magical objects or artifacts might resist or be unaffected at the GM's discretion.

Guardian’s Edict (Warden of Balance Core Class Ability)
By uttering a resonant decree of order and protection, you can momentarily shield an ally, reinforcing their defenses and their resolve against incoming attacks.
Action Cost: 1 Bonus Action


Frequency: You can use this ability a number of times equal to your Will attribute (minimum 1 use). You regain all expended uses after completing a short rest.


Range: 30 feet (6 squares)


Target: One ally you can see within range (this can include yourself).


Duration: Until the start of your next turn.


Effect: You channel energies of stability and balance towards the chosen ally, enveloping them in a subtle, shimmering ward. For the duration:


Reinforced Defense: The target ally gains +1 to their Defense Value (DV), making them harder to hit.
Aegis of Resolve: The target ally also gains Temporary Hit Points equal to your Soul attribute (minimum 1). These Temporary HP absorb damage from any source and are lost first before normal Hit Points. Any remaining Temporary HP from this edict vanish when the edict's duration ends (at the start of your next turn) or if they are replaced by a new source of Temporary HP. Temporary HP from different applications of Guardian's Edict do not stack; only the newest application applies.
Stacking Note: The +1 DV granted by this Guardian's Edict can stack with the +1 DV granted by your "Edict of Order" (Level 1 perk) if the ally is also within that aura and you choose to apply Guardian's Edict to them.



Timeless Bulwark (Warden of Balance Passive Class Ability)
Your very being is anchored against the chaotic eddies and forceful currents of manipulated time. As a Warden of Balance, you are a bastion of temporal stability, inherently immune to effects that would unnaturally alter your personal passage through time.
Core resistance: You gain +1 die to rolling saves against magical spells, supernatural abilities, paradoxes, or environmental effects that directly and unwillingly attempt to:
Alter Your Personal Speed: This applies to effects that would magically slow your movement or reduce your actions per turn through temporal means (e.g., by spells like "Slow"), or effects that would magically hasten you against your will (e.g., by a hostile "Haste" meant to throw off your rhythm or prematurely exhaust you).
Stop or Freeze Your Time: This includes effects that would trap you in a localized time stop, such as an enemy's "Time Stasis" ability or similar temporal freezing or paralyzing effects.
Artificially Age or De-Age You: This applies to magical or supernatural effects that attempt to rapidly age your physical form or revert you to a younger state. (Natural aging still occurs ).
Displace You Temporally: This includes effects that would unwillingly shunt you forward or backward in time, or into temporal pocket dimensions, by magical means.
Interaction with Area-of-Effect Temporal Fields: When you are within a larger area where time is being globally manipulated (e.g., a zone where all time flows slower or faster for everyone, like a powerful enemy's version of "Riftstorm" or a naturally occurring temporal anomaly), you gain +1 die to any saving throws you are required to make against being personally slowed, hastened against your will, or otherwise unwillingly having your personal rate of action directly altered by the zone's temporal distortion. You would still perceive the distorted time affecting your surroundings and other creatures. (This enhanced chance to resist might make you appear faster in a slow field if you succeed on your save where others fail, or more normal in an accelerated one).
Interaction with Beneficial or Self-Inflicted Effects: This resistance primarily applies against hostile or unwanted temporal manipulations.
Willing Acceptance of Effects: You do not gain this +1 die bonus to saving throws against beneficial time-altering effects you willingly accept from allies (e.g., if an ally casts a "Haste" spell on you that you consent to).
Own Abilities: This resistance does not impede your use of your own time-manipulating abilities (like "Time Stasis" or "Riftstorm") on others or areas around you.
What This Resistance Does NOT Typically Cover: This +1 die bonus to saving throws against temporal effects does not apply to:
The normal, natural passage of time and its associated effects (e.g., natural aging, the duration of standard poisons or diseases).
Effects that manipulate initiative order through non-temporal means (such as tactical surprise, enhanced reflexes from mundane training, or precognitive foresight that isn't direct time manipulation – your "Foresight" perk is an example of the latter).
Mundane effects that physically slow movement (like difficult terrain, physical restraints, or paralysis from a physical toxin) unless these effects are explicitly stated to be magical and temporal in nature.
The normal duration countdown of spells or ongoing effects already on you, unless a new temporal effect specifically targets those durations to alter them.
Narrative Implication: Your notable resilience against temporal manipulations may grant you a greater intuitive sense when major temporal paradoxes or disturbances occur in your vicinity, potentially allowing you to perceive such ripples with more clarity or suffer less personal negative consequence than others (GM discretion).




Suggested Skills for Point Allocation:
Rituals: For their divine rituals and maintaining balance.
Glyphcasting: For warding and protective magic.
Insight: To perceive truths and judge situations.
Persuasion: To guide others or enforce their edicts.
Forbidden Knowledge or History: To understand the Pillars, fate, and ancient lore.
Religion: If their power stems from divine insight or connection to the Pillars.
Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Edict of Order
Activation: As a Bonus Action, you can activate or deactivate this Edict.
Area of Effect: A 5-foot (1 square) radius aura around you.
Duration: Until you use a Bonus Action to deactivate it, you are incapacitated, or you choose to end it (no action cost).
Effect: While this Edict is active, your unwavering presence bolsters the defenses of those near you. You and all allies who are currently within the aura gain +1 to their Defense Value (DV).
Lvl 2: Foresight
Frequency: Once per scene.
Activation (Reactive): After all initiative rolls (or other methods of determining turn order) have been completed at the beginning of a combat encounter, but before the first creature takes its turn.
Effect: You receive a brief, intuitive flash of how the immediate future might unfold. You can choose to reroll your own initiative dice pool. You must use the result of the second roll.
Lvl 3: Balance Strike
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature, object, or ongoing magical effect.
Effect: You unleash a pulse of pure, ordering energy to unravel enchantments.
Willing Target/Unattended Effect: If targeting a willing ally to remove a hostile effect, or targeting an unattended magical effect (like a magical ward or an illusion not actively maintained), the effect automatically ends if its power level or the original caster's relevant spellcasting ability (Attribute + Skill) is not significantly greater than your Soul + Will (GM discretion for truly epic or artifact-level magic).
Unwilling Target/Resisted Effect: If attempting to dispel an effect on an unwilling creature (like a magical buff on an enemy) or an actively maintained/resisted magical effect, you must make a Soul + Will skill check. The Difficulty Rating (DR) is set by the GM, typically DR 2 for common magical effects, DR 3 for more potent ones, or it may be an opposed roll against the original caster's spellcasting ability if they are present and actively resisting. On a success, one targeted magical effect is dispelled.
Lvl 4: Fate Align
Frequency: Once per scene.
Activation (Reactive): When an ally within 30 feet (6 squares) that you can see or hear fails an attack roll, skill check, or saving throw.
Effect: You can use your Reaction to subtly manipulate the strands of fate around your ally. The chosen ally may immediately reroll all the dice for that single failed roll. They must use the result of this second roll.
Lvl 5: Command the Cycle
Frequency: Once per long rest 
Activation (Reactive): When an ally (including yourself) within 30 feet (6 squares) that you can see is reduced to 0 Hit Points and would normally be incapacitated or begin dying.
Effect: You expend your Reaction to forcefully intervene in the cycle of life and death. The target ally is instead reduced to 1 Hit Point, their spirit momentarily anchored by your will, averting incapacitation from that specific instance of damage. This cannot prevent death from effects that explicitly state "instant death" without HP reduction (GM discretion).
Lvl 6: Echo of Fate
Frequency: Once per scene.
Activation (Reactive): When you, the Warden of Balance, personally fail an attack roll, skill check, or saving throw.
Effect: You sense a flicker of an alternate outcome and can choose to immediately reroll all the dice for that single failed roll. You must use the result of this second roll.
Lvl 7: Zone of Judgment
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Range: Center a 15-foot (3 squares) radius sphere on a point you can see within 60 feet (12 squares).
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You imbue the designated area with an aura of inescapable cosmic judgment. All enemies who are within this zone or who enter it for the first time on their turn suffer a -1 penalty to their Defense Value (DV), making them easier for you and your allies to hit.
Lvl 8: Mark of Equilibrium
Action Cost: Bonus Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One enemy creature you can see.
Duration: A number of rounds equal to your Will attribute (minimum 1 round).
Effect: You place a shimmering Mark of Equilibrium upon the target. For the duration, whenever the marked enemy deals damage to any of your allies (this does not apply to damage dealt to you, the Warden), that damage is reduced by 2 points. This reduction is applied after considering Armor.
Lvl 9: Judgment Wheel
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 3 Soul Energy.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Area of Effect: A 30-foot (6 squares) radius zone centered on you, which moves with you.
Duration: 1 minute.
Effect: You invoke your profound connection to cosmic law, temporarily rewriting a fundamental rule of engagement within the zone. When activating this ability, choose one "Law" from a list (or work with your GM to create a new, balanced one). This Law affects all creatures (friend and foe, including yourself unless stated otherwise) within the zone. Examples of Laws:
Law of Attenuation: All magical healing within the zone is halved. All magical damage dealt is reduced by 2.
Law of Inevitable Retribution: Any creature that deals damage to another creature within the zone immediately suffers 2 Soul damage themselves.
Law of True Sight: Illusions cannot be maintained within the zone; creatures cannot benefit from magical invisibility.
Law of Binding Earth: Movement speed for all creatures is halved; no creature can use magical flight or teleportation into, out of, or within the zone. The GM has final approval on the chosen Law and its specific mechanical interpretation to maintain game balance.
Lvl 10: Eternal Balance
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Activation: At the start of any round in a significant combat or pivotal scene confrontation, you can declare you are invoking Eternal Balance (this does not cost an action).
Effect: You perfectly align yourself with the flow of time and fate for this crucial moment. During this specific round, you take two complete turns instead of one. You resolve your first turn as normal (Action, Bonus Action, Move, using your Reaction if applicable). Then, after at least one other creature in the initiative order has taken its turn (or at the end of the round if you were last), you immediately take a second, identical full turn. Initiative proceeds as normal from that point or into the next round.
Level 11: Pillar's Resilience
Effect: Your "Edict of Order" (Lvl 1 perk) now also grants allies within its radius resistance to one minor detrimental condition chosen when you activate the Edict (e.g., ignore difficult terrain from a mundane source, or +1 saving die. This chosen resistance lasts as long as they remain in the Edict's radius. Your core "Guardian’s Edict" ability now also allows the buffed ally to ignore the next instance of forced movement against them this round.
Level 12: Stabilizing Presence
Effect: Your "Time Stasis" core ability becomes more controlled. You can now choose to affect only a creature's limbs, preventing them from taking actions requiring physical movement (like attacks or moving from their space) but still allowing them to speak or use purely mental actions. The DR for the saving throw against your Time Stasis is increased by +1 if the target has recently acted in a way that heavily skewed balance (e.g., killed an innocent, used potent forbidden magic – GM discretion).
Level 13: Fated Intercession
Effect: Your "Fate Align" (Lvl 4 perk) and "Echo of Fate" (Lvl 6 perk) are enhanced. When you allow an ally to re-roll with Fate Align, or when you re-roll with Echo of Fate, the re-rolled dice pool gains +1 bonus die. Furthermore, you gain one additional use of Fate Align per scene.
Level 14: All-Seeing Eye of Judgment
Effect: Once per scene, as an Action, you can open your senses to perceive the karmic weight and hidden truths surrounding a creature or significant object you can see within 30 feet. You learn one significant truth about its recent past actions related to balance (e.g., "This person recently betrayed their sacred oath," "This object was used in a dark ritual," "This creature is a servant of the Elder God"). Additionally, you gain a permanent +2 dice on Insight checks made to discern if someone is under the influence of a powerful external entity (like the Elder God or a Hylden mind-bender).
Level 15: Perfected Equilibrium
Effect: Your "Balance Strike" (Lvl 3 perk) is now powerful enough to unravel even potent enchantments. It can now end one magical effect on a target with a DR up to 3 (or two effects with DR 1 each). If you use Balance Strike to remove a harmful effect from an ally, they also gain Temporary Hit Points equal to your Will attribute. If used to remove a beneficial effect from an enemy, that enemy also suffers a -2 dice penalty to their next saving throw.
Level 16: Cycle Redemptor
Effect: Your "Command the Cycle" (Lvl 5 perk) ability to prevent death is empowered. The ally now returns with HP equal to twice your Level + your Will attribute, and they also gain +1 die to all their rolls for their next turn as their spirit is reinvigorated by balanced energies. Additionally, this ability can now be used twice long rest though the second use requires you to suffer 1 point of Soul Stress.
Level 17: Unyielding Adjudication
Effect: Your "Zone of Judgment" (Lvl 7 perk) becomes a true symbol of inescapable cosmic law. Enemies within the zone not only suffer -1 to their DV but are also unable to benefit from magical invisibility or teleportation effects. Any attempt to do so while in the zone automatically fails. The size of the Zone of Judgment can now be increased by an additional 5 feet in radius if you choose when casting.
Level 18: Anchored in Time
Effect: Your immunity to time-based effects (core passive) now projects outwards. Once per long rest, as a Bonus Action, you can create a 15-foot radius aura of temporal stability around yourself for 1 minute. You and any allies within this aura are immune to magical effects that would slow, hasten, or stop their personal time (like an enemy's Time Stasis or spells causing slow/haste). This does not affect area-wide temporal effects like your own Riftstorm, unless you are specifically immune to those through other means.
Level 19: Architect of Destiny
Effect: Your "Judgment Wheel" (Lvl 9 perk) ability can now be used with greater precision and impact. You can choose to make one of its rule changes significantly more potent (e.g., if it normally imposes a -1 die penalty, it might impose -2 dice; if it changes an elemental resistance to vulnerability, it remains a vulnerability for an extra round – GM discretion on specific amplifications). Furthermore, you can subtly influence the Wheel's outcome once after activating it; you may force one creature affected by the new rules to re-roll one d6 on their next relevant check, using the second result.
Level 20: Nexus of Aeons
Effect: You become a living conduit for the timeless principles of Balance. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can embody the Nexus of Aeons for 1 minute:
All allies within 30 feet of you gain the benefits of your "Edict of Order" (Lvl 1 perk, +1 DV) and your "Guardian's Edict" (+1 DV, stacks for a total of +2 DV).
Any enemy that attempts to directly attack you or an ally within 30 feet must first succeed on a DR 2 Will save each time they attack. Failure means they hesitate and lose that specific attack, though they can still use other actions.
You can use your "Time Stasis" ability as a Bonus Action, and its effects last for an additional round if the target fails their save.
Once during this state, you can issue a "Decree of Unmaking": Choose one creature within sight. That creature must make a DR 4 Soul save. On a failure, any one ongoing beneficial magical effect on them of your choice immediately ends, and they take Soul damage equal to your (Will x 2). On a success, they only take half that damage, and the effect is merely suppressed for 1 round.



Hylden Warlock
Starting Skill Points: 6
Starting HP: 8
HP Per Level: +4
Skill Progression: Gain +1 skill point every  level 
Role: Dark Mage / Debuffer
Core Stats: Soul, Will
At character levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20, you may increase one core attribute of your choice by 1 point. No attribute may exceed 5 through this method. This is in addition to any attribute increases granted by specific perks or rare narrative events.
Class Abilities:

Void Shard (Hylden Warlock Core Class Ability)
You conjure a missile of solidified entropy, a fragment of the chaotic void from which the Hylden hail, and hurl it at your foes or a troublesome magical effect.
Action Cost: 1 Action


Cost: 1 Soul Energy (SE)


This cost makes it a deliberate choice rather than a free cantrip, reflecting its specialized anti-magic nature.
Range: 60 feet (12 squares)


Target: One creature, object, or an active, visible magical effect (such as a magical ward, an illusion, or an ongoing spell effect with a tangible presence).


Effect against a Creature or Object:


You make a ranged spell attack roll. This is typically your Soul attribute + your Forbidden Knowledge skill against the target's Defense Value (DV).
On a hit: The target is struck by the shard and suffers 3 Soul damage. This damage is inherently magical and bypasses all non-magical physical Armor.
Anti-Magic Pulse (Creature Only): .if the creature hit was concentrating on a spell, they must immediately make a Concentration check (using their Will + Concentration skill) against a DR set by this ability (e.g., DR equal to 1 + number of successes on your attack roll, or a flat DR 2) to maintain their spell.
On a failed save: If they were concentrating, their concentration is broken. If they were benefiting from a magical buff, one such buff of your choice (that you are aware of or can perceive) on the target is suppressed (its effects cease to function) until the end of their next turn.
Effect against an Active Magical Effect:


If you target an active magical effect directly (like a shimmering magical barrier, a persistent illusion, a mystical glyph, or a zone of magical influence), you do not make an attack roll against a DV.
Instead, you make a Soul attribute + Forbidden Knowledge skill check. The Difficulty Rating (DR) to dispel the effect is determined by the GM based on the power and complexity of the magic (e.g., DR 2 for simple or low-tier magical effects, DR 3 for well-established or mid-tier effects, DR 4+ for very powerful or ancient wards).
On a success: The targeted magical effect is immediately dispelled, unraveled by the void shard's entropic energy. This cannot typically dispel curses that are deeply woven into a creature's soul, effects on powerful artifacts, or instantaneous spells whose effects have already fully resolved.
Special:


Void Shard can affect ethereal or incorporeal creatures and magical effects as if they were solid.

Entropic Curse (Hylden Warlock Core Class Ability)
You whisper a sibilant phrase in the discordant Hylden tongue, weaving a minor thread of pure, unmaking entropy and affixing it to your foe's essence, causing their efforts to falter and their vitality to fray.
Action Cost: 1 Action


Cost: 1 Soul Energy (SE)


Range: 30 feet (6 squares)


Target: One creature you can see within range.


Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.


Effect: You direct a focused stream of decaying energy at the target. The targeted creature must make a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Will save to resist the curse's immediate effects on their mind and spirit.


On a failed save: The creature is afflicted by your Entropic Curse for the duration (as long as you maintain concentration). While cursed in this way, the target suffers the following debilitating effects:
It has a -1 die penalty on all of its attack rolls.
It has a -1 die penalty on all of its saving throws.
On a successful save: The creature manages to shrug off the worst of the entropic energies, suffering no ill effects from this casting.
Maintaining the Curse:


This curse requires your active concentration to maintain. If your concentration is broken (e.g., by taking damage and failing a Focus check, or by casting another spell that requires concentration), the Entropic Curse immediately ends on the target.
You can only have one creature affected by your Entropic Curse at a time. Casting it on a new target while a previous curse is active automatically ends the effect on the first target.
You can choose to end the curse on a target at any time (no action required).

Hylden Warlock Passive Ability: Entropic Surge
Condition for Activation: This passive ability activates whenever the Hylden Warlock's current Sanity points are at or below half of their maximum Sanity.


The Level 5 perk "Forbidden Truth," which allows the Warlock to spend Sanity instead of Soul Energy to cast spells, directly facilitates reaching this state.
The Level 15 perk "Void-Forged Will" also references the passive being active when "under half sanity".
Effect of the "Boost Magic": While "Entropic Surge" is active (i.e., the Warlock is at or below half Sanity), the Hylden Warlock gains:


+1 die to all their spellcasting rolls.
This applies to spell attack rolls (e.g., for Void Shard against a creature).
It also applies to any skill checks made to cast or determine the potency of their spells against effects or objects (e.g., a Soul + Forbidden Knowledge check for Void Shard against an active magical effect, or for Rituals).

Suggested Skills for Point Allocation:
Forbidden Knowledge: Core to their understanding of entropy and dark prophecy.
Glyphcasting: Particularly for glyph decay and twisting rules.
Rituals: For soul leeching and potent spellcraft.
Deception or Presence: To manipulate or instill fear.
Concentration: To channel pain, memory, and resist madness.
Insight: To understand and exploit the sanity of others.
Level Perks:
Lvl 1: Dark Insight
Frequency: Once per short rest.
Effect (Reactive): When you fail a saving throw against an effect that would cause you to suffer Sanity damage (or gain a new madness-related condition), you can choose to immediately reroll that failed Sanity saving throw. You must use the result of the second roll. This reflects your familiarity with and slight resistance to the initial corrupting whispers you channel.
Lvl 2: Hex Spark
Activation (Triggered): Automatically triggers when you successfully cast a spell that targets at least one enemy creature and costs you Soul Energy.
Effect: Immediately after your spell's primary effect resolves on one of its targets (your choice if multiple), a small eruption of chaotic Hylden energy sparks outwards from that target. The chosen original target of your spell (if it's still an enemy and present) and all other creatures (friend or foe) within 5 feet (1 square) of it (but not the chosen original target again) suffer 1 Soul damage. This damage is minor but bypasses physical Armor.
Lvl 3: Madness Surge
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 1 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature you can see.
Effect: You channel a disorienting pulse of Hylden mental static at the target. The target must succeed on a Difficulty Rating (DR) 2 Will save.
On a failed save: The target is Confused for 1 round. On its turn, a Confused creature cannot take Reactions and must roll a d6 to determine its behavior:
1-2: Does nothing but stare blankly or babble.
3-4: Moves its full Speed in a random direction (determined by GM or die roll).
5-6: Makes a single melee attack against a randomly determined creature within its reach (this could be an ally, an enemy, or itself if no one else is in reach). If no one is in reach, it takes the Dodge action.
On a successful save: The target is only momentarily disoriented and suffers a -1 die penalty on its next attack roll or skill check made before the end of its next turn.
Lvl 4: Willbreaker
Effect (Passive): Your will is bolstered by the fear you inflict. Whenever an enemy creature you can see is suffering from the Frightened condition as a direct result of one of your spells or abilities, you gain a +1 die bonus on all your own Will-based skill checks and Will saving throws. This bonus persists as long as at least one such enemy remains Frightened by you and visible.
Lvl 5: Forbidden Truth
Activation: An option chosen when you cast any spell you know that has a Soul Energy cost.
Frequency: You can use this feature a number of times per long rest equal to your Will attribute (minimum 1 use).
Effect: You can choose to cast a spell by paying its Soul Energy cost with your own Sanity instead. If you do so, you do not expend any Soul Energy for that spell, but you immediately suffer Sanity damage (or gain sanity damage points) equal to the original Soul Energy cost of the spell (minimum 1 Sanity damage). This Sanity loss is direct and cannot be reduced by normal means. This allows you to cast spells even when your Soul Energy is depleted, at a steep mental price. (This directly fuels your passive "Boost magic while under half sanity.")
Lvl 6: Decay Field
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Range: Target a point you can see within 60 feet (12 squares).
Area of Effect: A 10-foot (2 squares) radius sphere of shimmering, visibly decaying entropic energy.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: The air within the field hums with unmaking energies. Any creature (other than you, the Hylden Warlock) that starts its turn within the Decay Field or enters it for the first time on a turn feels its vitality and resolve fray. Affected creatures suffer a -1 die penalty on all attack rolls they make and all saving throws they attempt while they remain in the field, and for 1 round after they leave it.
Lvl 7: Glyph of Disquiet
Action Cost: 1 Action (to inscribe the glyph).
Cost: 2 Soul Energy.
Placement: Inscribed on a surface you touch, or on a small object you carry (which then radiates the effect).
Area of Effect: A 15-foot (3 squares) radius aura emanates from the inscribed glyph.
Duration: 1 hour, or until the glyph is dispelled or the object/surface it's on is destroyed.
Effect: The glyph pulses with subtle, unnerving Hylden frequencies. All enemies within the aura feel a pervasive sense of wrongness and doubt, causing them to suffer a -1 die penalty on all d6 rolls they make for attack rolls, skill checks, and saving throws.
Lvl 8: Ritual of Pain
Activation: An option chosen when you cast a Hylden Warlock spell that deals direct damage.
Effect: Before any attack rolls are made or targets attempt saving throws for the spell, you can choose to sacrifice your own Hit Points to amplify its destructive power. For every 2 Hit Points you choose to sacrifice (this HP loss is direct, cannot be reduced, and occurs when the spell is cast), the spell deals an additional +1 damage to each target successfully hit or that fails its save against the spell. You can sacrifice a maximum number of HP equal to your Character Level in this way for any single spell.
Lvl 9: Nether Binding
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 3 Soul Energy.
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature you can see.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: You attempt to fray and bind the target's spiritual essence, anchoring it with Hylden chains of despair. The target must succeed on a DR 3 Soul save.
On a failed save: The target's soul is "bound" for 1 minute. While bound, the target cannot regain Hit Points or magical resources (like Soul Energy or Blood Points) by any means, cannot be resurrected if killed during this time, and suffers a -2 dice penalty on all saving throws. Furthermore, any attempt by the target to use teleportation or extra-planar travel automatically fails.
On a successful save: The target only suffers a -1 die penalty on its next saving throw and takes 2 Soul damage.
Lvl 10: Mind Rupture
Action Cost: 1 Action.
Cost: 3 Soul Energy, and you suffer 1d2 irreducible sanity damage
Range: 30 feet (6 squares).
Target: One creature you can see that possesses a mind.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: You channel a focused blast of raw, incomprehensible Hylden madness directly into the target's psyche. The target must succeed on a DR 3 Will save.
On a failed save: The target's mind shatters. They gain a significant short-term madness (as per your game's madness rules, or GM chooses a severe condition like being permanently Confused (as per the Lvl 3 Madness Surge, but lasting until cured), developing an intense paranoia that forces them to attack the nearest creature each turn, or falling into a catatonic state). This severe mental state lasts until potent magical healing or a specific ritual (defined by GM) is used to restore their sanity.
On a successful save: The target still suffers Soul damage equal to your Character Level from the psychic backlash and is Stunned for 1 round.


Level 11: Echoes of the Exile
Effect: Your connection to the Hylden's banished realm intensifies. When you cast a spell that inflicts a debuff (like "Entropic Curse" or from "Decay Field"), targets affected by the debuff also suffer a -1 die penalty to any attempt to magically remove or resist that specific debuff you inflicted. Additionally, your "Void Shard's" ability to disrupt concentration is altered: when a target damaged by your Void Shard is concentrating on a spell, they must make an immediate Difficulty Rating (DR) 1 check using their Focus attribute dice pool to maintain concentration on that spell. This DR 1 Focus check replaces the standard concentration check normally required by the Void Shard core ability.
Level 12: Soul Flensing
Effect: Your connection to the Hylden's banished realm intensifies. When you cast a spell that inflicts a debuff (like "Entropic Curse" or from "Decay Field"), targets affected by the debuff also suffer a -1 die penalty to any attempt to magically remove or resist that specific debuff you inflicted. Additionally, the concentration disruption effect of your "Void Shard" is altered: when a target damaged by your Void Shard is concentrating on a spell, they must now make an immediate Difficulty Rating (DR) 1 check using their Focus attribute dice pool to maintain concentration on that spell. This DR 1 Focus check replaces the standard concentration check (the Will + Concentration skill check against a variable/DR 2) normally required by the Void Shard core ability..
Level 13: Unspeakable Premonitions
Effect: Once per scene, you can utter a chilling, brief prophecy that twists immediate fate. As a Reaction, when any creature (including yourself) within 30 feet (6 squares) makes an attack roll, skill check, or saving throw, you can force them to re-roll that entire dice pool. They must use the second result. You take 1 point of sanity damage when you use this ability.
Level 14: Aura of Despair
Effect: Your "Glyph of Disquiet" (Lvl 7 perk) becomes more potent. Enemies within its radius now suffer a -1 die penalty on all skill checks and saving throws (not just rolls, as previously implied, clarifying its scope). Additionally, your "Madness Surge" (Lvl 3 perk) can now affect up to two targets if they are within 10 feet of each other, though the second target gets +1 die on their save.
Level 15: Void-Forged Will
Effect: Your experience with forbidden truths and otherworldly energies armors your mind. Your "Dark Insight" (Lvl 1 perk) now allows you to gain +1 success on a failed Sanity save you choose to reroll (instead of just a simple reroll). Additionally, when your passive "Boost magic while under half sanity" is active, you also gain +1 to your Defense Value (DV) as your erratic nature makes you harder to target effectively.
Level 16: Entropic Unmaking
Effect: Once per short rest, as an Action, you can channel raw entropy against a non-living object or magical construct (like a Golem or an Archglyph guardian) no larger than a 10-foot cube within 60 feet. Make a Soul + Forbidden Knowledge check (DR 2 for mundane objects, DR 3 for magical constructs, DR 4 for powerful artifacts/wards). On a success, the target rapidly decays, rusts, or unravels, suffering damage equal to (your Level x 2), bypassing any mundane hardness or armor. If this destroys it, it crumbles to dust. This cannot directly harm living creatures but can destroy their gear if targeted and they fail an Evasion check to protect it.
Level 17: Feast on Suffering
Effect: Your "Ritual of Pain" (Lvl 8 perk) becomes a conduit for power. When you sacrifice HP using Ritual of Pain to enhance a spell, for every 2 HP you sacrifice, you also regain 1 Soul Energy (up to your maximum). Additionally, if an enemy is defeated by a spell enhanced by your Ritual of Pain, you gain Temporary HP equal to the amount of HP you sacrificed for that spell.
Level 18: Shattered Prophecy
Effect: Your "Forbidden Truth" (Lvl 5 perk: take Sanity loss to cast without cost) is mastered. The Sanity loss you take is reduced by 1 (to a minimum of 1). Furthermore, when you cast a spell using Forbidden Truth, you can choose to warp its energies: the spell gains +1 success on its casting roll, OR its target suffers a -1 die penalty on their saving throw against it.
Level 19: Soul Annihilation
Effect: Your "Nether Binding" (Lvl 9 perk) can now utterly consume a weakened soul. If you successfully apply Nether Binding to a target that is already below 25% of its maximum HP, you can choose to intensify the binding. The target must make an immediate DR 3 Soul save (in addition to any normal saves for Nether Binding). If they fail, their soul is not just locked but shattered, instantly killing them (if mortal) or banishing them from Nosgoth for a significant period (if an extra-planar or unique entity, GM discretion). Using this ability is an act of profound darkness and inflicts 1d2 irreducible Sanity damage on you.
Level 20: Oracle of a Dying World
Effect: You become a true prophet of the inevitable decay, wielding terrifying cosmic power. Once per long rest, as an Action, you can pronounce a "Doom of the Hylden" for 1 minute:
All your spells that inflict Sanity damage or cause madness/fear effects are treated as if you achieved +1 success on the casting or the target has -1 die on their save (your choice per casting).
You can use your "Forbidden Truth" perk to cast spells at no Soul Energy cost without taking any Sanity loss for the duration (the Sanity cost is waived).
Once during this state, as an Action, you can unleash a "Wave of Nihility" in a 30-foot cone. All creatures in the cone must make a DR 3 Will save. On failure, they suffer Soul damage equal to your Level, and any temporary magical effects on them (buffs, illusions, wards with a duration) immediately end. On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.
This is visibly an act of profound, unmaking Hylden magic.
































Level 1 Character Creation Guide

🧱 Step 1: Concept & Background
Choose your origin: Are you a cursed vampire noble? A human Sarafan zealot? A spectral wraith reborn?
Determine your faction allegiance or independence.
Pick a core motivation (e.g. vengeance, redemption, survival, unraveling fate).

🧬 Step 2: Choose a Race
Each lineage has unique traits and starting bonuses that define your character's inherent abilities and connection to the world of Nosgoth. Examples:
Vampire:
Immortal and cursed, vampires possess supernatural strength and blood-fueled powers.
They gain +1 to Weapon Mastery and +1 to Stealth skills.
Their unique trait allows them to gain 1 Blood when near a dying creature.
Vampires can move through rubble without penalty and have a +1 to Stealth rolls in darkness or moonlight.
Their narrative hook often involves being bound by the wheel of fate and the blood of the ancients.
Human:
Frail but defiant, humans are adaptable mortals fighting for survival.
They can choose any two skills to receive a +1 bonus.
Their unique trait grants them 1 extra perk every 4 levels.
Humans may ignore one terrain penalty per session due to their adaptability and gain +1 to Stealth in crowds.
Their narrative hook often portrays them as the last flickers of resistance and redemption.
Wraith:
Souls untethered from flesh, wraiths walk the boundary of life and death, able to manipulate their connection to the Spectral Realm.
They gain +1 to Possession and +1 to Observation skills.
Their unique trait is Wraith Phasing, allowing them to become translucent, move through thin barriers, deal Soul damage ignoring physical Armor, and resist non-magical physical damage.
Wraiths ignore terrain penalties and gain advantage on Stealth checks while in the Spectral Realm.
Their narrative hook often involves being forgotten by death and hunted by time.
Hylden-Blooded:
Exiled beings of entropy and dark invention, often bearing ancient wrath.
They gain +1 to Glyphcasting and +1 to Forbidden Knowledge skills.
Their unique trait allows them to cast one spell long rest without cost, but they must take Corruption.
Hylden-Blooded move at full speed across corrupted or glyph-infused terrain and may surge 10 ft once per scene when taking a Corruption Die.
Their narrative hook positions them as bearers of ancient wrath, seeking dominion or revenge.

🧙 Step 3: Choose a Class
Pick from a custom class list. Each class has unique perks and equipment. Examples:
Blood Mage – Spellcaster focused on blood magic and life manipulation.
Sarafan Crusader – Frontline holy warrior with anti-undead bonuses.
Forbidden Scholar – Uses corrupted spells and arcane relics.
Outcast Warden – Hybrid survivalist and rogue.
Each class grants:
Starting HP
Skill point pool (e.g., 6–10 points)
Perk Tree Access
Starting Gear

🎲 Step 4: Assign Attributes
Distribute 15 points across six attributes with a max of 3 :
Fury:


Description: Aggression and emotional force.
Usage: This attribute likely governs a character's raw power, rage, aggressive combat prowess, and perhaps intimidation. It's a core stat for classes like Blood Knight, Soul Reaver, and Dreadblade. Skills like Weapon Mastery, Unarmed Combat, and Presence can be linked to Fury.
Soul:


Description: Represents a character's spiritual power, connection to the Spectral Realm, innate magical aptitude for certain types of magic, or the strength of their life essence.
Usage: This is a crucial attribute for most spellcasting classes like Soul Reaver, Shadowmancer, Sangromancer, Glyph Seeker, Hylden Warlock, and Warden of Balance. It influences Soul Energy reserves and is linked to skills such as Glyphcasting, Possession, Forbidden Knowledge, Observation, and Craft.
Shadow:


Description: Stealth, evasion, subtlety.
Usage: Governs a character's ability to remain unseen, deceive, move quietly, and perform acts requiring finesse and subterfuge. It's a core stat for classes like Shadowmancer and Dreadblade. Skills like Weapon Mastery (for finesse strikes), Evasion, Stealth, and Thievery are often linked to Shadow.
Will:


Description (from Level 1 Character Creation Guide): Mental resilience.
Usage: Represents a character's mental fortitude, determination, discipline, and ability to resist mental influence or channel focused magical energies. It's a core stat for classes like Glyph Seeker, Hylden Warlock, and Warden of Balance. A wide array of skills, including Evasion, Tactics, Glyphcasting, Forbidden Knowledge, and Insight, can be linked to Will. It's also often used for saving throws against mental or magical assaults.
Focus:


Description: Represents mental acuity, concentration, awareness, precision, and the ability to maintain control over complex tasks or magical effects.
Usage: This attribute is important for perception, concentration, and detailed work. Skills like Tactics, Forbidden Knowledge, Thievery, Observation, Insight, History, Nature, and Craft can be linked to Focus. It's also crucial for maintaining concentration on spells or abilities.
Blood:


Description (inferred): Relates to a character's physical vitality, life essence, and the inherent power within blood itself, particularly for vampires or those who manipulate life force.
Usage: A core stat for classes like Blood Knight and Sangromancer. It likely influences Blood Point reserves, abilities tied to blood magic or vampiric powers, and potentially physical resilience or unarmed attacks.


Calculating Starting Resource Pools:
Soul Energy (SE): If your class uses Soul Energy, your starting maximum SE is 3 + your Will attribute + 1 (as Character Level / 2, rounded up, is 1 at Level 1). See the 'Spellcasting in Nosgoth' section (page X) for full details on SE.
Blood Points (BP): If your class or lineage uses Blood Points, your starting maximum BP is 4 + your Shadow attribute + 1. See the 'Spellcasting in Nosgoth' section (page Y) for full details on BP.


🧠 Step 5: Assign Skills
Select and assign points into skills based on your class and race.
You begin with Skill Points granted by your class and race (typically 6–10).
"At character creation (Level 1), a skill's rank cannot exceed 3. Additionally, a skill's rank cannot be greater than your character's highest attribute that is typically associated with that skill (see Skill-to-Attribute Summary Table ). For example, if your highest associated attribute for Weapon Mastery (Fury or Shadow) is 2, then your Weapon Mastery skill cannot exceed rank 2 at Level 1, even though the general cap is 3. The absolute maximum for any skill remains 5 ranks.
Skills include: Glyphcasting, Rituals, Weapon Mastery, Stealth, Insight, Persuasion, Forbidden Knowledge, etc.
Each skill is tied to an attribute and contributes to your dice pool when making rolls.

🗡 Step 6: Choose Starting Gear
General Rule for All Classes:
Players select one weapon from the options available to their class archetype.
Players select appropriate armor, typically from the options available to their class archetype or suitable universal armor.
Starting gear may include 1 minor relic or spell scroll (GM discretion).
Here are the suggested starting gear options for each class:
Blood Knight
Starting Weapon (Choose one, likely from "Vampire Class" or suitable Universal lists):
Scion Blade – Damage: 6 – Bleed on crit; +1 damage if you've fed this round
Bloodfang Dagger – Damage: 4 – +2 damage when targeting a bleeding foe
Nightblade Saber – Damage: 5 – +1 armor penetration; silent and swift
Nosgothian War Axe (Universal) – Damage: 6 – On crit, remove 1 reaction from target
Nosgothian Cleaver (Universal) – Damage: 6 – Brutal and heavy; -1 to hit but ignores 2 armor
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate, likely from "Vampire Class" or Universal lists):
Bloodsteel Cuirass – Reduces Damage by 2, gain +1 HP after melee crit. Corruption threshold +1
Fleshwoven Mail – Reduces Damage by 2, regenerate 1 HP if standing in blood
Graveskin Harness – Reduces Damage by 1, +1 to DR vs. fire and radiant effects
Nosgothian Chainmail (Universal) – +2 DV, standard medium armor
Soul Reaver
Starting Weapon (Choose one from "Wraith / Spirit-Bound Class" list):
Spectral Talons – Damage: 4 (Spiritual) – Ignores armor; requires Spectral Realm
Echoblade – Damage: 5 – On hit, copy last minor spell cast
Phantom Claws – Damage: 3 – On hit, inflict -1 on enemy rolls for 1 round
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate from "Wraith / Spirit-Bound Class" list):
Shroud of Echoes – Reduces Damage by 1, ignore terrain effects. Move freely in Spectral Realm
Gravewind Mantle – Reduces Damage by 2, attacks against you have -1 on first round of combat
Veilpiercer Shroud – Reduces Damage by 1, you see into Spectral and Material realms simultaneously
Shadowmancer
Starting Weapon (Choose one, likely from "Vampire Class", "Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class", or Universal lists):
Nightblade Saber (Vampire Class) – Damage: 5 – +1 armor penetration; silent and swift
Whisperknife (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Damage: 3 – Can be summoned and dismissed freely; bypasses normal wards
Throwing Dagger (Universal) – Damage: 3 – Thrown (Range 8 tiles); mark target for 1 turn
Twin Knives (Universal) – Damage: 3 (each) – Can strike twice as one action if both hit same target
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate, likely from "Vampire Class", "Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class", or Universal lists):
Nightshade Cloak (Vampire Class) – Reduces Damage by 1, grants Stealth bonus. Shadow damage resistance
Woven Shadows (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Reduces Damage by 2, +1 to DR when resisting mind-affecting effects
Traveler’s Leathers (Universal) – +1 DV, no penalties to movement or Stealth
Sangromancer (Blood Mage Archetype)
Starting Weapon (Choose one from "Blood Mage Class" list):
Bloodstaff – Damage: 3 – Heals caster instead of damage (This is the example given in character creation )
Veinbinder Rod – Damage: 4 – Targets take 1 damage per round unless healed
Crimson Spear – Damage: 5 – Range 2 tiles; caster gains 1 HP on crit
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate from "Blood Mage Class" list):
Veinsilk Robes – Reduces Damage by 1, caster heals 1 HP after casting a Blood spell (This is the example given in character creation )
Sanguine Mantle – Reduces Damage by 2, add +1 to Blood spell damage once per round
Arterywraps – Reduces Damage by 1, cast 1 Tier 1 Blood spell as a reaction once per scene
Glyph Seeker
Starting Weapon (Choose one, likely Universal or a simple weapon if no direct list applies):
Spiritshard Wand (Universal) – Damage: 3 (Spiritual) – Ranged spiritual weapon; pass through walls within spectral realm (Requires Soul > 2)
Throwing Dagger (Universal) – Damage: 3 – Thrown (Range 8 tiles); mark target for 1 turn (If not focused on direct combat)
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate, likely from "Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class" or Universal lists):
Ritual Vestments (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Reduces Damage by 1, reduce corruption cost by 1 (min 1) for one spell per scene
Inkbound Mantle (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Reduces Damage by 1, gain +1 on Glyph rolls while worn
Traveler’s Leathers (Universal) – +1 DV, no penalties to movement or Stealth
Abyss-Ward Cloak (Universal) – +1 DV, resist 1 corruption point per session
Dreadblade
Starting Weapon (Choose one, likely from "Vampire Class", "Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class", or Universal lists):
Bloodfang Dagger (Vampire Class) – Damage: 4 – +2 damage when targeting a bleeding foe
Nightblade Saber (Vampire Class) – Damage: 5 – +1 armor penetration; silent and swift
Hexbrand (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Damage: 5 – Target gains 1 Corruption; disrupts next spell
Ritual Blade (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Damage: 4 – On crit, absorb 1 Soul Energy
Whisperknife (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Damage: 3 – Can be summoned and dismissed freely; bypasses normal wards
Twin Knives (Universal) – Damage: 3 (each) – Can strike twice as one action if both hit same target
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate, likely from "Vampire Class", "Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class", or Universal lists):
Nightshade Cloak (Vampire Class) – Reduces Damage by 1, grants Stealth bonus. Shadow damage resistance
Woven Shadows (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class) – Reduces Damage by 2, +1 to DR when resisting mind-affecting effects
Traveler’s Leathers (Universal) – +1 DV, no penalties to movement or Stealth
Warden of Balance (Sarafan Crusader Archetype)
Starting Weapon (Choose one from "Sarafan Crusader Class" list):
Sarafan Pike – Damage: 5 – Reach 2 tiles; +2 damage vs. Undead
Blessed Mace – Damage: 6 – On hit, undead must succeed DR 2 or be stunned (This is the example given in character creation for a "Sarafan")
Crusader Broadsword – Damage: 5 – +1 DV when wielded; balanced and blessed
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate from "Sarafan Crusader Class" list):
Sarafan Plate – Reduces Damage by 3, disadvantage on Stealth. Undead gain disadvantage vs. fear saves (This is the example given for a "Sarafan")
Radiant Tabard – Reduces Damage by 2, allies within 2 tiles gain +1 to Will saves
Blessed Chain Vestments – Reduces Damage by 2, caster allies gain +1 to spell saves
Hylden Warlock (Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Archetype)
Starting Weapon (Choose one from "Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class" list or Universal):
Hexbrand – Damage: 5 – Target gains 1 Corruption; disrupts next spell
Ritual Blade – Damage: 4 – On crit, absorb 1 Soul Energy
Whisperknife – Damage: 3 – Can be summoned and dismissed freely; bypasses normal wards
Spiritshard Wand (Universal) – Damage: 3 (Spiritual) – Ranged spiritual weapon; pass through walls within spectral realm (Requires Soul > 2)
Starting Armor (Choose one appropriate from "Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class" list):
Ritual Vestments – Reduces Damage by 1, reduce corruption cost by 1 (min 1) for one spell per scene
Woven Shadows – Reduces Damage by 2, +1 to DR when resisting mind-affecting effects
Inkbound Mantle – Reduces Damage by 1, gain +1 on Glyph rolls while worn

Calculating Defense Value (DV): "A character's base Defense Value (DV) represents their inherent difficulty to be hit in combat through a combination of agility, awareness, and minor innate defenses.

 Base DV = 1 + (Shadow Attribute or Will Attribute, whichever is higher).

 This is your character's starting DV before adding modifiers from armor or other sources. Record this on your character sheet."





📜 Step 7: Pick Perks
At Level 1, your character gains perks from two sources:
Class Perk: You begin with your Level 1 Perk from your chosen class's perk tree (e.g., Blood Knight's "Iron Hide," Soul Reaver's "Echo Resonance").
Universal Perk: You also select one Tier 1 Universal Perk from the Universal Perks list (e.g., "Blood for Blood," "Iron Will").

🧩 Step 8: Define Corruption and Stress
Choose a Corruption Path or Stress Type:
Corruption (Forbidden magic users, Hylden-blooded)
These affect how your character handles trauma and magical strain.

🗂 Step 9: Final Touches
Choose a Name, Appearance, and Notable Symbol.
Write 1–2 flaws or fears.
Select 1 short-term goal and 1 long-term goal.
Consult GM for any regional or campaign-specific adjustments.

You're now ready to enter Nosgoth: cursed, powerful, and hunted. Let your choices echo across realms.

























Perk Progression Guide

🎖 What Are Perks?
Perks are special character abilities that enhance gameplay, offer tactical advantages, or unlock narrative potential. They are gained as characters level up and progress through their class’s perk tree.
Characters in Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG develop by gaining both Class Perks and Universal Perks as they advance in level.
1. Class Perks:
Characters gain one Class Perk at each character level, from Level 1 through Level 20.
These perks are chosen from their specific Class Perk list, corresponding to their current character level (e.g., at Level 5, a Blood Knight selects the "Crushing Blow" perk listed as their Level 5 Class Perk).
2. Universal Perks:
In addition to their Class Perk, characters gain one Universal Perk slot at the following milestone character levels:
Level 1: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 1 Universal Perk.
Level 3: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 1 Universal Perk.
Level 5: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 1 Universal Perk.
Level 6: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 2 Universal Perk.
Level 8: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 2 Universal Perk.
Level 10: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 2 Universal Perk.
Level 11: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 3 Universal Perk.
Level 13: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 3 Universal Perk.
Level 15:Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 3 Universal Perk.
Level 16: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 4 Universal Perk.
Level 18: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 4 Universal Perk.
Level 20: Gain one slot to be filled by a Tier 4 Universal Perk.
Tier Unlock Conditions for Universal Perks:
Tier 1 Perks: Accessible at Levels 1-5.
Tier 2 Perks: Accessible at Levels 6-10. To select a Tier 2 Universal Perk for the first time, a character must have already acquired at least one Tier 1 Universal Perk. If this prerequisite is met, a character gaining a Universal Perk slot at levels 6, 8, or 10 may select a Tier 2 Universal Perk, or they may opt to select an additional Tier 1 Universal Perk.
Tier 3 Perks: Accessible at Levels 11-15. To select a Tier 3 Universal Perk for the first time, a character must have already acquired at least one Tier 2 Universal Perk. If this prerequisite is met, a character gaining a Universal Perk slot at levels 11, 13 or 15 may select a Tier 3 Universal Perk, or they may opt to select a Universal Perk from Tier 1 or Tier 2.
Tier 4 Perks: Accessible at Levels 16-20. To select a Tier 4 Universal Perk for the first time, a character must have already acquired at least one Tier 3 Universal Perk. If this prerequisite is met, a character gaining a Universal Perk slot at levels 16, 18, or 20 may select a Tier 4 Universal Perk, or they may opt to select a Universal Perk from Tier 1, Tier 2, or Tier 3. (This clarifies the "Can select 1 perk from any unlocked tier" note from the original table as flexibility in choice once a perk slot is granted and tier prerequisites are met.)
3. Human Racial Trait - Extra Perk:
Humans possess the unique trait: "Gain 1 extra perk every 4 levels".
This grants an additional Universal Perk at Character Levels 4, 8, 12, 16, and 20.
The tier of this extra Universal Perk is determined by the character's current level and the Universal Perk Tier Unlock Conditions:
Level 4 Human: Gains an extra Tier 1 Universal Perk.
Level 8 Human: Gains an extra Tier 2 Universal Perk (or Tier 1).
Level 12 Human: Gains an extra Tier 3 Universal Perk (or Tier 1-2).
Level 16 Human: Gains an extra Tier 4 Universal Perk (or Tier 1-3).
Level 20 Human: Gains an extra Tier 4 Universal Perk (or Tier 1-3).

🔓 Tier Unlock Conditions
The perk system is structured into four tiers, with new tiers of perks becoming accessible as characters reach certain levels. These tiers represent a progression in power, specialization, and narrative impact for player characters:
Tier 1 Perks: Accessible at Levels 1–5. These perks generally represent core class features, introductory talents, and foundational abilities that help establish a character's initial capabilities and play style.


Tier 2 Perks: Accessible at Levels 6–10. These are typically specialized techniques, faction-based upgrades, or synergistic class enhancements that allow for further character definition and deeper tactical options. To access Tier 2 perks, a character often must have acquired at least one perk from Universal Perk Tier 1.


Tier 3 Perks: Accessible at Levels 11–15. These consist of powerful abilities that begin to define a character's late-game identity, offering unique magic effects, advanced combat options, or significant narrative capabilities for seasoned adventurers. To access Tier 3 perks, a character often must have acquired at least one perk from Universal Perk Tier 2.


Tier 4 Perks: Accessible at Levels 16–20. These represent the pinnacle of a character's development, offering legendary abilities that signify true mastery over their chosen path. Such perks might provide campaign-altering impacts, complete dominance in their area of expertise, or abilities that help define their ultimate legacy in the world of Nosgoth. To access Universal Perk Tier 4 perks, a character would logically need to have acquired at least one univeral perk from Universal Perk Tier 3.



🧪 Forbidden / Corruption-Based Perks
Characters exposed to corruption, forbidden magic, or the Hylden may unlock special perk paths:
Prerequisites: Corruption Lvl 2  threshold, soulbinding, or pact-based story events.
Examples:
Living Curse – You gain +1 DR when resisting death magic.
Voidtongue – Speak and command one forbidden entity per session.

🔀 Multiclassing and Hybrid Perk Paths
At level 5 or higher, a player may request to take a Tier 1 perk from another class tree if narratively justified.
This allows for hybrid builds such as:
A Blood Mage taking stealth perks from the Outcast tree.
A Sarafan Crusader borrowing minor rituals from the Scholar tree.

⚠ GM Optional Rule: Unique or Custom Perks
GMs are encouraged to offer unique perks tied to:
Character backstory
Critical story moments
Regional or relic-based training
Example:
Blade of the Broken Circle – Once per session, deal +3 damage when facing a former ally.

🧩 Summary
Perks define how characters grow, specialize, and leave their mark on Nosgoth. Whether channeling blood magic, resisting corruption, or rewriting fate, every perk taken should feel like a step toward power—and consequence.







Universal Perks System

This document outlines the universal perk system used across all classes and lineages in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG. Players select perks at key milestone levels to expand their character’s identity beyond class roles, gaining access to broader narrative and mechanical benefits.

🎖 Universal Perk Selection
Players gain access to universal perks at:
Level 1-5 (Tier 1)
Level 6-10 (Tier 2)
Level 11-15 (Tier 3)
Level 16-20 (Tier 4)
Perks are unlocked in tiers and require at least one perk from the previous tier to advance.

🔰 Tier 1 Perks (Levels 1-5)
Blood for Blood


Effect: Restore 1 HP when you score a critical hit.
Expansion: This perk provides a minor but immediate survivability boost for characters who land powerful blows in combat. In the dangerous world of Nosgoth, any amount of self-healing can be valuable, rewarding offensive success with a bit of resilience, which could be especially useful for frontline combatants.
Echo Sense


Effect: Detect hidden or invisible entities within 10 ft.
Expansion: Given Nosgoth's nature, with its Spectral Realm and creatures that might employ stealth (like Shadowmancers or Wraiths ), this perk offers a crucial early warning system. It enhances a character's awareness, potentially preventing ambushes or revealing unseen threats common in such a treacherous setting.
Iron Will


Effect: Reroll one failed Sanity save per scene.
Expansion: Sanity loss is a significant risk in Nosgoth, especially when dealing with Forbidden Spells, Corruption, or horrific entities like those from the Hylden. This perk provides a crucial lifeline, offering a second chance to resist mental strain and the madness that often accompanies power or terror in this world.
Glyph Mastery


Effect: Use glyphs even without class proficiency.
Expansion: Glyphs are a key part of Nosgoth's magic, used for traps and wards. This perk opens up tactical options for characters not inherently skilled in Glyphcasting (a primary skill for Glyph Seekers ), allowing them to interact with or perhaps even utilize simpler environmental glyphs they might encounter.
Shadow’s Edge


Effect: +1 to rolls made while in dim light or darkness.
Expansion: Nosgoth is a dark, gothic realm, meaning dim light and darkness are common conditions. This perk gives a tangible advantage to characters operating in these shadowed environments, benefiting stealthy approaches, ambushes, or any action taken where light is scarce.
Spirit Bond


Effect: Once long rest, commune with a ghost for insight.
Expansion: The Spectral Realm and its inhabitants (spirits, wraiths ) play a significant role in Nosgoth. This perk allows a character to directly seek information from these entities, potentially uncovering secrets, gaining warnings, or understanding past events in a world haunted by echoes.
Battle Meditation


Effect: Regain 1 HP after combat if no Sanity was lost.
Expansion: This perk rewards characters who can maintain their composure and avoid mental trauma during stressful combat encounters. It provides a small measure of recovery, encouraging tactical play that minimizes exposure to horrifying or corrupting elements, which are prevalent threats.
Tombborn


Effect: You may sense undead or cursed ground.
Expansion: Undead creatures and cursed locations are common dangers in a world like Nosgoth, heavily influenced by vampirism and cyclical destruction. This perk acts as an early warning system, allowing characters to better prepare for or avoid such blighted areas and their inhabitants.
Focused Ritualist


Effect: Gain +1 to glyphcasting if uninjured.
Expansion: For characters who dabble in or specialize in glyphs, this perk rewards careful positioning and avoiding damage. It enhances the effectiveness of their glyph-related actions when they can maintain a state of readiness, crucial for a magic system that involves precise inscription.
Death Watcher


Effect: Detect when an enemy drops below 25% HP.
Expansion: Knowing when a foe is critically wounded can be a significant tactical advantage, allowing a character or party to focus fire, attempt a finishing blow (like the Dreadblade's Death's Whisper perk), or assess threats more accurately in the brutal combat scenarios of Nosgoth.



⚔ Tier 2 Perks (Levels 6-10 )
Requires one Tier 1 universal perk.
Momentum Kill


Effect: Gain bonus movement after a kill.
Expansion: This perk rewards characters who can decisively eliminate foes, granting them tactical repositioning to either press the attack against remaining enemies or secure a more advantageous position. In a world where combat can be frequent and deadly, maintaining the initiative through such momentum can be crucial.
Phase Slip


Effect: Ignore difficult terrain in Spectral Realm.
Expansion: For characters who can access or are forced into the Spectral Realm (like Wraiths or Soul Reavers ), this perk significantly enhances their mobility. The Spectral Realm is described as having distorted physics and warped time, so navigating it efficiently is a key advantage.
Sanity Tap


Effect: Spend 1 Sanity to add +2 to a roll.
Expansion: This perk offers a high-risk, high-reward option, embodying the theme of power having a price. In critical moments, a character can channel their mental fortitude or perhaps touch upon dangerous insights to significantly boost their chance of success on any given roll, at the cost of their mental well-being – a common peril in Nosgoth.
Void Walker


Effect: Immune to corrupted terrain hazards.
Expansion: Nosgoth is a fractured world rife with corruption, which can manifest as hazardous terrain. This perk allows characters to traverse such blighted areas unscathed, invaluable for exploring ancient ruins or confronting sources of decay without succumbing to their environmental toll.
Time Echo


Effect: Re-roll one Initiative roll per scene.
Expansion: Initiative determines the order of action in combat, which can be critical. This perk allows a character to manipulate this crucial aspect once per scene, potentially turning a poor initiative roll into a much better one, reflecting the themes of time manipulation and defying predetermined outcomes present in Nosgoth.
Soul Ward


Effect: Once long rest, absorb one source of damage.
Expansion: This provides a potent defensive measure, allowing a character to completely negate a single damaging attack or effect once long rest. In a world with powerful foes and devastating abilities, this can be a life-saving tool, representing a powerful personal ward against harm.
Spell Siphon


Effect: Steal 1 spell or ability from a foe once long rest.
Expansion: This remarkable perk allows a character to temporarily acquire an enemy's magical capability, offering incredible versatility and a way to turn an opponent's strength against them. It speaks to the volatile and often stolen nature of power in Nosgoth.
Spectral Fortitude


Effect: Gain +2 Defense in Spectral Realm.
Expansion: For characters who frequently operate or fight within the Spectral Realm, this perk significantly boosts their survivability by making them harder to hit in that specific plane of existence, where different rules and dangers apply.
Blood Alchemy


Effect: Convert HP into temporary Soul Energy.
Expansion: This perk allows characters to sacrifice their physical vitality (HP) for magical power (Soul Energy), reflecting the often costly nature of magic and the interconnectedness of life force and spiritual essence. It's particularly useful for casters needing a quick SE boost in a pinch.
Shadow Link


Effect: Teleport to a shadow within 10 ft as a bonus action.
Expansion: Granting short-range teleportation via shadows as a quick action provides significant tactical mobility. This is invaluable for stealthy characters like Shadowmancers or any character wishing to quickly reposition, engage, or disengage in Nosgoth's often dimly lit environments.


🕯 Tier 3 Perks (Levels 11-15)
Requires one Tier 2 universal perk.


Ascended Form – Transform once per act into a powerful avatar.
Chrono Clarity – Cannot be surprised; always act first.
Deathmark – Mark one target; deal +2 damage to them.
Voice of Fate – Ask a question about the future once per session.
Blood Vow – Regain full HP upon killing a marked target.
Spectral Reign – Become invisible in Spectral Realm once per scene.
Timelocked – You are unaffected by time-slowing effects.
Soul Burn – Deal bonus damage based on missing Soul Energy.
Master of Glyphs – You may inscribe permanent glyphs.
Legacy of Power – Gain a once-per-campaign ability tailored to your lineage.


🔹 Tier 4 Universal Perks (Levels 16 - 20)
	Require 1 Universal Tier 3 Perk
Power earned through blood, ruin, and the defiance of destiny. These perks are rare, mythic, and often whispered of in prophecy or madness. Only the most legendary figures of Nosgoth may claim them.

🧿 Cyclebreaker’s Defiance
Prerequisite: None
 Effect: Once per long rest, when you would be reduced to 0 HP, irreversibly corrupted, banished, or erased from existence, you may instead declare defiance. You are restored to 1 HP, all Corruption is cleansed, and you may immediately take a full turn (outside the normal initiative order). This breaks natural laws; you gain 1 permanent Corruption afterward.
 Narrative Hook: You have slipped the Wheel’s noose—again. Something noticed.

⏳ Paradox Strike
Prerequisite: Must possess a time-, soul-, or phase-based ability
 Effect: Once per scene, when you hit with a melee or ranged attack, the wound echoes through time. At the start of the target’s next turn, they suffer the same damage again. This repeated damage bypasses resistances but not immunities.
 Narrative Hook: You do not simply strike flesh—you strike the past.

🌘 Spectral Anchor
Effect: You are now permanently tethered to the Spectral Realm.
You always perceive the Spectral Realm and entities within it.


You gain resistance to all Soul damage.


You cannot be forcibly moved by non-magical effects unless you allow it.
 Narrative Hook: You stand in two worlds. Neither can claim you fully.



🩸 Legacy Transfusion
Effect: Choose one Tier 2 or 3 Perk from any other class or lineage. You gain its effects permanently, including passives. This perk may be taken a second time, but the second choice must come from a different source.
 Narrative Hook: You have stolen from another fate, another soul, another god.

👁️ Veilpiercer
Effect: You may always perceive the false and hidden.
Illusions, glamers, and spectral veils are revealed to you.


Once per scene, you may declare Veilpierced! to nullify a magical disguise, lie, or illusion within sight.


Gain +2 dice when interacting with prophecy, deceit, or phantoms.
 Narrative Hook: The threads of lies break when you pass.



🌀 Temporal Residue
Effect: When you take damage from any source, you leave behind a temporal echo in that space. This echo lasts 1 round.
50% of attacks targeting you may hit the echo instead.


The echo may mimic simple actions (move, speak, attack—but only visually).
 Only one echo may exist at a time.
 Narrative Hook: Time remembers you—badly.



🦴 Flesh of Myth
Effect: Your body has transcended the boundaries of mortality.
+1 maximum HP per level.


Immunity to poison, disease, aging, petrification, and dismemberment.


You may still be slain—but not easily, nor cleanly.
 Narrative Hook: You are not legend. You are what legends fear.



🔥 Soulfire Conversion
Effect: Once per rest, as a Bonus Action, you may convert your physical vitality into raw power. You may burn HP (in multiples of 3) to gain 1 point of:
Soul Energy


Blood


Glyph Charges
 (Maximum conversion: Your Level in HP / 3).
 Narrative Hook: Pain is just the coin you pay for power.



🕯️ Cradle of Ruin
Effect: When reduced to 0 HP, unleash a pulse of devastation.
All enemies within 20 ft take 4d6 damage (Soul or Physical; you choose).


Allies in the area gain +2 DR and +1 die on all rolls until the end of their next turn.


At the start of your next turn, rise with 1 HP.
 Narrative Hook: You die like a god—and rise like a curse.



✧ Reality Fracture
Effect: Once per session, you may describe an impossible act: walking through unbroken time, halting a death mid-scream, crossing space in a blink. This Reality Fracture must:
Be narratively powerful but not permanently game-breaking.


Not grant permanent resources or negate entire plot arcs.


Be resolved creatively by the GM.
 Narrative Hook: You do not bend rules. You leave them shattered.







🧪 Corrupted Perks (Unlocked via narrative triggers or corruption threshold)
What is a Corruption Threshold?
A corruption threshold is a measure of how far a character has fallen into dark magic, forbidden knowledge, or unnatural transformation. It can be represented by a corruption score, number of corruption dice, or key narrative events. As your corruption increases, more powerful perks become available—but so do the risks to your mind, body, and soul. Every game session you must get through a pool of corruption dice = 2x your corruption level. If you wish to push your roll, you will need to roll your corruption lvl /3 rounded up die per push. 
Social Reactions: NPCs, particularly those aligned with order, faith, or purity (like Sarafan or devout humans), might react more negatively to characters with visible signs of corruption or a palpable aura of taint, leading to social penalties or mistrust. Conversely, certain dark entities or factions might show increased interest or offer unique opportunities.
Environmental Interaction: Heavily corrupted characters might find themselves subtly influencing their immediate environment in minor, unsettling ways (e.g., lights dimming, shadows deepening, animals becoming agitated). Conversely, they might find themselves weakened or pained in areas of strong purity or sanctification.

Corruption Level
State
Effect
1–3
Touched by corruption
Roleplay cues begin; no perks yet
3–6
Marked by corruption
Tier 1 Corrupted Perks become available. Must roll corruption lvl x2 Dice per game session


7–10
Deeply corrupted
Tier 2 Corrupted Perks unlocked.  Must roll corruption lvl x2 Dice per game session
11–15
Abyss-bound
Tier 3 Corrupted Perks unlocked.  Must roll corruption lvl x2 Dice per game session



Ways to Purify Corruption

1. Rituals of Purification:
These are demanding, often ancient, and perilous rites that directly confront and attempt to expel corrupting influences from a character's soul or body. Success is not guaranteed and failure can be costly.
Mechanics & Requirements:
Discovery: The knowledge of such rituals would be rare, possibly found in forgotten lore, learned from a unique NPC (like an ancient vampire who regrets their fall, a secluded Oracle-Blooded, or a Warden of Balance with access to old rites), or pieced together from fragmented texts.
Components: Rituals would require specific, often rare and difficult-to-obtain material components. Examples:
Tears of a repentant innocent.
Untainted blood from a creature of pure lineage.
A heartwood branch from an ancient, uncorrupted tree.
Dust from a Pillar of Nosgoth (or a fragment).
Specially inscribed glyphs or consecrated items.
Location: Many rituals might need to be performed at a specific type of location, such as a restored holy site, a natural place of power untouched by corruption, or even a dangerously balanced point between the Material and Spectral Realms.
Casting & Skill Checks: The ritual would likely take significant in-game time to perform (hours or even days). It would involve one or more difficult skill checks, typically using Soul + Rituals, Will + Concentration, or perhaps Will + Forbidden Knowledge if attempting to use a controlled form of counter-corruption. The Difficulty Rating (DR) should be high (e.g., DR 3 or 4, or even involve multiple escalating checks).
Cost & Risk:
The ritual might consume valuable resources or have a direct cost in Soul Energy, Blood Points, or even temporary HP/Attribute reduction for the caster or the subject.
Failure could lead to backlash: increasing Corruption instead, attracting hostile entities (spectral or demonic), inflicting Sanity damage, or causing a temporary physical or magical affliction.
Critical failure might have even more severe narrative consequences.
Narrative Integration:
The quest to find the ritual's components, location, or knowledge can form an entire story arc.
The ritual itself can be a tense, dramatic scene, possibly requiring other party members to defend the caster or participant.
The outcome might not be a complete cleansing but a reduction, or the character might gain a new understanding or a minor boon related to their struggle.
2. Acts of Atonement or Defiance:
This method ties Corruption reduction to significant narrative choices and character development, where a character actively works against the nature of their corruption or the forces that caused it.
Mechanics & Requirements:
Significant Narrative Acts: These are not minor good deeds but substantial, often perilous actions that clearly demonstrate a change of heart or a direct challenge to the source of corruption. Examples:
A vampire who gained Corruption through ruthless feeding might undertake a quest to protect a human settlement from other predators, risking starvation or reprisal from their own kind.
A Hylden Warlock might destroy a powerful Hylden artifact they were meant to use, severing a tie to their corrupting heritage.
A character corrupted by forbidden magic could expose and dismantle a cult that propagates those same dark arts.
GM Adjudication: The GM determines what constitutes a truly significant act worthy of reducing Corruption. It should be genuinely challenging and reflect a core aspect of the character's internal struggle.
No Direct Roll (Usually): The act itself is the "cost." However, the success of the act might involve various skill checks throughout the related quest. The Corruption reduction is a reward for the narrative achievement.
Narrative Integration:
These acts should be deeply personal to the character's story and their specific type of corruption.
They provide powerful roleplaying opportunities and can lead to significant character growth.
The reduction in Corruption might be gradual, tied to completing stages of a larger redemptive arc, or a significant one-time reduction after a climactic act of defiance.
Such acts might also have social consequences – former allies might become enemies, or vice versa.
3. Seeking Aid from Unique NPCs or Entities:
Nosgoth is filled with ancient and powerful beings. Some might possess the knowledge or ability to cleanse or mitigate Corruption, though their aid will rarely come without a price.
Mechanics & Requirements:
Identifying Potential Aid: Characters would need to learn of these entities through research (History, Forbidden Knowledge ), rumors, or direct encounters. Examples:
An ancient, reclusive vampire who found a path to resist the worst of the curse.
A powerful Warden of Balance dedicated to cleansing Nosgoth's taints.
A mysterious Oracle-Blooded with unique insight into spiritual afflictions.
Even a powerful, neutral spectral entity or a lesser cosmic being with its own agenda.
The Price of Aid: The entity will likely demand a significant service, a rare artifact, a binding oath, or a sacrifice in return for their help. This forms the basis of a new quest or obligation.
Process of Cleansing: The method of cleansing would depend on the entity. It could involve a unique ritual they perform, a trial the character must undergo, the imbibing of a rare potion, or a direct transference of power/corruption. This might involve skill checks for the character to endure the process or for the NPC to succeed.
Narrative Integration:
Finding and convincing such an entity to help can be a major undertaking.
The service or price demanded can lead to further adventures and moral quandaries.
The cleansing might not be total or might come with unforeseen side effects or new responsibilities. For instance, being cleansed by a Warden might indebt the character to the cause of Balance.
4. Downtime Activities & Focused Contemplation:
This method offers a slower, more introspective path to resisting or slightly reducing Corruption, suitable for periods of relative safety or between major adventures.
Mechanics & Requirements:
Significant Downtime: This requires a substantial period of uninterrupted downtime (e.g., weeks or even months in-game) where the character can dedicate themselves to specific practices.
Activities:
Focused Meditation & Willpower Training: The character engages in intense mental discipline to strengthen their will against corrupting influences. This could involve a series of Will + Concentration checks over the downtime period, with cumulative successes leading to a small reduction in Corruption Score.
Spiritual Cleansing Practices: For characters with a connection to purer spiritual paths (e.g., some Wardens, Oracle-Blooded, or those seeking redemption), this could involve prolonged prayer, fasting, adherence to strict codes of conduct, or seeking solace in untainted natural environments. This might involve Soul + Religion or Will + Nature checks.
Study & Counter-Knowledge: A character might spend downtime researching the nature of their corruption through Forbidden Knowledge or History checks, seeking to understand and thereby gain mastery over its lesser manifestations. This might not reduce the score directly but could grant a temporary bonus to resist specific corruption effects or unlock a minor Corrupted Perk that offers more control.
Limited Effect: This method would generally result in minor reductions to Corruption Score or an increased ability to resist its effects, rather than complete cleansing. It represents a character's personal struggle to maintain their integrity.
Narrative Integration:
This method emphasizes the internal struggle against corruption.
It can be used to reflect a character's ongoing efforts between major story arcs.
The GM can introduce small narrative vignettes during downtime to reflect the character's efforts and the subtle pushback from their inner demons or external corrupting forces.
Success might grant the character new insights or resolve related to their fight against corruption.



🩸 Tier 1 Corrupted Perks
Whispers in the Vein – You gain +1 to Rituals or Forbidden Knowledge rolls when near cursed objects.
Seeping Hunger – Once per scene, absorb 1 HP when near a dying creature.
Flesh-Warp Instinct – Gain +1 Evasion when below half HP.
Bonebite Grin – You gain a terrifying grin; enemies who see you must succeed a DR 2 Will save or be Shaken.
Whispered Insight
Effect (Passive): You hear faint whispers from the Spectral Realm or Hylden echoes, granting you +1 die on Insight or Forbidden Knowledge checks when discerning hidden motives or arcane secrets.


Drawback: The whispers are distracting; you suffer a -1 die penalty on Concentration checks when in bright light or holy ground, as the voices grow agitated.


Narrative Flavor: Your mind brushes against forbidden truths, as if an unseen entity murmurs secrets just beyond comprehension. Your eyes occasionally flicker with an unnatural glint, unnerving allies. GMs may use this to feed cryptic clues or sow paranoia, hinting at the Elder God’s influence.
Tainted Vitality
Effect (Reactive): Once per scene, when you take physical damage that would reduce you to 0 HP, you can instead reduce the damage by 2 and remain at 1 HP. This triggers automatically but costs 1 sanity damage.


Drawback: Your body begins to show signs of corruption (e.g., blackened veins or ashen skin), imposing a -1 die penalty on Persuasion checks with uncorrupted NPCs (e.g., Sarafan or Nomads).


Narrative Flavor: The taint within you refuses to let you fall, knitting your flesh with unnatural resilience. Allies may question your humanity, and you feel a growing hunger for blood or souls. This perk ties into the vampire and revenant themes of defying death but at a cost.
Abyssal Reflex
Effect (Active): As a Bonus Action, once per short rest, you can add +1 success to an Evasion check against a single attack or hazard. This costs 1 Soul Energy (SE).


Drawback: Using this perk leaves you momentarily disoriented by visions of the Abyss; your next attack roll or skill check before the end of your next turn suffers a -1 die penalty.


Narrative Flavor: You tap into the chaotic energies of the Abyss, moving with unnatural speed. Your movements occasionally seem jerky or disjointed, as if pulled by unseen strings. GMs can describe fleeting glimpses of the Hylden’s banished realm, deepening your character’s connection to corruption.
Bloodstained Sight
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per scene, you can focus on a bloodsoaked terrain or a bleeding creature within 30 feet (6 squares) to gain +1 die on Observation checks for 1 minute, revealing hidden enemies or spectral traces.


Drawback: After using this ability, you become fixated on blood; you must succeed on a DR 2 Will save to avoid attacking or feeding on the nearest bleeding creature (ally or foe) on your next turn. Failure imposes a -1 die penalty on non-attack actions for that turn.


Narrative Flavor: Your senses sharpen, drawn to the pulse of life in blood, but it awakens a primal urge. Your pupils dilate unnaturally, and you may lick your lips involuntarily. This perk suits vampires or Sangromancers, emphasizing their bloodlust while offering utility.
Spectral Whisper
Effect (Passive): You gain +1 die on Stealth checks in the Spectral Realm or areas of obscuring terrain (e.g., mist, darkness). Additionally, you can faintly perceive spectral entities within 15 feet (3 squares) without a skill check, though details require an Observation roll.


Drawback: The Spectral Realm’s influence frays your sanity; you gain 1 sanity damage whenever you enter or remain in the Spectral Realm for more than 1 minute per scene.


Narrative Flavor: The veil between realms thins for you, allowing you to move like a ghost but at the cost of your mental stability. You may hear faint, mocking laughter or see shadowy figures in your peripheral vision. This perk aligns with Wraith or Shadowmancer themes, enhancing their stealth while tying to Sanity mechanics.
Corrupted Surge
Effect (Active): Once per short rest, as a Bonus Action, you can expend 1 Corruption Point (if your system tracks them explicitly) or take 1 sanity damage to add +2 damage to your next successful weapon or spell attack this turn.


Drawback: After using this ability, your connection to Nosgoth’s balance weakens; you suffer a -1 die penalty on saves against Radiant or holy effects until you complete a short rest.


Narrative Flavor: You channel the raw, chaotic energy of corruption into a devastating strike, your weapon or spell glowing with an eerie, sickly hue. Your body trembles afterward, and you feel a lingering coldness, as if the Pillars themselves reject you. This perk offers a high-risk, high-reward option for any class, especially those flirting with forbidden power.
🧠 Tier 2 Corrupted Perks
Aberrant Surge – When you spend Soul Energy, regain 1 HP or remove 1 stress.
Corruption Echo – Once per session, repeat the effect of the last spell cast.
Host to the Void – Gain immunity to mind control but take 1 corruption per long rest.
Blood Memory – Absorb one trait or ability from a corpse you’ve consumed within the last hour.
Veil of the Damned
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per short rest, you summon a 10-foot (2 squares) radius cloud of spectral mist centered on yourself, lasting 1 minute. The area is lightly obscured, granting +1 die to your Stealth checks and imposing a -1 die penalty on enemies’ Observation checks within or targeting the area. You can see normally within the mist. Costs 1 Soul Energy (SE) and 1 sanity damage.
Drawback: The mist clings to you unnaturally; until your next short rest, you suffer a -1 die penalty on saves against Radiant or holy effects, as the mist marks you as tainted.
Narrative Flavor: You call forth a shroud of souls from the Spectral Realm, their whispers cloaking you in shadow. Your skin takes on a pallid, corpse-like hue, and allies may hear faint cries emanating from you. GMs can use this to hint at the Elder God’s awareness or attract spectral entities.
Hunger’s Blade
Effect (Passive): When you deal damage with a melee weapon attack to a living creature with blood, you regain 2 HP, up to once per turn. If the target is bleeding (e.g., from a Sangromancer’s Hemorrhage), the healing increases to 4 HP.
Drawback: Your hunger intensifies; you must succeed on a DR 2 Will save each scene to avoid attacking or feeding on a bleeding ally within 10 feet (2 squares). Failure imposes a -1 die penalty on non-attack actions for 1 round.
Narrative Flavor: Your weapon pulses with a sickly red glow, drinking deeply from your foes. Your fangs lengthen, and your eyes glint with predatory need, alarming even your allies. This perk suits vampires or Sangromancers, amplifying their bloodlust while offering sustain.
Hylden’s Grasp
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per scene, you conjure a glyph of Hylden energy at a point within 30 feet (6 squares). Enemies within a 5-foot (1 square) radius must make a DR 2 Might or Evasion save (their choice). On a failure, they are Rooted for 1 round and take 2 Corruption damage. Costs 2 Soul Energy.
Drawback: Using this ability adds 1 Corruption Point to your total, and you suffer 1 sanity damage as Hylden whispers invade your mind.
Narrative Flavor: You channel the banished Hylden’s entropy, your hands glowing with sickly green sigils. Your voice occasionally carries an alien timbre, and you dream of a desolate, glyph-scarred wasteland. GMs may use this to foreshadow Hylden incursions or faction suspicion.
Soul Leech
Effect (Active): As a Bonus Action, once per short rest, you can target a creature within 15 feet (3 squares) that you’ve damaged this turn. They must make a DR 2 Will save or take 3 Soul damage (bypassing physical Armor), and you regain 1 Soul Energy (SE).
Drawback: Your soul becomes tainted; until your next long rest, any healing you receive from non-corrupted sources (e.g., holy magic or Balance Wardens) is reduced by 2 HP.
Narrative Flavor: You siphon a fragment of your foe’s essence, your eyes glowing with stolen light. Your shadow flickers unnaturally, as if alive, and you feel a gnawing emptiness within. This perk aligns with Soul Reavers or Hylden Warlocks, emphasizing soul manipulation.
Abyssal Echo
Effect (Reactive): Once per scene, when you fail a saving throw against a spell or magical effect, you can use your Reaction to reroll the save with +1 die. If you succeed, the caster takes 2 Void damage (bypassing all Armor and resistances). Costs 1 sanity damage.
Drawback: The Abyss’s touch lingers; you suffer a -1 die penalty on Insight checks until your next short rest, as reality feels distorted.
Narrative Flavor: You deflect magic with a ripple of void energy, your form briefly glitching like a broken tapestry. Your reflection shows a stranger’s face, and you hear faint, mocking laughter. This perk suits Unbound or Hylden characters, tying to their resistance to fate.
Corrupted Ferocity
Effect (Active): As a Bonus Action, once per short rest, you can enter a frenzied state for 1 minute. Your melee attacks deal +3 damage, but you take 1 physical damage(bypassing Armor) each time you attack. Costs 1 Corruption Point or 2 sanity damage.
Drawback: After the frenzy ends, you’re exhausted, suffering a -1 die penalty on all Might and Evasion checks until you complete a short rest.
Narrative Flavor: You unleash a torrent of corrupted rage, your body sprouting jagged, bone-like protrusions. Your laughter grows unhinged, and allies may fear you’re losing control. This perk fits Blood Knights or Turelim, enhancing their combat prowess at a steep cost.
🔥 Tier 3 Corrupted Perks
Embodiment of Decay – Your presence wilts plants and rusts weapons; enemies in 1-tile radius suffer -1 to all attack rolls.
Eternal Host – You cannot be permanently killed while your corruption is 6 or higher; rise again at 1 HP after 1 round.
Eye of the Abyss – Once per session, ask a question and receive a disturbing but truthful vision.
The Rot Within – When you are critically hit, the attacker takes 2 soul damage.
Soulrend Dominion
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per long rest, you unleash a wave of soul-devouring energy in a 15-foot (3 squares) radius centered on yourself. Enemies in the area must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failure, they take 6 Soul damage (bypassing physical Armor) and are Frightened for 1 minute (repeat save at end of each turn). On a success, they take 3 Soul damage. You regain 1 Soul Energy (SE) per affected enemy. Costs 3 SE and 2 sanity damage.
Drawback: Your soul frays; you gain 1 Corruption Point, and until your next long rest, you suffer a -2 die penalty on saves against Radiant or holy effects. Additionally, spectral entities are drawn to you, increasing the chance of hostile encounters (GM discretion).
Narrative Flavor: You tear at the essence of your foes, your form wreathed in spectral fire. Your eyes burn with an unnatural void, and your voice echoes with a chorus of trapped souls. Allies may fear you’re becoming a conduit for the Elder God. GMs can use this to introduce spectral pursuers or visions of the Wheel of Fate.
Bloodforged Apotheosis
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per short rest, you transform into a blood-wrought avatar for 1 minute. Your melee attacks deal +4 damage (Blood damage, bypassing physical Armor), and you gain 5 Temporary HP at the start of each of your turns. Costs 2 Blood Points (BP) and 1 Corruption Point.
Drawback: Your body warps permanently (e.g., crimson veins pulse visibly, or bone spurs protrude); you suffer a -2 die penalty on Persuasion checks with uncorrupted NPCs (e.g., Sarafan, Nomads). After the effect ends, you take 4 physical damage (bypassing Armor) from overexertion.
Narrative Flavor: Your blood boils, reshaping you into a living weapon. Your laughter is guttural, and your presence terrifies mortals. This perk suits vampires or Sangromancers, amplifying their bloodlust but marking them as monstrous. GMs may have factions hunt you as a threat.
Hylden’s Rift
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per long rest, you tear open a rift to the Hylden’s banished dimension at a point within 60 feet (12 squares), creating a 10-foot (2 squares) radius zone of chaotic energy for 1 minute. Enemies entering or starting their turn in the zone take 4 Void damage (bypassing all Armor and resistances) and must make a DR 3 Might save or be slowed (half speed) for 1 round. Costs 4 SE and 3 sanity damage.
Drawback: The rift destabilizes you; you gain 2 Corruption Points, and your maximum HP is reduced by 5 until you complete a long rest. The rift may attract Hylden attention, potentially summoning a minor Hylden entity (GM discretion).
Narrative Flavor: You channel the Hylden’s entropy, your hands glowing with otherworldly sigils. Your dreams are plagued by visions of a shattered realm, and your shadow writhes independently. This perk aligns with Hylden Warlocks, risking cosmic consequences for immense power.
Abyssal Pact
Effect (Active): As a Bonus Action, once per scene, you can sacrifice 5 HP to gain +2 dice on all attack rolls, skill checks, and saves for 1 minute. If you reduce an enemy to 0 HP during this time, you regain 3 HP and 1 SE. 
Drawback: The pact binds you to the Abyss; you gain 1 Corruption Point each time you use this ability, and until your next short rest, you suffer a -1 die penalty on Insight and Concentration checks as abyssal whispers cloud your mind.
Narrative Flavor: You offer your vitality to an unseen force, your wounds weeping black ichor. Your movements are unnaturally fluid, but your gaze grows distant, as if listening to a voice only you hear. This perk suits Blood Knights or Unbound, offering versatility at a steep cost. GMs can hint at an abyssal entity taking interest.
Wraith’s Lament
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per short rest, you emit a keening wail that affects all enemies within 30 feet (6 squares). Targets must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failure, they take 5 Soul damage (bypassing physical Armor) and cannot take Reactions until the end of their next turn. On a success, they take 2 Soul damage. Costs 2 SE and 2 sanity damage.
Drawback: Your connection to the Spectral Realm deepens; you gain 1 Corruption Point, and you suffer 1 sanity damage whenever you enter or remain in the Spectral Realm for more than 1 minute per scene until your next long rest.
Narrative Flavor: Your wail echoes with the sorrow of lost souls, your form flickering like a dying flame. Your touch grows cold, and mirrors show a gaunt, spectral version of you. This perk fits Wraiths or Shadowmancers, enhancing their spectral prowess but binding them to the Spectral Realm’s torment.
Corrupted Ascension
Effect (Active): As an Action, once per long rest, you ascend into a corrupted state for 1 minute. You gain a fly speed equal to your movement speed, your attacks deal +3 Corruption damage (bypassing physical Armor), and you ignore difficult terrain. Costs 3 BP or 3 SE and 2 Corruption Points.
Drawback: Your body mutates (e.g., wings of shadow, glowing veins); you suffer a -2 die penalty on all social skill checks with non-corrupted NPCs permanently. After the effect ends, you’re exhausted, suffering a -2 die penalty on all Might and Evasion checks until you complete a long rest.
Narrative Flavor: You rise on currents of corrupted energy, your form a blasphemy against Nosgoth’s balance. Your voice carries an otherworldly resonance, and the Pillars seem to shudder in your presence. This perk suits any class, offering mobility and offense but marking you as an outcast. GMs may have the Sarafan or Balance Wardens target you.


Spellcasting in Nosgoth
Magic in Nosgoth is a volatile fusion of soul force, elemental essence, and corrupted power. It is a tool and a curse, capable of shaping reality but often demanding a steep price. Characters cast spells through skill checks, using their attributes and training in various magical disciplines.
I. Spell Categories and Tiers
Spells are broadly divided into four main categories:
Glyph Spells: Fast-castable arcane inscriptions with battlefield or utility effects, often used for traps and wards.
Blood Spells: Fueled by vitae (blood) and sacrifice; often risky but potent, manipulating life force.
Ritual Spells: Longer-form invocations with lasting or narrative-altering effects, such as summoning spirits or consecrating land.
Forbidden Spells: Reality-warping powers born of entropy, madness, or ancient Hylden knowledge, often carrying the risk of Corruption.
Spells are further broken into four power tiers based on character level and complexity:
Initiate Tier: Levels 1–5
Adept Tier: Levels 6–10
Expert Tier: Levels 11–15
Master Tier: Level 16-20
II. Spellcasting Basics
Action to Cast: Casting a spell typically requires an Action, Bonus Action, or Reaction, as specified in the spell's description.
Concentration:
Some spells require ongoing concentration to maintain their effects. A caster may only concentrate on one spell at a time. If concentration on a new spell begins, any previous spell being concentrated on ends.
If a character concentrating on a spell takes damage, they must make a Concentration check to maintain the spell. The dice pool for this check is the caster's Will attribute + their Concentration skill rank.
"The Difficulty Rating (DR) for a saving throw against a spell or ability is listed in its description. Common DRs often correlate with spell tiers: Initiate Tier spells frequently use DR 1 or 2, Adept Tier DR 2 or 3, Expert Tier DR 3 or 4, and Master Tier DR 4 or higher. Some specific abilities or heightened castings might adjust these DRs."
Concentration can also be broken by being incapacitated, or by choosing to end it (which usually does not require an action).
Components: Most spells have Somatic (S - gestures), Verbal (V - incantations), and/or Material (M - physical ingredients or foci) components. Unless a spell, trait, or item states otherwise, a spellcaster must typically have at least one hand free for Somatic components and be able to speak clearly for Verbal components. Specific Material components are consumed unless the spell says otherwise.
Range and Targeting: Spells specify their range and what they can target (creatures, objects, areas, self). Most spells require line of sight to the target or point of origin, though some (especially Forbidden spells or those manipulating shadows/dimensions) may have exceptions.
Line of Effect: Generally, there must be a clear path to the target for a spell to take effect. Obstructions like total cover can block many spells.
III. The Spellcasting Process
Choose the Spell: Select a spell from your character's known or prepared list. Review its type, casting time, cost, range, duration, components, and any special requirements.


Determine Spell Type & Required Roll:


Core Dice Mechanic: All skill checks, including spellcasting rolls and saving throws, use a D6 dice pool system. Players roll a number of dice equal to their relevant Attribute + Skill rank. Each die that rolls a 5 or 6 counts as one success.
Attack Spells: These spells require the caster to make a spell attack roll against the target's Defense Value (DV).
Roll: [Caster's Appropriate Attribute] + [Relevant Spellcasting Skill (e.g., Soul + Rituals for a Sanguine Dart, Will + Glyphcasting for an offensive glyph)].
A hit is achieved if the number of successes meets or exceeds the target's DV.
Save-Based Spells: These spells require the target(s) to make a saving throw to resist or lessen the spell's effects.
Roll: Target rolls [Their Appropriate Attribute] + [Their Relevant Skill (e.g., Will + Concentration against mental effects, Shadow + Evasion against area effects, Fury + Concentration against physical binding effects)] vs. the Spell's Difficulty Rating (DR).
The spell's description will specify the attribute for the save and the consequences of success or failure.
Spell DR: The DR for a save-based spell is often listed in its description. If not, or for newly designed spells, the GM can set it based on its power and the caster's proficiency. General guidelines:
DR 1 (Trivial/Weak): Basic effects, minor cantrips.
DR 2 (Challenging/Moderate): Most standard offensive or control spells from competent casters (e.g., caster's magic skill + attribute pool of 4-5).
DR 3 (Dangerous/Strong): High-tier magic, potent crowd control, or spells boosted by significant power.
DR 4+ (Severe/Epic): Forbidden magic, ancient rituals, effects from powerful entities.
Utility/Ritual Spells: These spells often produce non-combat, narrative, or long-term effects. They might require a caster skill check (e.g., [Soul/Will] + [Rituals skill]) against a DR set by the GM based on the complexity or circumstances, or they may simply take effect as described if the casting time and components are met.
Forbidden Spells: These potent and dangerous spells often bypass traditional defenses by forcing a difficult saving throw on the target (typically DR 3-4 or higher). The caster may also use (or be forced to use) Corruption Dice to cast or enhance them.
Spend Resources:


Most spells require the expenditure of a magical resource. The primary types are:
Blood Points (BP): Used by Blood Mages, Vampires, and similar practitioners. Costs typically range from 1-3+ BP depending on spell tier. BP can be regained by feeding, specific rituals, or blood relics. HP can sometimes substitute for BP. Vampires start combat with BP (e.g., 4 + Shadow modifier, min 2).
Soul Energy (SE): Used by Ritualists, Glyphcasters, Wraiths, and other spirit or arcane casters. Costs typically range from 1 SE (Tier 1), 2 SE (Tier 2), etc.. SE is regained from resting, consuming soul shards, attuning to spectral sources, or specific channeling actions. Casters start combat with SE (e.g., 3 + Will modifier (replacing "Spirit"), min 2).
Corruption Dice (CD): Used by Forbidden Scholars, Hylden-Blooded, or any character delving into corrupt practices. These are bonus dice added to casting rolls (or other rolls if pushing) that risk increasing the character's Corruption Level.
Other Costs: Some spells may also require HP sacrifice, ongoing Concentration (see above), or specific Material Components or symbols.
Resolve the Effect:


Apply the spell's described effects, such as damage, status conditions, healing, or environmental changes.
Extra Successes (Stunts): If a spellcasting roll (attack roll or caster's skill check for a ritual/utility spell) generates more successes than required by the target's DV or the spell's DR, these extra successes can be used to enhance the spell's effect, as per the "Dice Success System". Examples include:
Increasing damage or duration.
Inflicting a minor status effect or enhancing an existing one.
Bypassing a portion of resistance.
Achieving a more precise or subtle outcome.
Creating a minor narrative advantage (e.g., the spell's light also reveals a hidden switch). The GM has final say on the feasibility of stunts.
Apply Corruption (If Applicable):


Casting Forbidden spells or using Corruption Dice to push spellcasting rolls can lead to gaining Corruption points and other negative consequences (see "Corruption Dice in Spellcasting" below).
IV. Advanced Spell Mechanics
Area of Effect (AoE) Spells: These spells affect all targets within a specified radius, cone, line, or other shape. Targets within an AoE typically make a saving throw to halve or negate the effect. If an AoE spell targets a point in space rather than specific creatures, no attack roll is usually needed to place the effect.
Resistances and Immunities: Some creatures are resistant (typically take half damage) or immune (take no damage/suffer no effect) to certain damage types (e.g., Fire, Soul) or spell effects. Corrupted creatures may react differently to various forms of magic, sometimes being vulnerable to holy effects or resistant to their own corrupting energies.
Critical Spell Effects (for Attack Roll Spells): If a spell attack roll achieves 3 or more successes OR exceeds the target's DV by 2 or more (aligning with general critical hit rules), it is a critical hit. This may allow the caster to:
Deal bonus damage (e.g., +1 or +2, or a spell-specific amount).
Inflict a status effect from the general list or one specified by the spell.
Trigger other special effects outlined in the spell's description.
Spell Duration: Spell effects can be instantaneous, last for a number of rounds or minutes, require ongoing concentration, or even be permanent until dispelled. Effects end immediately if their duration expires or if the caster's concentration is broken.
V. Corruption Dice in Spellcasting
Corruption Dice (CD) represent the perilous energies characters might draw upon, especially when casting Forbidden Spells or desperately pushing their limits.
Using Corruption Dice:
Forbidden Spells: Some Forbidden Spells may allow or require the caster to add one or more CD to their spellcasting roll to achieve more potent effects.
Pushing a Roll: A player may choose to "push" any failed spellcasting roll (attack roll or skill check for casting). To do this, they reroll all dice from their initial pool that did not result in a success (i.e., dice that rolled 1-4). When pushing, the player must add one Corruption Die to this reroll. This mechanic can also apply if a caster is making a saving throw to maintain concentration or resist a magical effect and chooses to push that save.
Consequences of Corruption Dice:
Gaining Corruption: Each '1' rolled on any Corruption Die added to a roll immediately increases the character's Corruption Level (or score) by 1. This is the primary risk.
Corruption Thresholds: As a character's Corruption Level rises, they may cross various thresholds, unlocking Corrupted Perks but also suffering escalating penalties or negative traits (as detailed in the "Corrupted Perks" section). .
Corruption Dice Failure Table: If a character has 3 or more points of Corruption, rolling a '1' on a Corruption Die not only increases their Corruption score but also requires them to immediately roll 2d6 and consult the "Corruption Dice Failure" table for an additional negative consequence (e.g., Specter Cling, Crimson Hunger, Eldritch Attention).
VI. Reactions to Spells
Characters can use their single Reaction per round to respond to spells cast by others, provided they have an ability or means to do so.
Counterspell: A character with a counterspell ability (e.g., from a perk or specific spell) may use their Reaction to attempt to nullify an incoming spell. This typically involves a contested roll: the countering character makes a [Relevant Attribute + Magical Skill (e.g., Will + Glyphcasting or Soul + Forbidden Knowledge)] check against the DR of the incoming spell or the original caster's spellcasting roll result.
Evasion: Characters can often use their Reaction to make an Evasion check ([Shadow/Will] + Evasion skill) to attempt to halve or negate the damage/effects of an Area of Effect spell that allows for such a save.
Spell-Specific Reactions/Perks: Some class perks or specific spells might grant unique reactions to magical effects.
Reaction Rolls to Reduce Damage: If a spell hits and deals damage, a character might use their Reaction to make a defensive roll to lessen the blow (declared after hit, before damage). For magical attacks, this is often an "Absorb" type roll using [Will + Concentration], with successes reducing damage or negating status effects.

VII. Resource Pools (Soul Energy/Blood Points):


Suggestion: Clarify how maximum Soul Energy (SE) and Blood Points (BP) progress.
Proposed Rule (Revision/Clarification to Spellcasting Section ):

 "Your maximum Soul Energy is calculated as 3 + Will attribute + (Character Level / 2, rounded up). Casters start combat with SE equal to their current maximum. [Previously: "Casters start combat with SE (e.g., 3 + Will modifier (replacing "Spirit"), min 2)"]"

 "Your maximum Blood Points are calculated as 4 + Shadow attribute + (Character Level / 2, rounded up). Vampires (and other BP users) start combat with BP equal to their current maximum, assuming they are not starved or depleted. 





VIII. Defining a "Scene" in Spellcasting
Some spell-like abilities or perks have a frequency of "once per scene."
A "scene" is a distinct narrative segment of play, such as a single combat encounter, a specific social negotiation in one location, the exploration of a dangerous chamber including its traps and puzzles, or a similar focused story beat.
Abilities limited to "once per scene" refresh when the Game Master indicates that the current scene has concluded and a new one begins (e.g., after a battle ends and the party moves to a different area, or a conversation finishes and a new type of challenge starts).
IX. Learning/Preparing Spells:
Acquiring New Spells: "Characters begin play knowing a number of spells appropriate to their class and starting level (as determined by their class description or starting package).


Leveling Up: Upon gaining a new character level, a spellcasting character learns or prepares a certain number of new spells from their class's spell list for which they meet the tier requirements. The number of new spells learned per level should be specified by each spellcasting class (e.g., 'Learns 1 new spell of any tier they can cast each level').
Discovery: Spells may also be learned from scrolls, tomes, mentor instruction, or by deciphering ancient glyphs found during adventures. Learning a spell this way may require a successful skill check (e.g., Will + Forbidden Knowledge, or Soul + Rituals) and take a certain amount of downtime and resources, as determined by the GM based on the spell's tier and rarity."

















Spell Compendium
Magic in Nosgoth is a volatile fusion of soul force, elemental essence, and corrupted power. This compendium presents the diverse arcane arsenal available to spellcasters across the land—whether channeling glyphs into traps, blood into weapons, or the void itself into pure destruction.
Spells in this system are divided into four main categories:
Glyph Spells – Fast-castable arcane inscriptions with battlefield or utility effects.
Blood Spells – Spells fueled by vitae and sacrifice; often risky but potent.
Ritual Spells – Longer-form invocations with lasting or narrative-altering effects.
Forbidden Spells – Reality-warping powers born of entropy, madness, or ancient knowledge.
Spells are further broken into four power tiers based on level: Initiate (Lv 1–5), Adept (Lv 6–10), Expert (Lv 11–15), and Master (Lv 16-20). Within each tier, spells are categorized by type, and finally, matched to their most appropriate class spellbook.
Use this compendium to guide character advancement, enrich GM encounters, or inspire magical relic design.

Class Spell List

Glyph Seeker Focus: Glyph, Ritual
Initiate Tier (Level 1–5)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Anchoring
Glyph of Binding Light
Glyph of Delay
Glyph of Detection
Glyph of Flame 
Glyph of Frost 
Glyph of Sparks
Glyph of Thorns
Glyph of Warding
Ritual Spells:
Altar Blessing
Bind Soul
Breath of Ancients
Echo Word
Lantern Rite
Memory Script
Rite of Stone
Spirit Echo
Warding Circle
Adept Tier (Level 6–10)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Binding 
Glyph of Chains
Glyph of Cinders
Glyph of Displacement
Glyph of Echoes
Glyph of Entropy (also Hylden Warlock)
Glyph of Quicksand
Glyph of Severance
Glyph of Silence
Shatter Sigil
Ritual Spells:
Communion of Shadows (also Sangromancer)
Life Channel (also Sangromancer, Warden of Balance)
Litany of Focus
Pillar Resonance
Rite of Echoes
Sanctify Blade (also Warden of Balance)
Soulweave
Chrono-Ward Ritual
Wraithwalk (also Soul Reaver)
Expert Tier (Level 11–15)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph Lockdown 
Glyph of Collapse
Glyph of Doom
Glyph of Drowning
Glyph of Echo Memory
Glyph of Gravity
Glyph of Reflection 
Glyph of Ruin
Glyph of Silence Field
Ritual Spells:
Past's Reflection Rite
Memory Tomb
Oracle's Insight (also Warden of Balance)
Ritual of Awakening
Sanctify Ground (also Warden of Balance)
Soul Anchor (also Warden of Balance)
Spiritforge Circle
Temporal Delay (also Warden of Balance)
Master Tier (Level 16–20)
Glyph Spells:
Eternal Glyph Lock
Glyph Nexus Gate
Glyph of Judgment (also Warden of Balance)
Glyph of Obliteration
Glyph of Time Sever (also Warden of Balance)
Glyph of Unmaking (also Hylden Warlock)
Glyph of Unraveling
Glyph Vortex (also Soul Reaver)
Nexus Glyph 
Sanctum Glyph (also Warden of Balance)
Ritual Spells:
Binding of the Starborn
Chrono Collapse (also Warden of Balance)
Eternal Sigil
Realmshift (also Soul Reaver, Hylden Warlock)
Soulforge Resurrection (also Sangromancer)

Sangromancer Focus: Blood, Ritual
Initiate Tier (Level 1–5)
Blood Spells:
Blood Leash
Blood Mark
Blood Thread
Blood Trace
Coagulate
Crimson Slash
Hemostatic Pulse
Minor Bloodshield
Pulse Spike
Sanguine Dart
Ritual Spells:
Altar Blessing
Bind Soul
Breath of Ancients
Echo Word
Memory Script
Rite of Stone
Spirit Echo
Warding Circle
Adept Tier (Level 6–10)
Blood Spells:
Bleeding Curse
Blood Mirror
Blood Puppet 
Blood Scent
Crimson Bind 
Crimson Mantle
Echo Wound
Hemorrhage Halo 
Sangral Lance
Vital Hook
Ritual Spells:
Ceremony of Sorrow
Communion of Shadows (also Glyph Seeker)
Life Channel (also Glyph Seeker, Warden of Balance)
Pillar Resonance
Rite of Echoes
Soulweave
Chrono-Ward Ritual
Wraithwalk
Expert Tier (Level 11–15)
Blood Spells:
Arterial Harvest
Blood Cyclone
Bloodlash Field
Bloodrite Brand
Bone Siphon
Crimson Shackle
Crimson Surge
Curse of Ash
Heartburst 
Viscera Torrent
Ritual Spells:
Beckon of the Deep
Hauntwalker (also Soul Reaver)
Memory Tomb
Ritual of Awakening
Sanctify Ground
Soul Anchor
Master Tier (Level 16–20)
Blood Spells:
Blood Oblivion
Blood Resurrection 
Crimson Godseed
Crimson Reaping 
Hemodominate 
Sanguine Eclipse
Sanguine Swarm
Throne of Veins
Vital Dominion
Wound Reversal
Ritual Spells:
Curse of the Nine Moons
Dirge of Ruin
Ritual of Eclipse
Soulforge Resurrection (also Glyph Seeker)

Dreadblade Focus: Blood, Forbidden
Initiate Tier (Level 1–5)
Blood Spells:
Blood Leash
Crimson Slash
Pulse Spike
Sanguine Dart 
Forbidden Spells:
Blind Insight
Hex of Pain
Minor Rift
Nightmare Seed
Shadow Infestation 
Whispershade
Adept Tier (Level 6–10)
Blood Spells:
Bleeding Curse
Echo Wound
Vital Hook
Forbidden Spells:
Cursed Equation
Dread Chain
Eyes Beyond
Fleshwarp 
Omen Tether
Riftstep 
Spectral Lash
Unravel Mind
Expert Tier (Level 11–15)
Blood Spells:
Bloodlash Field
Crimson Surge
Heartburst 
Forbidden Spells:
Cacophonic Flare
Dark Reflection (also Soul Reaver, Hylden Warlock)
Descent of Teeth
Fatebind Curse (also Hylden Warlock)
Oblivion Whisper
Rotmind Rift
Sanity Spike (also Hylden Warlock)
Starving Veil
Master Tier (Level 16–20)
Blood Spells:
Sanguine Swarm (if aggressive)
Wound Reversal (if used offensively)
Forbidden Spells:
Annihilation Pulse (also Hylden Warlock)
Corruption Crown (also Hylden Warlock)
Reaver Unleashed (E for Soul Reaver, but fits Dreadblade if they are Reaver-touched)
The Whispering Gate (also Hylden Warlock)
Void Chain (also Hylden Warlock)

Warden of Balance Focus: Ritual, Glyph
Initiate Tier (Level 1–5)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Anchoring
Glyph of Binding Light
Glyph of Delay
Glyph of Detection
Glyph of Warding
Ritual Spells:
Altar Blessing
Bind Soul
Breath of Ancients
Echo Word
Lantern Rite
Memory Script
Rite of Stone
Spirit Echo
Warding Circle 
Adept Tier (Level 6–10)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Binding
Glyph of Chains
Glyph of Echoes
Glyph of Silence
Shatter Sigil
Ritual Spells:
Communion of Shadows
Life Channel (also Sangromancer, Glyph Seeker)
Litany of Focus
Pillar Resonance 
Rite of Echoes
Sanctify Blade (also Glyph Seeker)
Soulweave
Chrono-Ward Ritual
Expert Tier (Level 11–15)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph Lockdown
Glyph of Echo Memory
Glyph of Gravity
Glyph of Reflection
Glyph of Silence Field
Ritual Spells:
Past's Reflection Rite
Hauntwalker
Invocation of Chains  (Master Tier Ritual in general index, listed as Expert here)
Memory Tomb
Oracle's Insight (also Glyph Seeker)
Ritual of Awakening
Sanctify Ground (also Glyph Seeker)
Soul Anchor (also Glyph Seeker)
Temporal Delay  (also Glyph Seeker)
Master Tier (Level 16–20)
Glyph Spells:
Eternal Glyph Lock
Glyph of Judgment (also Glyph Seeker)
Glyph of Time Sever (also Glyph Seeker)
Sanctum Glyph (also Glyph Seeker)
Ritual Spells:
Binding of the Starborn
Chrono Collapse (E as "Chrono Collapse" in general Master Tier Rituals; listed as "Last Rite of Balance"  in Warden spellbook, which is also Master Tier Ritual. These might be the same or distinct high-level balance rituals.) I will list both if they are distinct.
Last Rite of Balance  (Master Tier Ritual)
Invocation of Chains (E if this is the Master Tier version, distinct from the Expert list reference)
Curse of the Nine Moons (if about cosmic cycles/balance)
Dirge of Ruin (if about preventing or understanding it)
Eternal Sigil
Realmshift
Ritual of Eclipse (if about cosmic balance)

Soul Reaver Focus: Forbidden, Glyph
Initiate Tier (Level 1–5)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Detection
Glyph of Sparks
Veil of Shadow 
Forbidden Spells:
Blind Insight
Echo of Rot
Eldritch Gasp
Minor Rift
Whispershade
Adept Tier (Level 6–10)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Displacement
Glyph of Echoes
Glyph of Severance
Shatter Sigil
Forbidden Spells:
Dread Chain
Eyes Beyond
Fleshwarp
Omen Tether
Riftstep
Soul Lock
Spectral Lash
Unravel Mind
Expert Tier (Level 11–15)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Collapse
Glyph of Gravity
Glyph of Ruin
Forbidden Spells:
Dark Reflection (also Dreadblade, Hylden Warlock)
Descent of Teeth
Oblivion Whisper
Rift Pulse 
Soul Fracture (E for Hylden Warlock, but fits Soul Reaver)
Starving Veil
Master Tier (Level 16–20)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph Vortex 
Glyph of Unraveling
Forbidden Spells:
Astral Shackle (E for Hylden Warlock, but fits Soul Reaver)
Black Spiral (E for Hylden Warlock, but fits Soul Reaver if it's soul/wraith related)
Mind Rupture (E for Hylden Warlock, but could fit Soul Reaver if about shattering minds/souls)
Reaver Unleashed 
Soul Storm (E for Hylden Warlock, but very Soul Reaver thematic)
The God’s Rebuttal
Void Chain (also Hylden Warlock)
Soul Flicker is listed as an Initiate Ritual and in Soul Reaver's spellbook. This is an inconsistency in the source material (spell type vs class focus). Assuming it's a special Ritual accessible to Soul Reavers due to their nature.
Ritual Spells (Special Access): Soul Flicker 

Hylden Warlock Focus: Forbidden, Glyph
Initiate Tier (Level 1–5)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph Disruptor 
Glyph of Thorns (if used with entropic twist)
Forbidden Spells:
Blind Insight
Dissonant Pulse
Echo of Rot
Eldritch Gasp
Glyph Disruptor (also a Glyph interaction)
Hex of Pain
Nightmare Seed
Shadow Infestation
Whispershade
Adept Tier (Level 6–10)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Entropy (also Glyph Seeker)
Glyph of Severance (if about breaking things down)
Forbidden Spells:
Cursed Equation
Dread Chain
Eyes Beyond
Fleshwarp
Madness Surge 
Omen Tether
Soul Lock
Spectral Lash
Unravel Mind
Expert Tier (Level 11–15)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Doom
Glyph of Ruin
Forbidden Spells:
Cacophonic Flare
Dark Reflection (also Dreadblade, Soul Reaver)
Descent of Teeth
Fatebind Curse (also Dreadblade)
Oblivion Whisper
Rift Pulse
Rotmind Rift
Sanity Spike
Soul Fracture 
Starving Veil
Master Tier (Level 16–20)
Glyph Spells:
Glyph of Unmaking (also Glyph Seeker)
Forbidden Spells:
Annihilation Pulse (also Dreadblade)
Astral Shackle 
Black Spiral 
Corruption Crown (also Dreadblade)
Mind Rupture 
Soul Storm 
The God’s Rebuttal
The Whispering Gate (also Dreadblade)
Void Chain (also Dreadblade, Soul Reaver)












Spell Definitions
A Note on Costs and Mechanics:
Soul Energy (SE) will generally be the cost for Glyph, Ritual, and Forbidden spells.
Blood Points (BP) will generally be the cost for Blood spells.
Damage will be static values, appropriate for the tier.
Saving Throw DRs for Initiate Tier spells will typically be DR 2.
Casting Time will usually be 1 Action unless specified otherwise (e.g., for Rituals).

Initiate Tier Spells (Level 1–5)
Glyph Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Wardens of Balance; Secondary: Soul Reavers, Hylden Warlocks)
Glyph of Flame


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 Soul Energy (SE)
Range (Placement): Touch (inscribe on a surface)
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered or dispelled. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: Creature (not designated ally) moves within 5 feet of the glyph or touches it.
Effect: Erupts in a 5-foot radius sphere centered on the glyph. Creatures in the area suffer 3 Fire damage.
Save: DR 2 Evasion for damaged -1.
Glyph of Frost


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: Creature (not designated ally) moves within 5 feet of the glyph or touches it.
Effect: Releases a burst of chilling frost in a 5-foot radius sphere. Creatures in the area suffer 1 Frost damage and have their movement Speed reduced by 10 feet (2 squares) for 1 round.
Save: DR 2 fury to negate the speed reduction (still takes damage).
Glyph of Sparks


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: Creature (not designated ally) moves within 5 feet of the glyph or touches it.
Target: The triggering creature.
Effect: The glyph discharges a brilliant flash of disorienting sparks directly at the triggering creature. The target suffers 1 Electrical damage and must make a DR 2 Will save or be Blinded for 1 round.
Glyph of Warding


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (often on a door, chest, or passage)
Duration: Until triggered or dispelled (can be long-lasting if undisturbed). Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: When a creature attempts to open, pass through, or interact with the warded object/area without speaking a pass-phrase set by you during casting.
Effect: When triggered, the glyph emits a loud alarm (audible up to 100 feet) for 1 round. Additionally, you can choose one of the following minor effects to occur (chosen when casting):
A flash of light (as Glyph of Sparks, but no damage, DR 2 Will save vs. Blinded for 1 round for the triggerer).
A magical tether (triggerer must make a DR 2 Might save or be Rooted for 1 round).
A minor shock (triggerer takes 2 Electrical damage).
Glyph of Binding Light


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: Creature (not designated ally) moves within 5 feet of the glyph or touches it.
Target: The triggering creature.
Effect: Bands of solid light erupt from the glyph, attempting to ensnare the triggering creature. The target must succeed on a DR 2 Evasion save or be Restrained for 1 round. A Restrained creature's speed becomes 0, and it has a -2 dice penalty on attack rolls and Evasion checks. It can use its Action to make a DR 2 Fury check to break free.
Glyph of Detection


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph (Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 1 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (on a surface or object)
Duration: 1 hour, or until triggered.
Effect: You inscribe a glyph that attunes to a specific type of presence. Choose one: Undead, Extra-planar (e.g., Hylden, summoned spirits), or Magic (active spells/enchantments). The glyph remains dormant until a creature or effect of the chosen type comes within 15 feet of it. When triggered, the glyph glows faintly (visible only to you if you are within 60 feet) and sends you a subtle mental ping, alerting you to the presence and general direction of the trigger. It does not reveal specifics. The glyph then deactivates.
Glyph of Delay


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph (Enhancement)
Casting Time: Special (see effect)
Cost: +0 SE (modifies another glyph)
Effect: When you cast any other glyph spell that has a trigger, you can choose to apply this meta-glyph effect. Instead of activating immediately when its trigger conditions are met, the modified glyph will activate 1 round later (at the start of the turn of whatever triggered it, but on the next round). This allows for delayed reactions or tactical setups. You must declare the use of Glyph of Delay when the base glyph is cast.
Glyph of Thorns


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph (Trap)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: Creature (not designated ally) moves into the glyph's space.
Effect: Spectral thorns erupt from the glyph. The triggering creature suffers 2 Soul damage (bypasses armor) and must make a DR 2 Evasion save or have its speed halved for 1 round as the thorns cling and tear.
Glyph of Anchoring


Tier: Initiate
Type: Glyph (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 1 minute, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: When a creature standing on or directly adjacent to the glyph attempts to use magical teleportation or dimensional travel.
Effect: The glyph flares, attempting to disrupt the travel. The creature attempting to teleport/travel must make a DR 2 Will save. On a failure, their travel attempt fails, and they expend any action or resource used for it. On a success, they travel normally. The glyph is expended after one such attempt.

Blood Spells (Focus: Sangromancers, Dreadblades)
Sanguine Dart


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 Blood Point (BP)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Effect: You conjure a hardened dart of your own blood or manipulate nearby spilled vitae and hurl it at a target. Make a ranged spell attack roll (Soul + Rituals for Sangromancer; Shadow + Weapon Mastery if Dreadblade views it as a thrown weapon). On a hit, the target suffers 3 Physical (Piercing) damage. If the target is already Bleeding, this attack gains +1 die to its attack roll.
Blood Mark


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Debuff/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Bonus Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: Touch or 30 feet (if you can project a drop of blood)
Target: One creature.
Duration: 2 rounds.
Effect: You mark a creature with a touch of blood, either your own or by magically adhering a drop to them. For the duration, the target is mystically marked. All attack rolls made against the marked target by you or your allies gain a +1 die bonus.
Blood Leash


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: A tendril of living blood extends from you to the target. The target must succeed on a DR 2 Might save or be tethered by the blood leash. While leashed, the target cannot willingly move more than 15 feet away from you. If it attempts to, it is halted. The target can use its Action to make a DR 2 fury check to break the leash. The leash also breaks if you move more than 30 feet from the target or your concentration ends.
Minor Bloodshield


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Defense)
Casting Time: 1 Reaction (when you or an ally within 5ft are hit by an attack) or 1 Bonus Action (to pre-cast).
Cost: 1 BP
Target: Self or one ally within 5 feet.
Duration: Instantaneous (if Reaction) or until the start of your next turn (if Bonus Action).
Effect: You swiftly conjure a small, temporary shield of hardened blood. The target gains Temporary HP equal to 3 + your Soul attribute. This lasts until depleted or the duration ends. If used as a Reaction, it applies against the triggering attack.
Coagulate


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Healing/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: Touch
Target: One willing living creature (including yourself).
Effect: You touch a creature and manipulate their blood to rapidly clot wounds. This immediately ends one Bleeding condition affecting the target. If the target was at 0 HP and dying, they become Stabilized. This spell does not restore Hit Points beyond stabilizing or stopping bleeds.
Blood Trace


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Utility/Divination)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 1 BP
Requirement: A sample of fresh blood (no older than 1 hour) from a specific creature.
Range: Self
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: By focusing on a sample of blood, you attempt to divine the current location or general direction of the creature from which it came. For the duration, you have a sense of the direction and approximate distance (e.g., "very close," "within a mile," "far") to that creature, provided it is on the same plane of existence. This sense can be blocked by significant magical wards or if the creature's blood has been mystically altered.
Hemostatic Pulse


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Utility/Minor Healing)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: Self or Touch
Target: Self or one willing living creature you touch.
Effect: You send a gentle pulse through the target's bloodstream, encouraging minor wounds to seal. The target regains 2 Hit Points. This cannot be used on a creature that has benefited from Hemostatic Pulse within the last minute.
Crimson Slash


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Attack)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: Self (creates a blood weapon) or 15 feet (projects blood).
Effect: You either coalesce your own blood into a short-lived blade of hardened vitae, or project a cutting whip of blood.
Blood Blade: For 1 minute, one of your hands forms a blade that uses your melee attack stats (Soul + Rituals or Shadow + Weapon Mastery) and deals 3 Physical (Slashing) damage. Hits with this blade also cause the target to Bleed for 1 damage for 1 round.
Blood Whip: Make a ranged spell attack (Soul + Rituals) against one target within 15 feet. On a hit, it deals 2 Physical (Slashing) damage and the target must make a DR 2 Evasion save or Bleed for 1 damage for 1 round.
Blood Thread


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Bonus Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: An object no heavier than 10 pounds or a point on a surface.
Duration: 1 minute or until broken.
Effect: You create a thin, sticky, shimmering red thread of blood between your hand and the target. The thread is resilient (can be broken with a DR 2 fury check or by dealing 3 damage to it). You can use it to subtly manipulate the object (pull it, tip it over if light enough) from a distance with an action and a relevant skill check, or use it as a tripwire (creatures failing a DR 2 Observation check might not see it).
Pulse Spike


Tier: Initiate
Type: Blood (Attack/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living creature with blood.
Effect: You send a jolt of focused pressure through the target's bloodstream. Make a ranged spell attack (Soul + Rituals). On a hit, the target takes 1 Soul damage and must make a DR 2 Might save. On a failed save, the target is disoriented and suffers a -1 die penalty on its next attack roll or skill check made before the end of its next turn.
Heartburst
Tier: Expert (Sangromancer L9 Perk, also on "Selected Spells")
Type: Blood (Attack/Execute)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Original Cost: 3 Blood Points (BP) and 2 Soul Energy (SE)
Cost: 4 Blood Points (BP)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living creature with a heart.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: Target makes DR 3 Might save. Failure: If target has 20 HP or fewer, dies instantly. If >20 HP, suffers (Level x 2) Soul damage and is Stunned 1 round. Success: Suffers (Level) Soul damage.



Ritual Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Sangromancers, Wardens of Balance; Secondary: Hylden Warlocks for dark rituals)
Bind Soul


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE, plus a specially prepared receptacle (e.g., a gem, vial, or fetish worth a nominal amount).
Range: Touch
Target: The fresh corpse of a creature that died within the last minute, or a willing (or helpless) creature.
Duration: The soul is stored indefinitely until released or the receptacle is destroyed.
Effect: You perform a ritual to draw out a soul (or a fragment of it from a recently deceased body) and bind it into the prepared receptacle.
From Corpse: The soul fragment is captured. This might prevent resurrection by simple means or allow communication with the fragment.
From Willing/Helpless Creature: The target makes a DR 3 Will save. Failure means a fragment of their soul is siphoned (causing 1 Soul Stress or a temporary -1 to Will attribute for 1 hour). This stored fragment can be used to empower another spell or ritual (GM discretion, e.g., add +1 success to one spell cast by destroying the receptacle and releasing the fragment). This is often a dark act if done unwillingly.
Echo Word


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 1 SE
Range: Touch (a location or object)
Duration: 1 hour, or until triggered.
Effect: You imbue a location or object with a single word or short phrase (up to 5 words) spoken by you. The next time a specific trigger condition you define occurs within 10 feet of the object/location (e.g., "when someone says 'Nosgoth'," "when this door opens," "when a vampire approaches"), your voice will echo, speaking the stored phrase. The trigger must be simple and perceivable.
Soul Flicker


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual (Personal Ward)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: Self
Duration: Until the start of your next turn.
Effect: You briefly attune your soul to the spectral echoes, making yourself slightly out of phase. The next single time you are targeted by an attack roll or a harmful single-target spell before the start of your next turn, the attacker makes their roll with a -2 dice penalty as you seem to flicker and distort. You cannot make attacks or cast offensive spells during the turn you activate Soul Flicker and the subsequent turn while it is active (you can take defensive actions or move).
Lantern Rite


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: Self (emanates from you or an object you hold like a lantern)
Area: 30-foot radius sphere around you.
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: You cause an object you hold (or your own hand) to emit a ghostly, pale light. This light illuminates the area like a normal lantern. More importantly, within this radius, all invisible or ethereal creatures and objects are revealed as shimmering, translucent outlines. Hidden spectral pathways or energies might also become faintly visible at GM's discretion.
Warding Circle


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual (Defensive)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Creates a 10-foot radius circle on the ground centered on you or a point you touch.
Duration: 1 hour, or until the circle is broken by a physical crossing or magical disruption.
Effect: You inscribe a protective circle. Choose one creature type when casting: Undead, Summoned Extra-planar Entities (minor spirits/demons), or Corrupted Beasts.
Creatures of the chosen type cannot willingly enter the circle and suffer a -2 dice penalty on attack rolls made against targets inside the circle if they are attacking from outside.
Allies inside the circle gain +1 die on saving throws against fear effects or special abilities originating from the chosen creature type.
The circle is broken if any creature physically crosses its boundary without your permission or if a significant magical force (GM discretion) disrupts it.
Rite of Stone


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual (Warding/Utility)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One stone object or section of stonework no larger than a 5-foot cube (e.g., a door, a statue, a section of wall).
Duration: 24 hours.
Effect: You imbue the target stone with magical resilience or a specific ward. Choose one:
Reinforce: The stone's effective hardness or HP (if it has them) is doubled, making it much harder to break.
Alarm Ward: If any creature other than you (or those you designate) touches the stone, a mental or audible alarm (your choice, range 100ft for audible) alerts you.
Glyph of Hiding: Any one small object (no larger than your fist) placed within a tiny cavity you create in the stone is hidden from normal sight and mundane searches (DR 3 Observation to find).
Breath of Ancients


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual (Divination/Utility)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Self
Requirement: You must be in a place of significant historical or spiritual resonance (ruin, old battlefield, former temple).
Effect: You meditate, opening your mind to the lingering echoes of the past. You receive one or two fleeting visions, sounds, or strong emotional impressions related to a significant event or person connected to that location from long ago. The information is cryptic and impressionistic, not direct factual recall (e.g., "a feeling of immense sorrow and betrayal," "the sound of clashing Hylden steel," "a vision of a noble figure falling"). The GM provides these clues.
Memory Script


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual (Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Minute per 25 words.
Cost: 1 SE per 50 words (or portion thereof).
Range: Touch
Target: A non-magical object (parchment, stone tablet, weapon hilt).
Duration: Permanent, until dispelled or the object is destroyed.
Effect: You magically scribe a message, a symbol, or a short piece of information onto the target object. This script is invisible to normal sight. It can only be seen by someone who knows the specific (simple) mental keyword or ritual action you define during casting, or by magical means like "detect magic" (which reveals an aura of magic but not the content without the keyword).
Altar Blessing


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual (Utility/Minor Buff)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One mundane altar, shrine, or small sacred space.
Duration: 1 hour.
Effect: You perform a rite to consecrate or attune the target altar/shrine to an ideal (e.g., Balance, Protection, Truth, a specific Pillar if appropriate). For the duration, any creature who spends 1 minute in quiet contemplation or prayer at the blessed altar gains +1 die on their next single skill check related to the chosen ideal OR regains 1 additional HP the next time they receive healing. Each creature can only benefit from this blessing once per casting of Altar Blessing.
Spirit Echo


Tier: Initiate
Type: Ritual (Divination)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 1 SE
Range: Self
Area: Your immediate vicinity (e.g., a single room or clearing up to 30-foot radius).
Effect: You attune your senses to the Spectral Realm, trying to perceive echoes of spirits that have recently passed through or are weakly bound to the area. You become aware of the general number (one, few, many) and emotional tenor (e.g., sorrowful, angry, peaceful, confused) of any such minor spiritual traces from the past 24 hours. This does not allow communication or reveal specific details unless the echo is particularly strong (GM discretion).

Forbidden Spells (Focus: Hylden Warlocks, Soul Reavers, Dreadblades)
Hex of Pain


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE (or 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: 1 round.
Effect: You utter a minor curse, wracking the target with phantom pains. The target must make a DR 2 Will save. On a failure, the target suffers a -1 die penalty on all attack rolls and skill checks it makes on its next turn.
Minor Rift


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Utility/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One unattended object no larger than a 3-foot cube OR a 5-foot square area of ground/surface.
Effect: You create a small, unstable dimensional rift.
Object: The object is pulled 10 feet in a direction of your choice (cannot lift it off the ground unless it's very light).
Area: The targeted area becomes difficult terrain for 1 round as the ground warps and shimmers. Creatures in the area when cast must make a DR 1 Evasion save or be knocked off balance (no prone, but next action might have -1 die if it requires balance).
Whispershade


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Utility/Illusion)
Casting Time: 1 Bonus Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: 60 feet
Target: One willing creature you can see (can be yourself).
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You create a direct, silent mental link with the target, through which you can transmit whispered messages telepathically. The communication is one-way from you to the target, or two-way if the target also knows this spell or has telepathic ability. The target perceives your whispers as faint, shadowy sounds directly in their mind.
Shadow Infestation


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: 1 minute.
Effect: You cause clinging, illusory shadows to swarm and distract the target. The target must make a DR 2 Will save. On a failure, the target suffers a -1 die penalty on all Perception and Observation skill checks for the duration, and any light source they carry seems to dim for them (though it's normal for others).
Glyph Disruptor


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Anti-Magic)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One magical glyph, sigil, or non-artifact magical ward you can see.
Effect: You hurl a pulse of entropic Hylden energy at the target glyph. Make a Soul + Forbidden Knowledge check against a DR set by the power of the glyph (typically DR 2 for simple glyphs, DR 3 for more complex ones). On a success, the target glyph is immediately dispelled or rendered inert. This cannot affect Archglyphs or exceptionally powerful wards without significantly more power or successes.
Nightmare Seed


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Mental)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: Touch
Target: One sleeping or unconscious creature.
Effect: You implant a seed of profound terror into the target's subconscious. The next time the target sleeps, they are plagued by horrific nightmares. Upon waking, they gain no benefits from that rest (e.g., do not recover HP or resources normally gained from a long rest) and must make a DR 2 Will save or suffer 1 Sanity damage and gain the Frightened condition towards a random creature/object they first see for 10 minutes.
Echo of Rot


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Necrotic)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: 3 rounds.
Effect: You touch the target with entropic energy or project a faint aura of decay. The target must make a DR 2 Might save. On a failure, their flesh begins to tingle with a faint rot. For the duration, any mundane (non-magical) healing the target receives is halved, and they emit a faint, unsettling odor of decay.
Blind Insight


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Divination - Risky)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 1 SE and the caster takes 1 Sanity damage.
Range: Self
Effect: You risk your sanity to glimpse a dangerous truth through Hylden methods. Ask the GM one question about a specific immediate danger, a hidden weakness of a present foe, or the nature of a corrupting influence nearby. The GM provides a brief, truthful, but often disturbing or cryptic answer or vision. The knowledge gained often comes with an unsettling psychic echo.
Eldritch Gasp


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Attack/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: 15-foot cone.
Effect: You exhale a cloud of nearly invisible, choking gas tainted with otherworldly energies. Creatures in the cone must make a DR 2 Might save. On a failure, they begin coughing uncontrollably, suffering 1 Soul damage and are unable to speak or cast spells with verbal components for 1 round. On a success, they only cough for a moment with no further penalty.
Dissonant Pulse


Tier: Initiate
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: Self
Area: 10-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Duration: Instantaneous.
Effect: You release a jarring, subsonic pulse of Hylden energy. All other creatures within the radius must make a DR 2 Will save. On a failure, their concentration is immediately broken (if concentrating on a spell/effect) and they suffer a -1 die penalty to their next skill check requiring focus or mental acuity made before the end of their next turn.

A Note on Costs and Mechanics for Adept Tier:
Soul Energy (SE) or Blood Points (BP) costs will typically be around 2, reflecting their increased power over Initiate spells.
Damage values will be static and higher than Initiate Tier.
Saving Throw DRs will generally be DR 2, occasionally DR 3 for more potent effects.
Casting Time will usually be 1 Action unless specified.

Adept Tier Spells (Level 6–10)
Glyph Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Wardens of Balance; Secondary: Soul Reavers, Hylden Warlocks)
Glyph of Silence


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: When a creature enters the glyph's space or a designated 10-foot radius area around it (chosen at casting), OR when a sound louder than a whisper originates within that area.
Effect: When triggered, the glyph creates a 10-foot radius sphere of magical silence centered on itself for 1 minute. No sound can be created within or pass through this sphere. Any creature or object entirely inside the sphere is deafened and immune to thunder damage. Spells with verbal components cannot be cast from within or into the sphere. The glyph is expended after one trigger.
Glyph of Binding


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: When a creature (not designated ally) moves into the glyph's space.
Area/Target: The triggering creature and up to 2 other creatures of your choice within 10 feet of the glyph.
Effect: Bands of arcane energy erupt from the glyph. Each targeted creature must succeed on a DR 2 Evasion save or become Restrained for a number of rounds equal to your Soul attribute. A Restrained creature's speed is 0, and it has a -2 dice penalty on attack rolls and Evasion checks. A creature can use its Action to make a DR 2 fury check to break free or help another break free.
Shatter Sigil


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Anti-Magic)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One visible magical glyph, sigil, or ward.
Effect: You launch a pulse of disruptive energy at a target magical inscription. Make a Soul + Glyphcasting skill check. The DR is set by the power of the target sigil (typically DR 2 for common glyphs, DR 3 for more potent ones, or opposed by the creator's Glyphcasting skill if they are actively maintaining it). On a success, the target glyph is shattered and dispelled. If the target glyph would normally have an explosive or harmful effect when dispelled or destroyed, that effect is negated by Shatter Sigil.
Glyph of Echoes


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Utility/Enhancement)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 1 minute, or until triggered.
Effect: You inscribe a glyph that records and mimics recent magical energies. The next time a glyph spell (yours or another's of Initiate or Adept tier) is cast or triggers within 30 feet of this Glyph of Echoes, this glyph absorbs its pattern. Then, 1 round later (on the anniversary of the trigger/casting), the Glyph of Echoes recasts that same spell at the same location it originally targeted, but with its numerical effects (damage, duration, number of targets) halved (rounded down, minimum 1). The Glyph of Echoes is then expended. It cannot copy Master tier glyphs or Archglyphs.
Glyph of Cinders


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Area Damage/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute.
Trigger: Creature (not designated ally) moves within 5 feet of the glyph.
Effect: The glyph explodes, covering a 10-foot radius area in superheated cinders and ash for 3 rounds. Any creature that starts its turn in the area or enters it for the first time on a turn suffers 2 Fire damage. The area also becomes difficult terrain due to the cinders.
Glyph of Chains


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: Creature (not designated ally) of Medium size or larger moves within 10 feet of the glyph.
Effect: Spectral chains erupt from the glyph and attempt to bind the triggering creature. The target must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failure, it is Restrained and cannot use magical teleportation or phasing abilities for up to 1 minute. The creature can use its Action on its turn to repeat the Might save, ending the effect on a success.
Glyph of Entropy


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Debuff/Anti-Magic)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: When a creature attempts to cast a spell or use a magical ability while within 10 feet of the glyph.
Effect: The glyph flares with unmaking Hylden energy. The creature triggering the glyph must make a DR 2 Will save. On a failure, their spell/ability fails and any resources (like Soul Energy or Blood Points) spent are lost. Additionally, one piece of their non-magical equipment (e.g., a weapon, piece of armor, shield) takes on a temporary entropic flaw (e.g., -1 damage for a weapon, -1 Armor for armor) for 1 minute. The glyph is then expended.
Glyph of Quicksand


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Control/Terrain)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (must be on a natural earth or loose debris surface)
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: When a creature weighing more than 50 lbs moves onto the glyph's space.
Effect: The 5-foot square space the glyph is on and all adjacent squares (a 3x3 square area, or 15x15ft) transform into treacherous, magically-induced quicksand for 1 minute. This area is difficult terrain. Any creature starting its turn in the quicksand or entering it must make a DR 2 Might save or become Restrained as they sink. A Restrained creature can use its action to make another DR 2 fury check to free itself. Creatures who are Restrained at the end of their turn sink deeper, suffering 1 Soul Stress.
Glyph of Displacement


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Utility/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: When a creature (not designated ally) touches or moves over the glyph.
Effect: The triggering creature must make a DR 2 Will save. On a failed save, it is instantly teleported 15 feet (3 squares) in a random horizontal direction (roll a d8 for direction). If the destination is occupied or unsafe (e.g., off a cliff), the creature is shunted to the nearest safe unoccupied space and takes 1 Soul damage. The glyph is then expended.
Glyph of Severance


Tier: Adept
Type: Glyph (Debuff/Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (often placed on a weapon or path)
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: When the glyph is touched by a creature or a weapon bearing the glyph strikes a creature.
Effect: The glyph discharges a cutting wave of energy. The creature triggering it (or struck by the weapon) takes 4 Soul damage (bypasses armor) and must make a DR 2 Might save. On a failed save, one non-magical item they are carrying or wearing (e.g., a shield strap, a belt pouch, a weapon's haft if not magical) is severed or broken. The GM determines the item if not obvious.

Blood Spells (Focus: Sangromancers, Dreadblades)
Blood Puppet


Tier: Adept (Sangromancer Core Ability, expanded earlier. Included here for completeness if it costs 2BP as suggested in that expansion, placing it power-wise at Adept level).
Type: Blood (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living, Bleeding creature.
Duration: Until the end of the target's next turn.
Effect: Target makes a DR 2 Will save. Failure: you control its Move, Action, and Bonus Action on its next turn (cannot be obviously suicidal). Success: target has -1 die on attack rolls next turn.
Crimson Bind


Tier: Adept (Sangromancer L3 Perk, expanded earlier. Adept tier if using the stronger version from that expansion).
Type: Blood (AoE Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range (Area): 10-foot radius from a point within 60 feet.
Duration: Soul attribute rounds.
Effect: Creatures in area make DR 2 Might or Evasion save. Failure: Rooted (can use Action to attempt DR 2 Might to break free). Success: speed halved in area.
Echo Wound


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (Damage/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Reaction (when an enemy within 30 feet regains HP)
Cost: 1 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One enemy creature that just regained Hit Points.
Effect: You cause the target's wounds to supernaturally reject the recent healing. The target immediately suffers Physical damage equal to half the amount of HP it just regained (rounded down). This damage cannot be reduced by Armor as it manifests internally. Additionally, if the healing was magical, the original caster of the healing must make a DR 2 Will save or take 1 Soul Stress from the backlash.
Blood Scent


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (Utility/Sensory)
Casting Time: 1 Bonus Action
Cost: 1 BP
Range: Self
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: You heighten your senses to an unnatural degree, becoming acutely aware of the scent of blood. For the duration, you automatically detect the presence and general direction of any living creature that is Bleeding or has less than half its maximum HP within 60 feet, even through barriers (though you cannot pinpoint its exact location without line of sight). You gain +2 dice on any skill checks made to track a creature that is Bleeding.
Hemorrhage Halo


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (AoE Damage/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range: Self
Area: 10-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Duration: Instantaneous effect, but bleed lasts 2 rounds.
Effect: You unleash a wave of blood-seeking energy. All other creatures (friend or foe) within the radius must make a DR 2 Might save. Those who fail take 2 Soul damage (bypasses armor) and gain the Bleeding condition (1 damage at start of turn) for 2 rounds. Those who succeed take -1 damage. If the player rolls more than 1 success, they do not take the bleeding condition. 
Sangral Lance


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (Attack)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range: 60 feet (line)
Effect: You conjure and hurl a spear made of solidified, supernaturally sharp blood. Make a ranged spell attack roll (Soul + Rituals) against one target. On a hit, the Sangral Lance deals 5 Physical (Piercing) damage and the target must make a DR 2 Might save or begin Bleeding (1 damage/round for 2 rounds). If the attack roll results in 2 or more successes beyond what was needed to hit the target's DV, the lance pierces through and can hit a second target directly behind the first (make a new attack roll with -1 die against the second target).
Blood Mirror


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (Defense/Retribution)
Casting Time: 1 Reaction (when you are damaged by a creature within 30 feet)
Cost: 2 BP
Range: Self
Duration: Instantaneous.
Effect: When a creature damages you with an attack or ability, you can use your own spilled blood to form a brief, retaliatory reflection of their aggression. The creature that damaged you immediately suffers Soul damage equal to half the damage you just took (rounded down, minimum 1). This damage bypasses their armor.
Bleeding Curse


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living creature with blood.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You inflict a deep, unholy thirst upon the target's very blood. The target must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failure, while the curse persists, any time the target takes any amount of Physical damage (bludgeoning, piercing, or slashing), they also gain the Bleeding condition (1 damage/round for 2 rounds). If they are already Bleeding, the duration of that Bleed is extended by 1 round. This can lead to multiple stacks of Bleeding duration from different hits.
Vital Hook


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (Control/Attack)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living creature.
Effect: You send out a grasping tendril of blood. Make a ranged spell attack roll (Soul + Rituals). On a hit, the target suffers 2 Soul damage and you form a blood link. As a Bonus Action on your subsequent turns while the link persists (up to 1 minute, requires concentration), you can attempt to pull the target. The target must make a DR 2 Might save or be pulled 10 feet (2 squares) closer to you. The link breaks if they move out of 30 feet or you lose concentration.
Crimson Mantle


Tier: Adept
Type: Blood (Defense/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Bonus Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range: Self
Duration: 1 minute.
Effect: You draw forth your own blood to swirl around you like a protective, semi-solid cloak. For the duration, you gain +1 Armor. Additionally, the first time a creature hits you with a melee attack while this mantle is active, the attacker is sprayed with your vitae and must make a DR 2 Will save or suffer a -1 die penalty to their next attack roll as they are momentarily disgusted or unnerved. The +1 Armor persists for the full duration.

Ritual Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Sangromancers, Wardens of Balance)
Wraithwalk


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Movement/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Bonus Action
Cost: 1 SE
Range: Self
Duration: Until the end of your current turn.
Effect: You briefly shift your body's resonance towards the Spectral Realm. For the duration of your current turn's movement, you can move through other creatures' spaces (treat as difficult terrain) and your movement does not provoke attacks of opportunity. You cannot end your turn in another creature's space.
Life Channel


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Healing)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: Caster chooses to lose between 1 and (their Level / 2, rounded up) Hit Points.
Range: Touch
Target: One willing living creature (cannot be self).
Effect: You channel your own life force into another. The target regains Hit Points equal to twice the amount of HP you sacrificed. This is a direct transfer of vitality. You cannot reduce yourself below 1 HP using this ability.
Pillar Resonance


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Divination/Utility)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Self
Requirement: Must be performed while touching or in close proximity (within 30 feet) to one of the Pillars of Nosgoth (or a significant fragment thereof).
Effect: You attune yourself to the ancient energies of the Pillar. You gain a brief, symbolic vision or piece of forgotten lore directly related to that Pillar's aspect (e.g., Mind, Dimension, Conflict, Nature, Energy, Time, States, Death, Balance), its history, or a current major imbalance affecting it. Alternatively, instead of a vision, you may gain +2 dice on one single skill check related to understanding ancient history, the nature of the Pillars, or a specific problem tied to that Pillar's domain, to be used within the next hour.
Rite of Echoes


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Divination/Social)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Self
Requirement: Must be performed in a location where a significant conversation, emotional event, or decision took place within the last 24 hours.
Effect: You quiet your mind and extend your senses to perceive lingering emotional or psychic echoes. You gain insight into the strongest emotions felt in that place during the recent event and may catch fragments of conversations or intentions. This grants you +2 dice on your next single Social skill check (e.g., Persuasion, Insight, Deception) made within the next hour if it relates directly to the individuals or topic of the perceived echoes.
Soulweave


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Debuff/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: Two creatures you can see within range of each other (max 30 feet apart).
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You attempt to weave the targets' pain receptors or spiritual essences together. Both targets must make a DR 2 Will save.
If both fail: For the duration, whenever one of the linked creatures takes damage, the other linked creature suffers Soul damage equal to half the amount taken by the first (rounded down).
If one fails and one succeeds: The one who failed feels a distracting empathic link; they suffer a -1 die penalty on all attack rolls and skill checks for the duration, but no damage is transferred.
If both succeed: The spell fails.
Sanctify Blade


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Buff)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One non-magical weapon.
Duration: 1 hour.
Effect: You perform a rite of purification and blessing upon a weapon. For the duration, the weapon is considered magical for the purpose of overcoming damage resistances. Additionally, choose one:
Against Undead/Corrupted: The weapon deals +2 damage against Undead creatures or creatures with significant Corruption.
Defender's Edge: The wielder gains +1 die on attack rolls made to protect a designated ally (e.g., using a "protect" action if one exists, or when an enemy attacks an adjacent ally).
Ceremony of Sorrow


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Utility/Social)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Centered on caster (affects those participating)
Requirement: At least three participants (including caster) genuinely mourning a loss or contemplating a past tragedy.
Effect: Through a shared ceremony of grief or remembrance, participants find a measure of solace or shared understanding. Each participant can choose to remove 1 point of Soul Stress or sanity damage (if applicable). Alternatively, if the ceremony is focused on a specific deceased individual known to the participants, they may collectively recall one important forgotten detail or memory about that person (GM provides this).
Communion of Shadows


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Utility/Divination)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Self
Requirement: Must be performed in an area of deep shadow or magical darkness.
Effect: You merge your senses with the surrounding darkness, seeking information or passage. Choose one:
Shadow Whispers: Ask up to three yes/no questions about the immediate vicinity (e.g., "Are there hidden creatures within 30 feet?" "Is there a secret passage in this room?"). The shadows provide truthful, if sometimes unsettling, answers.
Path Unseen: For the next 10 minutes, you gain +2 dice on Stealth checks while in dim light or darkness, and you can sense the weakest points in mundane barriers (e.g., a loose stone, a thin section of wall) within 30 feet by touch.
Litany of Focus


Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Buff)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 1 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One willing creature (can be self).
Duration: 1 hour.
Effect: You recite a litany that hones mental acuity. For the duration, the target gains +1 die on all skill checks requiring concentration or fine detail (e.g., Focus checks to maintain spells, intricate Craft checks, Observation checks to spot minute details, Decipher checks).
Chrono-Ward Ritual 
Tier: Adept
Type: Ritual (Warding/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One object, doorway, or container no larger than 5-foot cube.
Duration: 24 hours or until triggered/dispelled.
Effect: You place a temporal ward on the target. You set a specific trigger condition related to time (e.g., "if this chest is opened before sunrise," "if this door is not passed through within the next hour," "if this alarm isn't reset every 10 minutes"). If the condition is met (or not met, as per your setting), a magical effect of Initiate tier that you know (like Glyph of Flame, or an audible alarm) is triggered. This allows for time-sensitive traps or warnings.


Forbidden Spells (Focus: Hylden Warlocks, Soul Reavers, Dreadblades)
Madness Surge


Tier: Adept (Hylden Warlock L3 Perk, but fits Adept Forbidden)
Type: Forbidden (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE (or 1 SE + 1 Sanity for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Effect: Target makes DR 2 Will save. Failure: Confused for 1 round (d6 roll: 1-2 does nothing, 3-4 random move, 5-6 random attack). Success: -1 die on next attack/skill check.
Spectral Lash


Tier: Adept
Type: Forbidden (Attack)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: 15 feet (line or one target)
Target: One creature or a 15-foot line.
Effect: You conjure a whip-like tendril of raw spectral energy.
Single Target: Make a ranged spell attack (Soul + Forbidden Knowledge). On a hit, deals 5 Soul damage (bypasses physical armor).
Line: Alternatively, lash out in a 15-foot line, 5 feet wide. Creatures in the line must make a DR 2 Evasion save or take 3 Soul damage.
Soul Lock


Tier: Adept
Type: Forbidden (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: 1 round.
Effect: You attempt to briefly sever the target's connection to restorative energies. The target must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failed save, for the next round, the target cannot regain Hit Points by any means, and cannot be resurrected if slain during this round.
Riftstep


Tier: Adept (Dreadblade L5 perk in their spellbook, but also fits Forbidden general list)
Type: Forbidden (Movement)
Casting Time: 1 Bonus Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Self
Effect: You tear a momentary rift in reality and step through it. Teleport up to 30 feet (6 squares) to an unoccupied space you can see. This movement does not provoke attacks of opportunity.
Fleshwarp


Tier: Adept (Dreadblade L5 perk in their spellbook, but also fits Forbidden general list)
Type: Forbidden (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One living creature.
Duration: 1 minute.
Effect: Your touch carries Hylden energies that grotesquely twist the target's flesh. The target must make a DR 2 Might save. On a failure, one of their limbs (your choice – arm or leg) becomes temporarily warped and dysfunctional.
Warped Arm: -2 dice penalty on attack rolls or skill checks made using that arm. Cannot hold items effectively with that hand.
Warped Leg: Movement speed is halved, and they suffer a -2 dice penalty on Evasion checks. The target can repeat the Might save at the end of each of their turns, ending the effect on a success.
Cursed Equation


Tier: Adept
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Mental)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE (or 1 SE + 1 Sanity for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature capable of complex thought.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You whisper a paradoxical Hylden mathematical formula or an impossible geometric truth into the target's mind. The target must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failure, their mind becomes ensnared by the insoluble problem. For the duration, they suffer a -2 dice penalty on all Will-based and Soul-based skill checks, and they cannot take Reactions. They can use their Action to make another Will save to break free.
Eyes Beyond


Tier: Adept
Type: Forbidden (Divination/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 2 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: Self
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: You temporarily replace your eyes with swirling pools of void or shimmering Hylden lenses, allowing you to perceive realities beyond normal sight. For the duration, you gain the ability to see perfectly in all forms of darkness (magical and mundane) up to 60 feet, you can see invisible creatures and objects, and you gain +1 die on Observation checks to pierce illusions or notice minute details related to planar disturbances. However, the horrifying vistas glimpsed cause you to suffer a -1 die penalty on all social interaction checks (Persuasion, Deception, Presence) for the duration due to your unsettling appearance and distracted demeanor.
Dread Chain


Tier: Adept
Type: Forbidden (Attack/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Effect: A chain made of solidified shadow and dreadstuff erupts from a point you choose and lashes at the target. Make a ranged spell attack (Soul + Forbidden Knowledge). On a hit, the target takes 3 Soul damage and must make a DR 2 Will save. On a failed save, the chain wraps around them, and they are Frightened of you for 1 minute. While frightened this way, if they try to move further away from you, the chain pulls taut, and their speed is halved. They can repeat the Will save at the end of each of their turns to break the chain and end the fear.
Unravel Mind


Tier: Adept
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Mental)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature with an intellect.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You assault the target's mental faculties with entropic thoughts. The target must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failure, their thoughts become jumbled and confused. For the duration, the target cannot cast spells, activate magical items, or use any ability that requires complex thought or concentration (GM discretion). They can still move and make basic attacks. They can repeat the Will save at the end of each of their turns, ending the effect on a success.
Omen Tether


Tier: Adept
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 SE
Range: 60 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: 1 hour.
Effect: You affix a subtle, invisible tether of ill omen to the target. The target makes a DR 2 Will save (they are unaware of the tether unless they have special senses). On a failure, for the duration, any time the target attempts an action where luck might play a significant role (e.g., a risky maneuver, a gamble, an important attack roll or saving throw at a critical moment - GM discretion), you can use your Reaction to impose a -2 dice penalty on that single roll. Once you use this reaction, the Omen Tether spell ends, its ill luck discharged. If the target succeeds on the initial save, the spell fails.


A Note on Costs and Mechanics for Expert Tier:
Soul Energy (SE) or Blood Points (BP) costs will typically be around 3, reflecting their increased power.
Damage values will be static and higher than Adept Tier.
Saving Throw DRs will generally be DR 3.
Casting Time will usually be 1 Action unless specified.

Expert Tier Spells (Level 11–15)
Glyph Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Wardens of Balance; Secondary: Soul Reavers, Hylden Warlocks)
Seal of Binding (Potent Glyph Version)


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Control/Area Denial)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (inscribe on a surface)
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute / 2 (rounded up).
Trigger: When a creature (not designated ally) enters a 10-foot radius area around the glyph.
Effect: When triggered, the glyph projects a field of binding energy in a 10-foot radius sphere for 3 rounds. Creatures within this area when it activates, or that enter it, must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failure, they are Immobilized (Bound) – their speed becomes 0 and they cannot be forcibly moved. They can use their Action to repeat the Might save, ending the effect on themselves on a success. Creatures that succeed the initial save or break free still treat the area as difficult terrain.
Glyph of Reflection


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Defense/Utility)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (often on self, an ally, or a shield)
Duration: 1 minute, or until triggered.
Effect: You inscribe a shimmering glyph that warps magical energies. The next time the bearer of the glyph is targeted by a single-target spell of Adept tier or lower that requires an attack roll or allows a saving throw, the glyph attempts to reflect it. The original caster must immediately make a Will save against your Glyphcasting Spell Save DR (e.g., 1 + Soul attribute + Glyphcasting skill). If the caster fails, the spell is reflected and targets them instead, using their original attack roll or forcing them to make the save against their own spell. If the caster succeeds, the spell functions normally on the bearer. The Glyph of Reflection is expended after one reflection attempt. It cannot reflect area of effect spells.
Glyph of Gravity


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Control/Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: When a creature (not designated ally) moves within 10 feet of the glyph.
Effect: The glyph unleashes a pulse of intensified gravity in a 10-foot radius sphere around itself for 1 round. Creatures in this area when it triggers, or who enter it, must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failed save, they are pulled Prone and their speed is halved for their next turn. Flying creatures that fail are pulled to the ground and knocked Prone. Even on a success, movement within the area costs double (difficult terrain). The glyph is then expended.
Glyph of Doom


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (often subtly on an enemy or an object they will interact with)
Duration: Until triggered (the next 3 sources of damage).
Trigger: When the creature bearing this subtle glyph (or the creature who first interacts with the marked object) takes damage from any source.
Effect: You inscribe a barely visible glyph of ill omen. When the creature bearing this glyph next takes damage, and for the two subsequent instances they take damage from any source (total 3 instances), that instance of damage is increased by an additional +3 damage. The glyph then fades. Only one such Glyph of Doom can be active on a creature at a time.
Glyph Lockdown


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Control/Area Denial)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 Soul Energy (SE)
Range (Placement): Touch (inscribe on a surface)
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: Will attribute / 2 (rounded up).
Trigger: When a creature (not designated ally) enters a 10-foot radius area around the glyph.
Effect: When triggered, the glyph projects a field of binding energy in a 10-foot radius sphere for 3 rounds. Creatures within this area when it activates, or that enter it, must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failure, they are Immobilized (Bound) – their speed becomes 0 and they cannot be forcibly moved. They can use their Action to repeat the Might save, ending the effect on themselves on a success. Creatures that succeed the initial save or break free still treat the area as difficult terrain.


Glyph of Collapse


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Damage/Utility - Structural)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (must be on a non-magical structure like a wall, ceiling, pillar, bridge)
Duration: Until triggered (can be command triggered by you if within 60ft, or by a set condition like "when X creature passes under").
Effect: You inscribe a glyph that destabilizes the integrity of the structure it's placed upon (up to a 10-foot section). When triggered, the affected section groans and crumbles. Creatures in or under the collapsing section (e.g., a 10x10ft area if it's a ceiling) must make a DR 3 Evasion save. On a failure, they take 6 Physical (Bludgeoning) damage and are knocked Prone and potentially Restrained by debris (DR 3 fury check to escape). On a success, they take -1 damage. If the save is successful they can choose to not go prone or take 1 less damage. The structure is damaged and may be impassable.
Glyph of Drowning (Aquatic Entrapment)


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Control/Damage - Situational)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (must be on a surface adjacent to or capable of holding a significant volume of liquid, or you provide the liquid via other means).
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: When a creature (not designated ally) moves within 5 feet of the glyph.
Effect: The glyph rapidly conjures or draws existing water (if available) to fill a 5-foot cube space around the triggering creature, attempting to engulf their head. The target must make a DR 3 Evasion save to avoid being caught. If they fail, they are enveloped in water and begin to suffocate (see system rules for suffocation). They must also make a DR 3 Might save at the start of each of their turns or be unable to speak or cast spells with verbal components. They can use an action to make a DR 3 fury check to break free from the localized water pressure and end the effect on themselves. The conjured water dissipates after 1 minute or if the target breaks free.
Glyph of Ruin (Debilitating Ward)


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Debuff/Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 1 minute after being triggered.
Trigger: When a creature (not designated ally) passes over or touches the glyph.
Effect: The glyph activates, creating a 15-foot radius aura of debilitating energy for 1 minute. All creatures designated as enemies by you at the time of casting who are within this aura suffer a -1 die penalty on all saving throws and their maximum Hit Points are reduced by 5 for as long as they remain in the aura and for 1 minute after leaving. This HP reduction cannot kill a creature but can bring it to 1 HP. Lost HP returns when the effect ends.
Glyph of Silence Field (Persistent Silence)


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Control/Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: You inscribe a glyph that generates a persistent 15-foot radius sphere of magical silence, centered on the glyph. This functions like the "Glyph of Silence" but is larger and maintained by concentration, allowing you to actively control its duration. No sound can be created within or pass through this sphere. Creatures and objects entirely inside are deafened and immune to thunder damage. Spells with verbal components cannot be cast from within or into the sphere. You can move the glyph (and thus the field) if it's on a portable object you carry, but this requires an Action each round to maintain control if moving it more than 5 feet.
Glyph of Echo Memory (Information Ward)


Tier: Expert
Type: Glyph (Utility/Divination)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 3 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (on an object or location)
Duration: 24 hours or until triggered.
Effect: You inscribe a glyph that records a short sensory impression. For the duration, the glyph silently observes its surroundings (sight and sound within 15 feet). You can set a trigger condition (e.g., "when someone says my name," "when this door is opened," "when a non-humanoid enters"). When triggered, the glyph stores a perfect "memory" of the 1 round immediately preceding and following the trigger (total 2 rounds of sensory data). You can access this stored memory by touching the glyph and using an Action to concentrate, replaying the sights and sounds in your mind. The glyph can only store one such memory; if triggered again, it overwrites the previous one.

Blood Spells (Focus: Sangromancers, Dreadblades)
Heartburst


Tier: Expert (Sangromancer L9 Perk, also on "Selected Spells")
Type: Blood (Attack/Execute)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 BP + 2 SE
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living creature with a heart.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: Target makes DR 3 Might save. Failure: If target has 20 HP or fewer, dies instantly. If >20 HP, suffers (Level x 2) Soul damage and is Stunned 1 round. Success: Suffers (Level) Soul damage.
Blood Cyclone


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (AoE Damage/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 BP
Range: Self
Area: 20-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Effect: You cause your own blood (or ambient spilled blood) to erupt outwards in a violent, razor-sharp vortex. All other creatures in the radius suffer 5 Physical (Slashing) damage and must make a DR 3 Might save or be pushed 10 feet (2 squares) directly away from you and knocked Prone. A successful save halves the damage and negates the push/prone. You are unharmed by your own cyclone.
Curse of Ash


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 2 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living creature.
Duration: 3 rounds.
Effect: You curse the target's blood to turn sluggish and ashen. The target must succeed on a DR 3 Might save. On a failure, for the duration, the target cannot regain Hit Points by any means. Furthermore, if any effect (magical or mundane) would cause them to regain HP, they instead suffer 2 Soul damage as their vital essence rebels. They can attempt the Might save again at the end of each of their turns to end the effect.
Crimson Surge


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (AoE Damage/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 BP
Range: Self
Area: 15-foot cone.
Effect: You expel a pressurized torrent of your own blood (or commandeered blood) in a cone. Creatures in the area suffer 6 Physical (Bludgeoning) damage and must succeed on a DR 3 Might save or be knocked Prone. A successful save halves the damage and negates the prone effect. You lose HP equal to half the BP cost of this spell (rounded up) when casting it, representing the significant vitae expended.
Arterial Harvest


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (Utility/Healing)
Casting Time: 1 Reaction (when a living creature with blood dies within 30 feet of you)
Cost: 1 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One recently deceased (within the last round) living creature.
Effect: You swiftly draw forth the potent residual vitae from a freshly slain foe. You regain Hit Points equal to the slain creature's Level or Challenge Rating (minimum 1 HP). Alternatively, instead of healing, you can choose to regain 2 BP. This ability can only be used once per slain creature.
Bloodlash Field


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (Area Control/Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 BP
Range: Target a 15-foot square area on the ground within 60 feet.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: The targeted area becomes slick with blood, and semi-sentient tendrils of blood lash out. The area is difficult terrain. Any creature (other than you) that starts its turn in the field or enters it takes 3 Physical (Slashing) damage and must make a DR 2 Evasion save or be pulled 5 feet in a direction of your choice within the field and have their speed reduced to 0 until the start of their next turn (effectively Rooted by the lashes).
Viscera Torrent


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (Attack/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 BP (and you lose 2 HP)
Range: 30-foot cone.
Effect: You vomit forth a torrent of caustic blood and semi-digested vitae. Creatures in the cone suffer 4 Soul damage and must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failed save, they are also Poisoned (suffer -1 die on attacks and skill checks, save ends at end of their turn) for 1 minute and are covered in gore, suffering a -2 dice penalty to Stealth checks until cleaned. On a success, they take 1 less damage. On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.


Crimson Shackle


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You conjure shackles of hardened blood that fly towards the target. Make a ranged spell attack (Soul + Rituals). On a hit, the target is Restrained. While Restrained, its speed is 0, and it has a -2 dice penalty on attack rolls and Evasion checks. As an Action, the creature can make a DR 3 fury check to break the shackles.
Bone Siphon


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (Damage/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 BP
Range: Touch
Target: One living creature with a skeletal structure.
Effect: You touch the target and attempt to draw out the vital essence from their bones. The target must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failed save, they suffer 5 Soul damage and their bones become brittle for 1 minute; any bludgeoning or slashing damage they take during this time is increased by +2, and they suffer a -1 die penalty to checks resisting being knocked Prone. On a successful save, they take  On a success, they take 1 less damage. On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.
.
Bloodrite Brand


Tier: Expert
Type: Blood (Utility/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Minute (ritualistic branding)
Cost: 3 BP (and the target takes 1 irreducible damage)
Range: Touch
Target: One willing or incapacitated/Restrained creature.
Duration: Permanent until magically removed (e.g., by a Master tier dispel or specific counter-ritual).
Effect: You sear a potent, blood-fueled brand into the target's flesh. Choose one effect:
Brand of Fealty: If the target willingly accepted the brand, you are always aware of their general direction and emotional state as long as they are on the same plane. They gain +1 die on saves against domination by anyone but you.
Brand of Outcast: The target is marked as an enemy of your bloodline or creed. Creatures allied with you or who recognize the brand become hostile or unfriendly towards the target. The target also suffers a -1 die penalty on Persuasion checks against those who recognize the brand's meaning.
Brand of Suffering: The target feels a constant, dull ache from the brand. They have a -1 die penalty on checks to maintain concentration and on checks to resist pain or fear.

Expert Ritual Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Sangromancers, Wardens of Balance) (All 10 of these are new designs as "Selected Spells" did not cover Expert Rituals)
Past’s Reflection Rite


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Divination)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes.
Cost: 3 SE.
Range: Self (focus on a past event or decision).
Effect: You meditate deeply on a significant past event or decision you or someone you know made (within the last month). You receive a clearer vision of the immediate alternative outcomes that could have occurred had a different choice been made at a key juncture of that event. This provides insight into "what might have been" and can reveal hidden factors or immediate consequences of alternate paths. It does not change the past but grants understanding. You may ask the GM two specific questions about these immediate alternative outcomes, answered insightfully but not necessarily with full clarity of distant futures


Temporal Delay (Warden L9 Perk is "Judgment Wheel", L6 is Echo of Fate, L5 is Command Cycle. "Temporal Delay" is explicit for Warden at Expert tier in their class spellbook.)


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Utility/Control - Strategic)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 3 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One object, mechanism, or a willing/incapacitated creature.
Duration: Up to 1 hour, or until triggered.
Effect: You imbue the target with a temporal "drag."
Object/Mechanism: Its next activation or a single designated process it undergoes (e.g., a trap springing, a door opening, a potion taking effect) is delayed by a number of rounds you choose, up to your Will attribute (max 5 rounds for this tier), after it would normally occur.
Creature: The willing/incapacitated creature makes its next initiative roll with a -3 dice penalty (effectively ensuring it acts later in the round). Alternatively, its next single spell or ability with a casting/activation time of 1 Action or less has its effects delayed, taking place 1 round after it was initiated. (This version is more powerful than the Chrono Sigil glyph from Adept).
Hauntwalker


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Summoning/Utility)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 3 SE, plus an offering of value to spirits (e.g., spilled blood, a cherished memory psychically projected, rare incense).
Range: Self
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 hour.
Effect: You attempt to call forth a minor, unbound spirit (a "haunt" or "echo") from the Spectral Realm that is tied to your current location. If successful (DR 2 Soul + Rituals check, DR increases in areas with weak spectral presence), a mostly invisible, intangible spirit appears and begrudgingly assists you. It can:
Act as a scout within 120 feet, reporting back vague impressions (emotions, presence of life/undeath, sounds).
Cause minor physical disturbances (knock over small objects, create cold spots, whisper faint sounds) to create a distraction (granting +1 die to one Stealth or Deception check for you or an ally).
Provide one piece of cryptic information about the history of the location it's tied to. The spirit is not a combatant and flees if threatened.
Sanctify Ground


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Warding/Consecration)
Casting Time: 1 Hour
Cost: 4 SE, plus rare incense and holy symbols (if applicable to caster's faith/source of power).
Range: Creates a 30-foot radius area of consecrated ground around a central point you touch.
Duration: 24 hours.
Effect: The area becomes hallowed ground. Undead, Fiends, and creatures with significant Corruption find the area abhorrent. Such creatures entering the area or starting their turn there suffer 3 Radiant or Soul damage (caster chooses type during ritual) and suffer a -1 die penalty on all attack rolls while within it. Allies within the area gain +1 die on saving throws against fear effects and effects originating from Undead/Corrupted creatures. This ritual cannot be performed on ground already desecrated by powerful opposing forces unless that desecration is first cleansed.
Soul Anchor


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Warding/Protection)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 3 SE
Range: Touch
Target: One willing creature (can be self).
Duration: Until the next long rest, or until triggered.
Effect: You weave a protective ward around the target's soul, anchoring it more firmly to their body and to life. The next time the target would be reduced to 0 Hit Points (but not killed outright by massive damage), they are instead reduced to 1 HP, and the Soul Anchor is discharged. Additionally, for the duration, the target gains +2 dice on any saving throw against an effect that would directly attack, drain, or trap their soul (e.g., Nether Binding, possession attempts).
Ritual of Awakening (For objects or dormant entities)


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Utility/Summoning)
Casting Time: 1 Hour
Cost: 4 SE, plus specific rare components related to what is being awakened (GM discretion).
Range: Touch
Target: A dormant magical item, a specially prepared construct, or a place where a minor nature spirit or ancestral guardian is known to slumber.
Effect: You perform a lengthy ritual to stir a latent power or consciousness.
Magical Item: A mundane item can be imbued with a minor, temporary magical property (e.g., a sword deals +1 damage for 1 hour, a cloak grants +1 die to Stealth for 1 hour). A dormant magical item might have one of its lesser powers awakened or identified. (DR 3 Soul + Rituals check for success).
Construct: A small, simple construct (e.g., a stone guardian the size of a dog) can be animated to serve for 24 hours with basic commands. (Requires specific schematics or a suitable vessel).
Spirit: You might awaken a minor nature or guardian spirit bound to a place, making it willing to communicate or perform one small favor if treated with respect. (DR 3 Soul + Persuasion or Nature check). Success is not guaranteed and depends on the nature of the target and the ritual's execution.
Beckon of the Deep (Summoning from watery/abyssal depths)


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Summoning)
Casting Time: 30 Minutes
Cost: 4 SE, and a sacrifice (e.g., something valuable dropped into deep water, or a personal risk).
Range: Must be performed near a significant body of water (lake, ocean, deep well) or a known rift to a watery/abyssal plane.
Duration: The summoned creature remains for up to 1 hour or until its task is done/it is dismissed or defeated.
Effect: You attempt to call forth a creature from the depths. Make a Soul + Rituals check (DR 3 for a minor elemental or strange beast, DR 4 for something more potent or intelligent like a water weird or a minor abyssal entity). On a success, a creature appropriate to the environment and your call appears. It is not inherently friendly and may require persuasion, a bargain, or magical compulsion (like Seal of Binding) to obey. Failure might result in nothing, or a hostile, uncontrolled entity. This is a risky summoning.
Spiritforge Circle (Crafting/Enchanting Aid)


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Utility/Crafting)
Casting Time: 1 Hour (to create the circle)
Cost: 3 SE, plus specially inscribed chalks or powdered gems.
Range: Creates a 10-foot radius circle on the ground.
Duration: The circle remains empowered for 8 hours.
Effect: You create a temporary sacred space ideal for magical crafting or imbuing items. Any character performing Craft checks within this circle to create magical items, potions, or repair complex magical constructs gains +2 dice on their Craft skill checks. Additionally, the time required for such crafting might be reduced by 10-25% (GM discretion). The circle can also be used as a focus for enchanting weapons or armor with minor temporary properties if the system allows for such item creation.
Oracle's Insight (More potent than Initiate's Blind Insight)


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Divination)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 3 SE
Range: Self
Effect: You enter a deep trance, seeking profound insight into a specific problem, mystery, or future decision. You may ask the GM up to three carefully worded questions related to this single topic. The GM will provide truthful, insightful, but potentially symbolic or allegorical answers. Unlike the Initiate "Blind Insight," this ritual does not inherently cause Sanity damage, but the truths revealed can still be unsettling. The clarity of the answers may depend on the number of successes achieved on a DR 2 Soul + Insight check made at the end of the ritual. (1 success = cryptic clues; 2 successes = clearer insights; 3+ successes = direct and useful information, possibly including a minor premonition of a likely outcome).
Memory Tomb (Store/Protect Memories)


Tier: Expert
Type: Ritual (Utility/Warding)
Casting Time: 1 Hour
Cost: 4 SE, plus a specially prepared psychic repository (e.g., a flawless crystal, a specially treated skull, a lead-lined box).
Range: Touch
Target: One willing creature (can be self) or the fresh corpse of a creature that died within the hour.
Duration: The memory is stored indefinitely until retrieved or the repository is destroyed/dispelled.
Effect: You carefully extract a specific set of memories (e.g., "everything about the Hylden Gate," "the face of my attacker," "the formula for this potion") from the target and store them within the repository.
From Willing Creature: The target loses access to those specific memories for as long as they are stored (they know there's a gap but can't recall the details). They can retrieve them by performing a counter-ritual or if you release them. This protects memories from magical theft or mental alteration.
From Corpse: You extract a lingering psychic imprint of one significant memory from the deceased (GM determines clarity). The repository is magically sealed (DR 3 to open by magical force or Thievery if not the caster). Only the original caster (or someone they teach the method to) can easily retrieve the memories.

Expert Forbidden Spells (Focus: Hylden Warlocks, Soul Reavers, Dreadblades)
Rift Pulse


Tier: Expert
Type: Forbidden (Attack/Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range: Self
Area: 20-foot line, 5 feet wide.
Effect: You unleash a brief, tearing pulse of raw dimensional energy along a line. Creatures in the line suffer 5 Void damage (bypasses all armor/resistance, cannot be healed normally, target suffers -2 dice on next DR save) and must make a DR 3 Might save or be pushed 10 feet directly away from you along the line's path. A weak, shimmering (and unsettling) after-image of a rift hangs in the air for 1 round where the pulse travelled.  On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.
Soul Fracture


Tier: Expert (Previously listed in "Selected Spells" for Hylden Warlock, also fits Soul Reaver)
Type: Forbidden (Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You attempt to violently splinter a fragment of the target's soul. The target must make a DR 3 Soul save. On a failed save, for the duration, the target suffers a -2 dice penalty on all Will and Soul attribute checks and saving throws. Furthermore, they cannot benefit from any magical effects that enhance their Soul or Will (like temporary bonuses to those attributes) and any Soul Energy they spend on spells or abilities is increased by +1 (to a maximum of double the original cost). If the target is reduced to 0 HP while under this effect, their soul shatters more severely, and they cannot be resurrected by any means short of Master tier magic or divine intervention.
Dark Reflection (Illusory Duplicate with a Twist)


Tier: Expert
Type: Forbidden (Illusion/Summoning)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range: Self
Duration: 1 minute or until destroyed.
Effect: You pull a shadowy, malevolent reflection of yourself from a dark dimension or your own psyche. This Dark Reflection appears adjacent to you. It has HP equal to your own, uses your DV, but has 0 Armor and is vulnerable to Radiant damage. It acts on your turn, and you can command it (Bonus Action) to take one Action from this list:
Attack: Mimic one of your melee or ranged attacks (using your stats but dealing Soul damage instead of physical, and damage is -2 of your normal).
Menace: Impose a -1 die penalty on the attack rolls of one enemy adjacent to it until your next turn.
Shadowy Step: Teleport up to 15 feet to an unoccupied shadowy space. If the Dark Reflection is destroyed, you take 2 Soul Stress as the link is violently broken. You can only have one Dark Reflection active.
Sanity Spike


Tier: Expert (Previously listed in "Selected Spells")
Type: Forbidden (Attack/Mental)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature with a mind.
Effect: You project a shard of pure, alien dread into the target's mind. The target suffers 4 Soul damage (bypassing armor) and must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failed save, they also gain 1 Corruption Die (if they use that system) or suffer a temporary bout of intense paranoia for 1 round (they cannot distinguish friend from foe and may attack the nearest creature or cower, GM choice).
Oblivion Whisper


Tier: Expert (Previously listed in "Selected Spells")
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Mental)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: Touch or 15 feet (if projected whisper).
Target: One creature.
Duration: See effect.
Effect: You whisper a fragment of knowledge so antithetical to reality or sanity that it begins to unravel the target's mind or memories. The target must make a DR 3 Will save.
On a failed save: Choose one:
Forget Spell: The target forgets one spell they know of Adept tier or lower (your choice if you know their spells, otherwise random) for 24 hours. They cannot prepare or cast it.
Erase Clue: The target forgets one specific, recent piece of information or a clue they possess (e.g., "the password is...," "the location of the hidden stash is..."). You must have a general idea of the information you are trying to make them forget. This memory is lost for at least 24 hours, possibly longer (GM discretion).
On a successful save: The target shudders but retains their knowledge, though they might feel a moment of profound unease.
Descent of Teeth (Summoning/Attack)


Tier: Expert
Type: Forbidden (Summoning/Area Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range: Target a 10-foot radius area within 60 feet.
Duration: Instantaneous.
Effect: You open a momentary pinhole to a realm of endless hunger. A shower of spectral, gnashing teeth rains down upon the area. Creatures in the area suffer 5 Soul damage (bypasses armor) and must make a DR 3 Evasion save. Those who fail also begin Bleeding (2 damage/round for 2 rounds) from countless tiny, spectral bites.  On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take less damage or not suffer other effects.


Cacophonic Flare (Sensory Assault)


Tier: Expert
Type: Forbidden (Area Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: Self
Area: 20-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Duration: Instantaneous.
Effect: You unleash a burst of discordant sounds from beyond the veil and a flash of impossible, sickening colors. All other creatures in the radius must make two DR 3 Will saves:
First Save (vs. Sound): Failure means they are Deafened for 1 minute and Stunned for 1 round.
Second Save (vs. Sight): Failure means they are Blinded for 1 minute and suffer a -1 die penalty to all Will-based checks for the same duration. A creature can be affected by both if they fail both saves.
Rotmind Rift (Mental Corruption)


Tier: Expert
Type: Forbidden (Debuff/Mental)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE (and 1 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature with an intellect.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You attempt to open a small fissure in the target's sanity, allowing alien thoughts and corrupting whispers to seep in. The target must make a DR 3 Will save. On a failure, their mind begins to decay. Each round they remain affected, at the start of their turn, they suffer 1 Soul Stress (or Sanity damage) and must roll a d6:
1-2: Intense Paranoia: They perceive allies as dire threats and may act against them.
3-4: Debilitating Hallucinations: They suffer a -2 dice penalty to all Perception checks and attack rolls as their senses betray them.
5-6: Overwhelming Dread: They are Frightened and must use their action to flee from any perceived source of danger (which could be anything or anyone). The target can attempt a new Will save at the end of each of its turns to end the effect.
Starving Veil (Life/Soul Drain Aura)


Tier: Expert
Type: Forbidden (Area Damage/Self-Buff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 3 SE
Range: Self
Area: 15-foot radius aura around you.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You draw the veil between worlds partially around you, creating an aura that leeches life and soul. Any creature (other than you) that starts its turn within the aura or enters it for the first time on a turn suffers 2 Soul damage. For each creature damaged this way, you regain 1 Hit Point (to a maximum of your Soul attribute in HP per round from this spell). This aura is visibly unsettling, like a heat haze made of shadow.
Fatebind Curse (Destiny Manipulation)


Tier: Expert
Type: Forbidden (Debuff)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes (ritualistic curse)
Cost: 4 SE (and 2 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock), plus a personal item from the target or a sympathetic link.
Range: Touch (the item/link)
Target: One creature whose item/link you possess.
Duration: Until dispelled by Master tier magic or a specific counter-curse, or a significant event breaks the curse (GM discretion).
Effect: You weave a powerful curse into the target's destiny. The target must make a DR 4 Will save (they make this save when the curse first attempts to affect them significantly, or the GM might roll it secretly). On a failure, the target is "fate-bound."
Once per game session, the GM can choose to have the fate-bound target automatically fail one attack roll, skill check, or saving throw they make (no roll allowed, it just fails).
Alternatively, once per game session, the GM can dictate that one attack roll made against the fate-bound target is an automatic critical hit. The GM should use this sparingly to represent moments where fate turns decisively against the target. The target might feel an unnatural sense of dread or misfortune. Removing this curse should be a significant undertaking.
A Note on Costs and Mechanics for Master Tier:
Soul Energy (SE) or Blood Points (BP) costs will typically be 4 or 5+, reflecting their immense power. Some might have additional costs (e.g., rare components, significant HP/Sanity sacrifice, or longer casting times).
Damage values will be static and significantly higher than Expert Tier.
Saving Throw DRs will generally be DR 3, DR 4, or even higher for truly epic effects.
Effects will be potent, potentially altering the battlefield, impacting multiple targets decisively, or having significant narrative consequences.

Master Tier Spells (Level 16–20)
Glyph Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Wardens of Balance; Secondary: Soul Reavers, Hylden Warlocks)
Nexus Glyph


Tier: Master (Glyph Seeker L9 Perk, here as a generally accessible Master spell)
Type: Glyph (Utility/Hybrid)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered. Max active: 1.
Effect: You inscribe a highly complex glyph that acts as a conduit for multiple magical energies. When casting, choose up to three different Initiate or Adept tier glyph spells you know. This Nexus Glyph an hold the patterns of all three. When the Nexus Glyph is triggered (you set one common trigger condition for all effects), all three stored glyph effects activate simultaneously, centered on the Nexus Glyph's location or affecting the triggering creature as appropriate. The individual effects use their normal DRs and damage values.
Glyph Vortex


Tier: Master (Soul Reaver Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Glyph (Control/Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 1 minute, or until triggered.
Trigger: Command (as a Bonus Action by you if within 60 feet) or when a creature (not designated ally) moves within 10 feet.
Effect: When triggered, the glyph erupts into a swirling vortex of arcane energy in a 15-foot radius sphere for 3 rounds. Creatures starting their turn in the vortex or entering it must make a DR 3 Might save. On a failure, they are pulled 10 feet towards the glyph's center and take 4 Soul damage (bypasses armor).  On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage or not suffer other effects.

Glyph of Unmaking


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Anti-Magic/Area Dispel)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: Instantaneous upon triggering.
Trigger: Command (as a Bonus Action by you if within 60 feet).
Effect: When triggered, the glyph releases a powerful wave of unravelling energy in a 30-foot radius sphere. All active magical effects (spells, wards, ongoing glyphs) of Expert tier or lower within the area are instantly dispelled. Effects of Master tier require you to make an opposed Soul + Glyphcasting check against the effect's original caster or a DR 4 if no caster is present. This glyph cannot destroy artifacts but may temporarily suppress their lesser active enchantments for 1d4 rounds on a successful check.
Sanctum Glyph


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Warding/Protection)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 5 SE
Range (Placement): Touch (typically on the entrance or center of a room/area up to 30x30 feet)
Duration: 24 hours or until dispelled.
Effect: You inscribe a master ward of sanctuary. Within the warded area:
Allies gain +1 to their Defense Value (DV) and +1 die on all saving throws.
No creature can be magically scryed upon from outside the area.
Attempts to magically teleport into or out of the area automatically fail unless the creature attempting it succeeds on a DR 4 Will save. You can designate a password that allows creatures knowing it to bypass the teleportation restriction.
Glyph Nexus Gate


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Utility/Travel)
Casting Time: 1 Hour (to inscribe both glyphs)
Cost: 5 SE, plus rare incense and a small, perfectly cut gemstone for each glyph.
Range (Placement): You inscribe two intricate glyphs on fixed surfaces. These two glyphs can be on different planes of existence or up to any distance apart on the same plane, but you must have personally visited both locations.
Duration: The gate network remains active for 1 week, or until one glyph is destroyed/dispelled.
Effect: The two glyphs become linked, creating a permanent (for the duration) magical gateway. Any creature stepping into one glyph is instantly transported to the location of the other glyph. The portal is one-way unless two sets of Glyph Nexus Gates are established. Each gate can transport up to 10 Medium-sized creatures per hour. You are always aware if a gate is used.
Glyph of Obliteration


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Damage/Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: Command (Bonus Action, within 60 feet) or when a creature you designate as hostile enters within 15 feet.
Effect: When triggered, the glyph implodes and then explodes with devastating force in a 20-foot radius sphere. Creatures in the area suffer 8 damage of a chosen energy type (Fire, Frost, Electrical, or Soul – chosen when casting) and are pushed to the edge of the blast radius. A DR 4 Evasion save halves the damage and negates the push. The force is enough to demolish non-magical structures within the radius.
Glyph of Judgment


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Control/Debuff - Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 1 minute after triggering.
Trigger: When a creature you designate as hostile performs an aggressive action (attacks, casts a harmful spell) within 30 feet of the glyph.
Effect: The glyph activates, creating a 30-foot radius aura of divine or cosmic judgment. For the duration, any creature within the aura that attempts to deal damage to another creature must first make a DR 3 Will save. If they fail, their attack or ability still functions, but they themselves suffer Soul damage equal to half the damage they dealt to their target, as their harmful intent is judged and partially reflected.
Eternal Glyph Lock


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Warding)
Casting Time: 1 Hour
Cost: 5 SE, plus a piece of a meteoritic iron.
Range (Placement): Touch (on a door, chest, portal, or other closable/sealable object)
Duration: Permanent until dispelled by Master tier magic or a specific counter-ritual.
Effect: You inscribe an incredibly potent magical lock. The locked object cannot be opened by any non-magical means (including physical force or mundane lockpicking tools). Attempts to open it with magic (e.g., "Knock" spells, teleportation past it) require an opposed check against your original Soul + Glyphcasting roll (or a flat DR 5 if no opposition is possible). Failure typically triggers a powerful defensive ward you can imbue when casting (e.g., deals 5 Soul damage to the interlopper, or teleports them 100 feet away). You (and anyone you give a unique pass-symbol to) can bypass the lock freely.
Glyph of Time Sever


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Control/Area - Temporal)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 3 rounds after triggering.
Trigger: Command (Bonus Action, within 60 feet) or when a hostile creature moves within 10 feet.
Effect: The glyph unleashes a wave of temporal distortion in a 15-foot radius sphere. Creatures designated as enemies by you within this area when it activates or that enter it must make a DR 4 Will save. On a failure, they are caught in a severe time dilation. For the duration:
They can only take EITHER an Action OR a Move action each turn (not both).
They cannot take Bonus Actions or Reactions.
Their speed is halved. On a success, they are only slowed (speed halved) for 1 round.
Glyph of Unraveling


Tier: Master
Type: Glyph (Debuff/Damage - Anti-Magic)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE
Range (Placement): Touch
Duration: 10 minutes, or until triggered.
Trigger: When a creature casts a spell or activates a magical item while within 10 feet of the glyph.
Effect: The glyph flares, attempting to unravel the magical energies. The triggering creature must make a DR 3 Will save.
Failure: Their spell/ability fails, resources spent are lost, AND they suffer 4 Soul damage as their own magic backlashes. Any active beneficial spell effects of Adept tier or lower on them immediately end.
Success: Their spell/ability functions, but they still suffer 2 Soul damage from the partial disruption. The glyph is then expended.

Blood Spells (Focus: Sangromancers, Dreadblades)
Hemodominate


Tier: Master (Sangromancer L10 Perk, here as a generally accessible Master spell)
Type: Blood (Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 Blood Points (BP)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One living, Bleeding creature with an intellect.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Frequency: Once per long rest.
Effect: Target makes DR 3 Will save. Failure: Full mental control. Success: Target immune for 24 hours


Blood Resurrection


Tier: Master (Sangromancer Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Blood (Healing/Ritual)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 5 BP, caster permanently loses 1 maximum HP (or takes a significant, lasting wound).
Range: Touch
Target: The corpse of a humanoid creature that has been dead for no more than 1 day and whose soul is willing and able to return (GM discretion).
Effect: You perform a dark and taxing ritual, infusing the corpse with potent vitae and your own life essence to recall its spirit and mend its form. The target returns to life with half its maximum Hit Points. This ritual cannot restore missing body parts or cure magical diseases/curses unless those were the cause of death and the ritual specifically addresses them. This is a draining act, and using it more than once a month might have severe consequences for the caster (GM discretion).
Wound Reversal


Tier: Master
Type: Blood (Healing/Utility - Risky)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 BP
Range: 30 feet
Target: Two living creatures you can see (one can be yourself).
Effect: You attempt to magically swap the current state of vitality between two creatures by manipulating their blood and life force. Both targets must make a DR 3 Might save.
If both fail (or one is willing and the other fails): Their current Hit Point totals are swapped. (E.g., if Target A has 10 HP and Target B has 50 HP, Target A now has 50 HP and Target B has 10 HP). This cannot raise a creature above its maximum HP (excess is lost).
If one fails and the other succeeds: The one who failed takes 4 Soul damage, and the one who succeeded gains 4 Temporary HP.
If both succeed (or one is unwilling and succeeds): The spell fails, but both targets feel a painful jolt and take 2 Soul damage. This is complex and can be unpredictable.
Sanguine Swarm


Tier: Master
Type: Blood (Summoning/Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 BP
Range: Conjure within 30 feet, swarm moves from there.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You animate a large volume of spilled blood (or conjure it from your own vitae, losing 5 HP) into a terrifying Swarm of Blood Leeches (Large size swarm). This swarm acts on your command (Bonus Action).
Swarm Stats: HP (Caster Level x 3), DV 2, Speed 20ft fly. Immune to being Prone, Restrained by non-magical means. Vulnerable to Radiant and Fire.
Swarm Attack (Action): Occupies target's space. Target suffers 5 Soul damage (bypasses armor) and must make a DR 3 Will save or be Frightened for 1 round. A creature reduced to 0 HP by the swarm is exsanguinated, its body shriveling.
Crimson Reaping


Tier: Master (Sangromancer Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Blood (Damage/Execute - AoE)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 BP
Range: Self
Area: 15-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Effect: You unleash an explosive wave of razor-sharp blood shards and soul-draining tendrils. All other creatures in the radius suffer 6 Soul damage (bypasses armor) and begin Bleeding (2 damage/round for 3 rounds). Each target can make a DR 3 Evasion save.  On a successful save, take -1 damage. On each additional successful save they can take -1 damage per success or not suffer other effects.


Execute: Any creature in the area already below 25% of its maximum HP that fails its save against this spell is instantly slain as its remaining vitae is violently torn from its body.
Throne of Veins


Tier: Master
Type: Blood (Utility/Control - Self)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 BP
Range: Self
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: You draw upon nearby sources of blood (spilled, or subtly from nearby insignificant creatures like vermin, or from yourself at a trickle) to weave a grotesque, pulsating throne of living blood beneath you (or around you if you prefer to stand). While seated upon or within this throne:
You gain +2 Armor from the shifting, hardened blood.
You can use a Bonus Action to send out a grasping blood tendril (range 15 feet). Make a melee spell attack (Soul + Rituals). On a hit, you can pull one Medium or smaller creature 10 feet closer to you OR knock them Prone.
Your Blood spell save DRs are increased by +1. The throne can be destroyed (AC 3, HP 30). If destroyed, the spell ends.
Blood Oblivion


Tier: Master
Type: Blood (Debuff/Mental - Single Target)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 BP (and 1 sanity damage for caster)
Range: Touch
Target: One living creature.
Duration: Permanent until potent magic restores the memories.
Effect: You touch a creature and attempt to erase its identity by flooding its mind and blood with chaotic, memory-destroying energies. The target must make a DR 4 Will save.
Failure: The target loses all personal memories, including who they are, their skills (they lose all skill ranks above 0, though not class abilities themselves), and their relationships. They retain basic motor functions and language but are essentially a blank slate. This is a profound and often cruel act.
Success: The target suffers 5 Soul damage and is Stunned for 1 round from the psychic assault.
Crimson Godseed (Vampiric Transformation/Empowerment)


Tier: Master
Type: Blood (Ritual - Self/Other)
Casting Time: 1 Hour (requires a living, willing, or helpless humanoid sacrifice)
Cost: 5 BP, plus the life of the sacrifice, and the caster permanently reduces their max HP by 3.
Range: Touch
Target: Self or one willing humanoid creature.
Effect: Through a dark ritual involving the full exsanguination of a humanoid sacrifice and the infusion of potent, magically altered blood, the target undergoes a nascent vampiric transformation (or if already vampire, gains a significant boost in power).
Non-Vampire to Proto-Vampire: Gains basic vampiric traits (e.g., fangs, claws dealing 3 damage, +1 to Might, Darkvision, a thirst for blood, vulnerability to sunlight/holy symbols). They do not immediately gain levels in a vampire class but are set on that path.
Existing Vampire: Gains a permanent +1 to either their Blood or Fury attribute (to a max of +1 above their normal racial/class cap) OR learns one Adept-tier Blood spell from any list as an innate ability usable once per long rest. This ritual is a major transgression and will attract negative attention from forces of order.
Sanguine Eclipse (Area Denial/Debuff)


Tier: Master
Type: Blood
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 BP
Range: Target a point within 120 feet.
Area: Creates a 30-foot radius, 60-foot high cylinder of swirling, shadowy blood-mist.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: The area becomes heavily obscured by the blood-mist, even to darkvision. Living creatures (other than the caster) that start their turn in the mist or enter it feel their vitality drain, suffering 3 Soul damage and must make a DR 3 Might save or suffer one level of exhaustion (if your system uses exhaustion; otherwise, -1 die to all actions for 1 round). Any magical light source of Adept tier or lower brought into the area is extinguished. Healing magic cast within or into the area has its effectiveness halved.
Vital Dominion


Tier: Master
Type: Blood (Control - Self/Aura)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 BP
Range: Self
Area: 30-foot radius aura.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You exert an overwhelming pressure on the life force of those around you. When you activate this, and as a Bonus Action on subsequent turns, choose one effect to dominate the aura:
Siphon Vigor: Enemies in the aura suffer -1 die to Might and Fury based checks and saves. You regain 1 BP at the start of your turn for each enemy in the aura (max 3 BP/round).
Accelerate Decay: Enemies in the aura cannot regain HP. Any Bleeding effect on them deals +1 damage per round.
Puppet Dance: Any creature in the aura currently under the effect of your Blood Puppet or Hemodominate is controlled by you as a free action (not requiring your Bonus Action to direct basic actions).

Master Ritual Spells (Focus: Glyph Seekers, Sangromancers, Wardens of Balance) (All 10 of these are new designs as "Selected Spells" did not cover Master Rituals)
Chrono Collapse


Tier: Master (Warden Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Ritual (Control - Area)
Casting Time: 1 Minute
Cost: 5 SE
Range: Target a point within 120 feet.
Area: 20-foot radius sphere.
Duration: 3 rounds.
Effect: You perform a ritual that destabilizes the flow of time in a localized area. All creatures (friend or foe, unless immune like the Warden) within the sphere when it's created, or who enter it, must make a DR 4 Will save.
Failure: They are caught in a severe temporal distortion. On their turn, they can EITHER take an Action, OR a Bonus Action, OR a Move action (only one of the three). They cannot take Reactions.
Success: They can act normally but their speed is halved while in the area. The area shimmers with visible temporal distortions.
Eternal Sigil


Tier: Master
Type: Ritual (Warding)
Casting Time: 1 Hour
Cost: 5 SE, plus rare components (e.g., diamond dust, a drop of elemental essence).
Range: Touch
Target: An object or a location up to a 10-foot cube.
Duration: Permanent until dispelled by Master tier magic or a specific counter-ritual.
Effect: You inscribe a complex series of sigils that create a powerful, lasting ward. Choose one major effect when casting:
Unbreachable Ward: The target object/area cannot be physically broken or passed through by creatures of Expert tier power or less (GM discretion on what constitutes this, e.g., creatures of a certain CR or level). Higher power creatures must succeed on a DR 5 fury check to breach it.
Dimensional Lock: No creature or effect can teleport, phase, or use extra-planar travel into or out of the warded area.
Elemental Bane: Choose one energy type (Fire, Frost, Electrical, Soul, etc.). Creatures of that elemental subtype, or those primarily using that energy, cannot enter the area and suffer 5 damage of an opposing type (GM choice) if they attempt to. Spells of the chosen energy type cannot be cast into or out of the area.
Realmshift


Tier: Master
Type: Ritual (Utility/Environmental)
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 5 SE
Range: Self
Area: 60-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: You temporarily overlay a portion of another plane of existence (typically the Spectral Realm, but with GM approval, potentially a sliver of a Hylden-touched dimension or a place of elemental energy) onto your current location.
Spectral Overlay: The area becomes coterminous with the Spectral Realm. Material creatures can see and interact with spectral entities/objects, and vice-versa. Rules for both realms apply. Soul/Spiritual damage might be amplified.
Other Plane (GM Dependant): May introduce alien physics, environmental hazards, or strange creatures. This is highly taxing and can be dangerous if control is lost or the wrong entities are drawn through. Requires a DR 3 Soul + Rituals check to maintain stability each minute.
Invocation of Chains (Master Version)


Tier: Master (Warden Explicit Spellbook Spell - presumably a more powerful version than any lesser binding)
Type: Ritual (Control - Area)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE
Range: Target a point within 60 feet.
Area: Chains erupt from the ground in a 20-foot radius.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: All hostile creatures in the area when the chains appear, or that enter it, must make a DR 3 Evasion save. On a failure, they are Restrained by glowing chains of pure law or judgment. While Restrained, they also cannot use any magical abilities that target creatures outside of the chained area. A creature can use its Action to make a DR 4 fury check to break its own chains or help another.
Last Rite of Balance


Tier: Master (Warden Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Ritual (Cleansing/Restoration - Area)
Casting Time: 1 Hour
Cost: 5 SE, plus significant personal sacrifice (e.g., the Warden takes 2 levels of Exhaustion, or permanently reduces one attribute by 1 until a quest is fulfilled to restore it).
Range: A desecrated or heavily unbalanced area up to 1 mile in radius (e.g., a Hylden-corrupted forest, a city devastated by necromancy).
Effect: The Warden performs a profound ritual to restore cosmic balance to a blighted area. This is a major narrative undertaking.
Cleanses widespread magical corruption of Expert tier or lower.
May lay powerful unquiet spirits to rest.
Can sanctify the ground, making it hallowed and resistant to future desecration for a time (e.g., 1 year).
May reverse minor environmental damage caused by imbalance. The exact effects depend on the nature of the imbalance and the success of a final DR 4-5 Soul + Rituals check. Failure can have dire consequences for the Warden or the area.
Binding of the Starborn (Summon/Ally)


Tier: Master
Type: Ritual (Summoning)
Casting Time: 1 Hour (must be performed under an open night sky during a specific constellation's alignment)
Cost: 5 SE, plus rare starmetal and a flawless gemstone.
Duration: The Starborn entity remains until a major task is completed or it is dismissed by the caster after a year and a day.
Effect: You attempt to call forth and bind a minor celestial entity or an "Old Soul" that has become one with the cosmic currents (a "Starborn"). This requires a DR 4 Soul + Forbidden Knowledge or Rituals check.
Success: A wise, powerful, and often enigmatic entity (with unique stats and abilities, perhaps a skilled advisor, protector, or magical aide – GM creates this NPC) agrees to serve or ally with you for a specific grand purpose related to fate, balance, or cosmic events. It is not a mindless servant and has its own agenda, but will generally be loyal if its purpose aligns with yours.
Failure: The ritual fails, or a less predictable/more dangerous cosmic entity answers the call.
Soulforge Resurrection


Tier: Master (Sangromancer/Glyph Seeker list)
Type: Ritual (Healing/Restoration)
Casting Time: 8 Hours
Cost: 5 SE (for Glyph Seeker) or 5 BP (for Sangromancer), plus a perfect vessel (e.g., a specially crafted body or a soul gem of immense value) and a significant fragment of the deceased's original soul (if retrievable).
Range: Touch (the vessel and soul fragment)
Target: The soul of a creature that has died, whose soul is free and willing to return.
Effect: This complex and arduous ritual attempts to fully restore a deceased individual to life, even if their original body is destroyed or they have been dead for a long time (up to a year or more, GM discretion). Unlike simple resurrection, this ritual can forge a new body (if a suitable vessel is provided) or fully mend even catastrophic wounds if the original body is mostly intact. The target returns to life with all their Hit Points and faculties, free of most curses or diseases they had at death (though not necessarily all, especially those of artifact or divine origin). This is an ultimate act of restoration. A DR 4 (Soul + Rituals/Glyphcasting) check is required. Failure means the soul cannot be anchored, and the components are consumed.
Ritual of Eclipse (Area Debuff/Obscuration)


Tier: Master
Type: Ritual
Casting Time: 10 Minutes
Cost: 5 SE
Range: Target a point within 1 mile.
Area: Creates a 1-mile radius area of unnatural, magical twilight/eclipse.
Duration: 1 hour.
Effect: You call down an unnatural, localized eclipse that plunges the area into deep twilight (treat as Darkness). Within this area:
Creatures reliant on sunlight for powers or sustenance are weakened (-2 dice on all actions).
Creatures of shadow or darkness (including many vampires, Shadowmancers) feel empowered (+1 die on Stealth and attacks).
Divination magic that relies on celestial bodies fails.
The temperature drops significantly. This is a large-scale environmental manipulation.
Curse of the Nine Moons (Potent Curse)


Tier: Master
Type: Ritual (Debuff/Curse)
Casting Time: 1 Hour (must be performed under the night sky)
Cost: 5 SE (and 2 sanity damage if cast by Hylden Warlock, or a vow of service for Warden) plus rare lunar-aspected components.
Range: Requires a sympathetic link to the target (hair, blood, significant personal item).
Target: One creature.
Duration: Permanent until lifted by equally potent magic or a specific, arduous condition is met.
Effect: You inflict a powerful, cyclical curse upon the target, tied to the phases of Nosgoth's moons (if it has them, or a symbolic 9-day/9-week cycle). The target must make a DR 5 Will save.
Failure: The target suffers a recurring affliction. Examples (choose one or GM determines):
Lunar Madness: During specific moon phases/cycle points, the target suffers from bouts of intense madness (similar to Mind Rupture effects).
Bestial Transformation: Under certain moons/cycles, the target unwillingly transforms into a ravenous beast.
Withering Cycle: The target's vitality waxes and wanes with the moons/cycle, leaving them bedridden and near death at one point, only to slowly recover. This curse should be a major plot point if inflicted.
Dirge of Ruin (Mass Debuff/Damage)


Tier: Master
Type: Ritual
Casting Time: 10 Minutes (requires continuous chanting/performance)
Cost: 5 SE
Range: Self
Area: 60-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: You perform a sorrowful, entropic dirge that echoes with the decay of ages. All hostile creatures who can hear the dirge and start their turn within the area or enter it suffer:
3 Soul damage (bypasses armor) from overwhelming despair and life-draining resonance.
A -1 die penalty on all attack rolls, skill checks, and saving throws.
They cannot benefit from effects that grant bonus dice or advantage. Maintaining this dirge is taxing; you must make a DR 2 Focus check at the end of each of your turns after the first to maintain concentration.

Master Forbidden Spells (Focus: Hylden Warlocks, Soul Reavers, Dreadblades) (All 10 of these are new designs as "Selected Spells" did not cover Master Forbidden)
Reaver Unleashed


Tier: Master (Soul Reaver Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Forbidden (Attack/Self-Buff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE (and 1 Soul Stress to self if not a true Soul Reaver wielder)
Range: Self
Area: 60-foot cone or 30-foot radius burst centered on self.
Duration: Instantaneous (for damage) + 1 minute (for self-buff if applicable)
Effect: You unleash the full, unbound hunger and destructive power of a (proto-)Soul Reaver.
Destructive Wave: All creatures in the chosen area (cone or burst) suffer 7 Soulfire damage (ignores armor, bypasses undead immunities, prevents natural healing for 1 round). A DR 3 Evasion save halves the damage.
Empowerment (If wielding a Reaver-like weapon or are deeply attuned): For 1 minute, your Reaver-like weapon (or soul-infused attacks) also devours a fragment of an enemy's soul on each hit, granting you +1 Temporary HP (stacks up to your Level) and dealing an additional +1 Soul damage.
Black Spiral


Tier: Master (Hylden Warlock Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Forbidden (Summoning/Area Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 SE (and 2 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: Target a point within 60 feet.
Area: Creates a 20-foot radius, 40-foot high swirling column of black, corrosive Hylden energy.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 minute.
Effect: The Black Spiral tears at reality. Creatures starting their turn in the spiral or entering it suffer 5 Void damage (bypasses all defenses, special healing, -2 dice to next save) and must make a DR 3 Might save or be pulled 10 feet towards the center and Restrained by entangling void tendrils until the start of their next turn.
Additionally, you can use a Bonus Action to cause one creature within the spiral to be specifically targeted by a concentrated bolt from the void, forcing a DR 4 Soul save or they take an additional 3 Void damage and are Stunned for 1 round.
Mind Rupture


Tier: Master (Hylden Warlock L10 Perk, here as a generally accessible Master spell)
Type: Forbidden (Mental Attack/Debuff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE (and 1d2 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 30 feet
Target: One creature with a mind.
Frequency: Once per long rest (if used as a general spell).
Effect: Target makes a DR 3 Will save (DR 4 if cast by Hylden Warlock with this as their L10 perk). Failure: Target gains a significant short-term madness (GM choice: paranoia, catatonia, homicidal rage against allies, etc.) lasting until magically cured by Master tier healing. Success: Target suffers (Level) Soul damage and is Stunned 1 round.
Astral Shackle


Tier: Master (Hylden Warlock Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Forbidden (Control/Banishment)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE
Range: 60 feet
Target: One creature.
Duration: Concentration, up to 1 hour.
Effect: You attempt to bind the target's astral form, effectively paralyzing their spirit and potentially their body. The target must make a DR 4 Soul save.
Failure: The target's spirit is shackled. They are Paralyzed (cannot move or take any actions). If they are an extra-planar creature (e.g., demon, elemental, spirit not native to Nosgoth), you can, as part of maintaining concentration each round, attempt to slowly banish them. Each round you do this, they repeat the Soul save. If they fail three such saves consecutively while shackled, they are forcibly returned to their native plane.
Success: Target suffers 4 Soul damage from the attempt.
Soul Storm


Tier: Master (Hylden Warlock/Soul Reaver Explicit Spellbook Spell)
Type: Forbidden (Area Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 SE
Range: Target a point within 120 feet.
Area: 30-foot radius, 40-foot high cylinder.
Duration: 3 rounds.
Effect: You conjure a raging tempest of shrieking souls and raw spiritual energy. Creatures starting their turn in the storm or entering it suffer 6 Soul damage (bypasses armor) and must make a DR 3 Will save or become Frightened for 1 round. The area is heavily obscured by the swirling spirits.
The God’s Rebuttal (Anti-Divine/Fate)


Tier: Master
Type: Forbidden (Counter/Defense)
Casting Time: 1 Reaction (when a creature within 60 feet attempts to use a divine spell/ability, a fate-altering effect, or an ability granted by a powerful entity like the Elder God)
Cost: 5 SE (and 2 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock)
Range: 60 feet
Target: The creature initiating the triggering effect.
Effect: You unleash a blast of pure Hylden defiance or entropic counter-force against the triggering effect. Make an opposed Soul + Forbidden Knowledge check against the target's relevant spellcasting/ability check (or a flat DR 4 if no roll was made by them).
Success: The target's ability/spell fails utterly, and they suffer 4 Void damage from the backlash as their connection to their power source is violently severed or corrupted for a moment.
Failure: Your rebuttal fails, but the target still feels the disruptive force and takes 2 Void damage. This cannot counter passive divine protections or already established permanent effects, only actively initiated ones.
Void Chain (Dimensional Attack/Binding)


Tier: Master
Type: Forbidden (Attack/Control)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE
Range: 60 feet
Target: One creature.
Effect: You conjure a chain made of solidified void that lashes out. Make a ranged spell attack (Soul + Forbidden Knowledge). On a hit, the target suffers 5 Void damage and is wrapped by the chains. They must make a DR 4 Might save or be Restrained and pulled 15 feet towards a point you choose within the spell's range (this could be into a hazard or off a ledge). While Restrained by Void Chains, the target also cannot use any form of extra-planar travel or teleportation. They can use an Action to repeat the Might save, breaking free on a success.
Annihilation Pulse (Pure Destruction)


Tier: Master
Type: Forbidden (Area Damage)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 5 SE (and the caster takes 5 irreducible HP damage from backlash)
Range: Self
Area: 20-foot radius sphere centered on you.
Effect: You release an uncontrolled burst of pure annihilating energy, an echo of the Hylden's ancient, destructive arts. All other creatures in the radius suffer 10 Void damage. There is no save against this damage. Non-magical objects and structures in the area not worn or carried are heavily damaged or destroyed. Using this is incredibly taxing and dangerous.
The Whispering Gate (Risky Planar Travel/Contact)


Tier: Master
Type: Forbidden (Utility/Summoning - Ritualistic)
Casting Time: 1 Hour
Cost: 5 SE (and 1d4 sanity damage for Hylden Warlock), plus rare and disturbing components (e.g., heart of a recently tormented creature, whispers captured in a soul gem).
Range: Creates a temporary portal within 10 feet of you.
Duration: The portal remains open for 1 minute.
Effect: You attempt to tear open a temporary gate to a specific, typically hostile or chaotic plane (e.g., the Hylden's dimension of torment, a realm of pure entropy, an abyssal depth). This requires a DR 4 Soul + Forbidden Knowledge check.
Success: A shimmering, unstable gateway opens. You (and willing companions) might attempt to pass through (GM determines dangers on the other side). Alternatively, you might try to call forth or communicate with an entity from that plane, though it will almost certainly be hostile or demand a steep price for any interaction/service.
Failure: The ritual backfires. 1d4 hostile lesser creatures (e.g., minor demons, void shades, sanity-stealing wraiths) spill through from a random dangerous plane before the rift seals, OR the caster suffers a major curse/affliction from the energies unleashed. This is exceptionally dangerous and unpredictable.
Corruption Crown (Dominion through Taint)


Tier: Master
Type: Forbidden (Control/Self-Buff)
Casting Time: 1 Action
Cost: 4 SE (and gain 1 Corruption Die if system used, or 1 permanent point of Corruption)
Range: Self
Duration: Concentration, up to 10 minutes.
Effect: You weave threads of raw corruption and forbidden power into a visible (or invisible, your choice) crown of dark energy around your head. While this crown persists:
You gain +2 dice on all Presence and Deception checks made against creatures susceptible to corruption or fear.
Any creature you successfully deal Soul or Corruption damage to must make a DR 3 Will save or become Charmed by you for 1 minute (they regard you as a trusted leader/figure of awe, but will not perform obviously self-destructive acts for you). If already Charmed, a failed save might deepen their loyalty or make them Frightened of displeasing you.
You emanate an aura of palpable dread and power. Creatures with a Will attribute lower than yours suffer a -1 die penalty on attack rolls against you. The act of creating and wearing this crown is visibly or spiritually corrupting and will likely have negative social and narrative repercussions with good or neutral entities.



🩸 Corruption Dice Rules
Corruption Dice (CD) represent drawing upon dangerous, forbidden energies or pushing one's limits beyond mortal endurance.
Adding Corruption Dice: Characters may add Corruption Dice to their rolls in specific situations:


When "pushing" a failed roll (rerolling non-successes from the initial pool by adding one CD).
When using certain Forbidden Spells or abilities that allow or require their use.
Consequences of Rolling Corruption Dice:


Increase Corruption Score: Regardless of your current Corruption score, for each '1' rolled on a Corruption Die, your character's Corruption score immediately increases by 1. This is the primary way Corruption is gained from using these dice.


Triggering the Corruption Dice Failure Table (Advanced Corruption):


Condition: An additional consequence occurs if a character rolls one or more '1's on their Corruption Dice AND their Corruption score was already 3 or higher before they made the current roll (the roll that included the Corruption Dice).
Effect: If this condition is met, in addition to the Corruption score increase (from point 1 above), the character must immediately roll 2d6 on the Corruption Dice Failure Table below and apply the corresponding result. If multiple '1's were rolled on Corruption Dice by a character who met this condition, the GM determines if one table roll applies for the batch of '1's or if the situation warrants multiple rolls on the table.
Corruption Thresholds: As a character's Corruption score increases, they may cross various Corruption Thresholds. This can unlock specific Corrupted Perks but also impose escalating penalties or negative traits, as detailed in the "Corrupted Perks" section.



Corruption Dice Failure Table (roll 2d6)
Die 1
Die 2
Effect
1
1
Specter Cling – Gain a persistent haunting until next rest.
1
2
Crimson Hunger – Roll a Will save or attack the nearest living target.
1
3
Echoing Guilt – Flash of memory: -1 die on next Soul or Presence check.
1
4
Eldritch Attention – A spectral being notices you.
1
5
Mark of the Abyss – Gain a visible corruption scar.
1
6
Unholy Mutation – Develop a temporary physical mark (-1 to social rolls).
2
1
Fate Glitch – An ally rerolls their next successful roll and must take lower.
2
2
Eldritch Attention – A spectral being notices you.
2
3
Rift Sickness – -2 Movement until end of scene.
2
4
Fate Glitch – An ally rerolls their next successful roll and must take lower.
2
5
Soul Backlash – Take 1 Soul Stress.
2
6
Abyssal Surge – Next spell deals +2 damage, but auto-gain 1 Corruption.
3
1
Echoing Guilt – Flash of memory: -1 die on next Soul or Presence check.
3
2
Spectral Drain – Lose 1 random magical resource (GM’s discretion).
3
3
Dark Bloom – Small creatures avoid you; you’re visibly cursed.
3
4
Temporal Slippage – Lose your next Reaction.
3
5
Specter Cling – Gain a persistent haunting until next rest.
3
6
Soul Backlash – Take 1 Soul Stress.
4
1
Whispers of the Void – Must pass a DR2 Will save or become Shaken.
4
2
Decay Pulse – Nearby objects wither or break (GM determines effect).
4
3
Planar Rift – You phase briefly; disadvantage on all checks for 1 round.
4
4
Echoing Guilt – Flash of memory: -1 die on next Soul or Presence check.
4
5
Mind Warp – -1 die on all Will checks for 1 scene.
4
6
Spectral Drain – Lose 1 random magical resource (GM’s discretion).
5
1
Corrupted Ground – Terrain around you becomes cursed for 1 round.
5
2
Unholy Mutation – Develop a temporary physical mark (-1 to social rolls).
5
3
Flesh Distortion – -1 Armor for 1 hour as your form twists unnaturally.
5
4
Echoing Guilt – Flash of memory: -1 die on next Soul or Presence check.
5
5
Eternal Hunger – You cannot regain Soul Energy until next rest.
5
6
Grave Chill – All healing halved until end of scene.
6
1
Curse Fragment – Random minor curse takes effect for 1 day.
6
2
Spectral Echo – Disadvantage on Concentration or Focus rolls this scene.
6
3
Vision of the Elder – Stunned for 1 round from incomprehensible revelation.
6
4
Vision of the Elder – Stunned for 1 round from incomprehensible revelation.
6
5
Disrupted Flow – Spellcasting costs +1 resource next time you cast.
6
6
Vision of the Elder – Stunned for 1 round from incomprehensible revelation.



🔄 Reactions to Spells
Characters may use Reactions to counter, evade, or redirect spells.
Example: Counterspell cancels an incoming spell if the caster succeeds a contested roll against the spell's DR using their own Magic Skill + Attribute dice pool.
Evasion can be used to avoid AoE spells with a Shadow + Evasion roll.

This ruleset ensures that spellcasting remains dynamic, strategic, and deeply integrated into the tension and pacing of combat. Let me know if you'd like a version tailored for specific classes, factions, or GM cheat sheets.













Dice Success System
This document outlines how the dice success system functions in Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG. It is modeled after a D6 system where each die that rolls a 5 or 6 counts as a success. Additional successes beyond the first open the door for stunts, enhancements, and GM-driven bonuses.

🎲 Dice Mechanics
Players roll a pool of D6s equal to Attribute + Skill.
5 or 6 = 1 Success
The number of successes required is based on the Difficulty Rating (DR):
DR 1 (Trivial): 1 success
DR 2 (Challenging): 2 successes
DR 3 (Dangerous): 3 successes
DR 4+ (Severe): 4 or more successes

✅ Resolving Actions
1 success = Success (action completes as intended)
Failure = 0 successes (action fails, complications may arise)

💥 Extra Successes: Enhancing Actions
If a player rolls more successes than required, they may:
🩸 In Combat:
+1 damage per extra success (up to weapon or GM limit)
Inflict a status effect — choose from the list below
Strike multiple targets (GM discretion for AoE or sweeping attacks)
Bypass armor or block (1 success = ignore 1 point of armor)
Status Effects Players Can Inflict:
Staggered – Target cannot take Reactions until end of next turn.
Prone – Target falls prone; must spend movement to stand.
Disarmed – Target drops their held weapon or item.
Bleeding – Target takes 1 damage at the start of their turn for 2 rounds.
Blinded – Target suffers disadvantage on attacks and perception.
Silenced – Target cannot cast spells with verbal components.
Grappled – Target is immobilized until they succeed a DR 2 fury check.
Weakened – Target deals -2 damage on next attack.
Marked – Target takes +1 damage from the attacker’s allies.
Slowed – Target’s movement is halved for 1 round.
🕯 Outside Combat:
Perform with greater precision or flair
Complete an action faster or more quietly
Gain narrative advantage (e.g., reposition, learn more from a lore check)
Create a stunt (like leaping to higher ground, grabbing an item mid-combat)

🎲 Advantage & Disadvantage
Advantage and Disadvantage modify the dice pool by adding or removing dice before the roll:
Modifier Size
Dice Modifier
Example Situations
Minor
±1 die
Slight terrain edge, brief distraction, low cover
Moderate
±2 dice
High ground, magical assistance, blinding light
Major / Significant
±3 dice
Perfect ambush, target unaware, cursed or incapacitated


Advantage: Add bonus dice to the roll (up to +3).
Disadvantage: After rolling, remove that many highest dice from the pool before counting successes.
Canceling: If both apply, they cancel 1-for-1.

The GM decides how extra successes manifest based on context and tone. Players are encouraged to propose creative outcomes, but the GM maintains authority over feasibility and impact.
Examples:
A player with 4 successes on a DR 2 stealth check might also silently disable a trap.
A player with 3 successes on a DR 1 strike may decapitate an enemy or cleave through their shield.










Combat Rules

This document provides a comprehensive overview of the combat system in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG. Designed to reflect the visceral, strategic, and realm-twisting nature of battle in Nosgoth, the system uses a D6 dice pool mechanic to resolve attacks, spells, and special actions.

⚔ Combat Overview
Combat is divided into structured rounds, where each character takes a turn in an initiative order. Each round represents approximately 6–10 seconds of in-game time.
On their turn, each combatant may take:
1 Action (attack, spell, ability use, etc.)
1 Movement (up to their Speed stat in tiles)
1 Reaction (once per round, in response to a trigger)
Free Interactions (draw weapon, speak, drop item, etc.)

🧮 Initiative
Initiative is determined by rolling: D6 equal to (Shadow + Tactics or Concentration)
Highest number of successes (6s) goes first.
Ties are broken by the highest Shadow stat, then GM discretion.

🗡 Attacks
To make an attack:
Roll a dice pool equal to your relevant Attribute + Weapon Mastery skill (e.g., Fury + Weapon Mastery for a strength-based attack, or Shadow + Weapon Mastery for a finesse-based attack).
Each die that rolls a 5 or 6 counts as one success.
Compare your total number of successes to the target’s Defense Value (DV). The DV is the specific number of successes required to hit that target.
If your successes meet or exceed the target’s DV, your attack hits. Each success rolled beyond the number required to meet the DV can be used to increase damage or trigger special effects, as detailed in the "Dice Success System" and weapon traits.
Example: You roll 4 dice for your attack and get results of 6, 5, 3, 2. This means you have 2 successes. The target creature has a Defense Value (DV) of 1. Your attack hits because your 2 successes meet the DV of 1. You have one success beyond what was needed to hit, which can be used as a bonus (e.g., +1 damage or to trigger a weapon trait).


🛡 Defense & Armor
Defense Value (DV): Passive number of successes required to hit.
Armor: Reduces incoming damage by a flat amount (e.g., 1–3).
Characters may also use Evasion or Reactions to actively defend.
A character's base DV is typically calculated as 1 + (their Shadow Attribute or Will Attribute, whichever is higher). This base DV is then modified by armor (e.g., "Nosgothian Chainmail +2 DV" ), perks (e.g., "Warden's Edict of Order +1 DV" ), or temporary effects. See the Character Creation Guide (page X) for full details on initial DV calculation. NPCs and creatures may have a fixed DV listed in their statistics.

💥 Damage and Health
Damage is calculated based on weapon or ability used.
Health Points (HP) track physical damage.
0 HP = character falls unconscious or begins dying.
Wounds or Sanity Loss may also be inflicted depending on attack type.

🧠 Special Actions
Spellcasting: Roll Soul + Glyphcasting.
Grapples: Use Unarmed Combat; may restrain, disarm, or knock prone.
Shifting Realms: Some abilities allow switching between Material and Spectral realms mid-combat.
Pushes: Any combat roll may be “pushed” to reroll failures, gaining a Corruption Die.

💣 Critical Hits & Failures
Critical Hit: Roll 3+ successes on an attack or exceed DV by 2+.
May deal bonus damage, stun, or bypass armor.
Critical Failure: Roll no successes and push the roll; CD rolls a 1.
Trigger a Corruption effect or unintended backlash.

🧬 Environmental Combat
Use Spectral and Material terrain.
Glyph traps, shadowfields, and cursed objects can shape the battlefield.
Characters may interact with or destroy terrain based on Strength or Craft.

⚡ Reactions
Reactions are quick, responsive actions that characters may take once per round, typically on another creature’s turn.
📌 How Reactions Work
Each character gets 1 Reaction per round.
Reactions must be triggered by a specific event (e.g., being targeted, an enemy moving nearby).
Some Reactions require a skill check or specific ability.
🧪 Common Reaction Examples
Dodge (Evasion): Avoid an incoming attack or trap with a Shadow + Evasion check.
Parry (Weapon Mastery): Use Fury + Weapon Mastery to reduce melee damage.
Counterspell (Glyphcasting or Forbidden Knowledge): Dispel or negate a magical effect targeting you.
Opportunity Attack: Strike a creature that enters or leaves your melee range.
Spectral Shift: Instantly phase between realms (requires special trait or spell).
⚙️ Rules Notes
You must be conscious and able to act to use a Reaction.
If your Reaction fails (e.g., you fail the roll), it is still expended for the round.
Some abilities or perks may allow additional or enhanced Reactions.
Reactions create tension, surprise, and allow players to turn defense into cinematic moments of power.
🛡 Reaction Rolls: Reducing Damage in Combat
When a character is targeted by an attack, they may spend their Reaction to reduce or avoid damage using the appropriate attribute + skill roll. This is declared after the attack hits but before damage is applied.
Reaction Roll Examples:
Dodge (Shadow + Evasion) – Avoid melee or physical strikes.
Deflect (Fury + Weapon Mastery) – Block with a weapon or shield.
Absorb (Concentration + Will) – Endure magical, soul, or corruption-based attacks.
Successes
Effect
1 Success
Reduce incoming damage by 1
2 Successes
Reduce damage by 2 or negate a status effect
3+ Successes
Halve the damage or completely evade (GM discretion)

Characters can only make one reaction roll per round, unless granted extra reactions by perks or gear.


Combat in Nosgoth is tactical, layered, and often unpredictable. Whether you fight with claws, reaver blades, or glyphs of decay, every action comes with consequence—and power has a price.




Skill Check Rules

This document explains how skill checks work in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG, using a D6 dice pool system to resolve actions, challenges, and narrative choices. These rules govern how players attempt tasks, how difficulty is measured, and what different levels of success mean in gameplay.

🎲 How to Roll a Skill Check
To attempt a skill check:
Determine which Attribute and Skill apply.
Roll a number of D6s equal to Attribute + Skill level.
Count how many fives (5s) and sixes (6s) you roll — these are your successes.
Compare the number of successes to the task’s Difficulty Rating (DR).
You may also add Corruption Dice (CD) when pushing a roll for more chances at success (see below).

🎯 Difficulty Ratings (DR)
"Each challenge has a Difficulty Rating (DR) that defines how many successes are needed to achieve a standard success:

DR
Difficulty
Successes Needed 
Example Task
0
Trivial
0
Opening an unlocked door, walking across
  clear ground
1
Simple
1
Hiding in dim light, jumping a small gap,
  basic first aid.
2
Standard
2
Picking a common lock, deceiving a naive
  guard, standard attack.
3
Challenging
3
Disarming a complex spectral trap,
  resisting a potent glyph.
4
Difficult
4
Casting under extreme pressure, navigating
  cursed fog. 
5+
Extreme/Legendary
5+
Possessing a powerful boss, breaking
  chains of prophecy. 


🧪 Pushing a Roll
A player may push a failed roll to reroll all dice that did not roll a success.
When pushing, the player adds one Corruption Die (CD).
For each '1' rolled on a Corruption Die, your character's Corruption score immediately increases by 1", and IF the "Corruption score was already 3 or higher BEFORE they made the current roll... the character must immediately roll 2d6 on the Corruption Dice Failure Table
Pushing adds tension and risk but opens powerful results.

⚔ Opposed Rolls
When two characters oppose each other:
Both roll their relevant skill pools.
Whoever rolls more 6s wins.
A tie may result in a standoff or unintended outcome, as decided by the GM.

🏆 Degrees of Success
Successes
Outcome
0
Failure; may suffer a consequence or be allowed to retry.
1
Standard success; you accomplish the task.
2
Strong success; gain a bonus, extra info, or speed.
3+
Critical success; choose a bonus effect or narrate dramatically.

✨ Bonus Effects for Extra Successes
Extra Successes
Sample Effects
+1
Deal +1 damage; reduce target's armor by 1; perform the task silently
+2
Inflict a status effect (e.g., Staggered, Prone); gain positioning
+3
Gain an extra action next round; cause chain reaction; reveal secret
+4+
Perform a stunt; permanently alter the scene; bypass entire challenge

🌀 Examples of Stunts for +4 Successes
Combat Stunts
Leap from a ledge and impale an enemy mid-air
Deflect a spell into another target or reflective surface
Disarm two enemies in a single sweeping motion
Deliver a final blow while grabbing a falling relic
Cause an enemy to fall off a cliff or through a crumbling floor
Catch and throw an incoming projectile back at the attacker
Pull an ally out of harm’s way while striking
Use the environment (e.g., chandelier, chain, pillar) in your attack
Social Stunts
Convince a hostile NPC to become neutral or allied
Expose a hidden trait or weakness in an opponent during argument
Turn a crowd in your favor during a speech or debate
Secure a major favor or commitment without cost
Uncover a buried secret mid-conversation
Stealth Stunts
Infiltrate a restricted area without leaving a trace
Plant or retrieve an object without detection
Eavesdrop without being noticed and gain leverage
Knock out a guard and hide them mid-patrol
Create a perfect alibi for your location
These effects are subject to GM interpretation and narrative fit, but they empower creative play when rolling well. to GM interpretation and narrative fit, but they empower creative play when rolling well.

Skill checks drive both narrative exploration and tactical play in Nosgoth. The more a character invests in skills and attributes, the more reliable—and cinematic—their actions become.








Skill System Guide

This document outlines the skill system for the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG. It details how skills function, how they’re used, and how they are granted by race and class. The skill system adds depth to character identity and supports the rich roleplay and tactical combat found in Nosgoth.

🎲 Skill Mechanics
Characters roll a number of d6 equal to (Attribute + Skill level).
Each 5 or 6 rolled counts as one success.
1 success = success on standard difficulty. More difficult tasks require multiple successes.
Players may “push” rolls, adding Corruption Dice (CD) for more chances at success—with risk.
You can have a max of 5 skill ranks in any skill, 3 at lvl 1

🧠 Core Skill Descriptions
🗡 Combat Skills
Weapon Mastery
This skill reflects a character’s expertise with weapons, whether forged steel or supernatural claws. It governs accuracy, special strikes, disarming maneuvers, and tactical placement in melee and ranged combat. High Weapon Mastery allows for advanced combat styles, such as dual-wielding or exploiting enemy weaknesses. It’s often paired with the Fury attribute for brutal force, or with Shadow for finesse strikes. Characters with Weapon Mastery can also identify exotic weapons and understand battlefield hierarchies.
Evasion
Evasion represents a character’s ability to dodge, roll, leap, or sidestep incoming attacks or hazards. Whether escaping a falling ceiling trap or slipping past a vampire’s claw, Evasion helps avoid direct harm. A successful Evasion check can mean the difference between a lethal blow and no damage at all. At higher levels, characters with strong Evasion can react with supernatural reflexes, even avoiding glyph-triggered blasts or spells. It’s typically paired with Shadow or Will, depending on the context of movement or willpower to react.
Unarmed Combat
This skill determines a character’s ability to fight without weapons—using fists, claws, grapples, or fangs. It’s essential for Wraiths, Revenants, and feral vampires who rely on their body as a weapon. Unarmed Combat also governs special moves like grapples, throws, disarms, and limb breaks. It’s often combined with Blood or Fury attributes, depending on the fighting style. High skill levels let characters challenge even armed foes in close quarters.
Tactics
Tactics reflects battlefield awareness and strategic planning under pressure. A character with this skill can predict enemy movements, call out advantageous flanks, or direct allies with superior coordination. It’s vital for leaders or military-minded classes like Blood Knights or Sarafan. Tactics checks can grant bonuses to allies, reveal enemy vulnerabilities, or allow repositioning without attacks of opportunity. It pairs well with Will or Focus and is often used in scene-based initiative or turn modification.

🩸 Arcane & Forbidden
Glyphcasting
Glyphcasting governs the ability to inscribe, activate, or counter glyphs—arcane symbols tied to Nosgoth’s ley-lines and forgotten magics. It is the central skill for magical trap-setting, sigil-based attacks, and ward defenses. A skilled Glyphcaster can create time delays, proximity triggers, or elemental effects. They can also attempt to hijack or disable enemy glyphs. This skill is paired with Soul or Will and is essential for classes like Glyph Seekers or Hylden Warlocks.
Rituals
This skill allows a character to perform complex arcane or divine rites, often requiring time, components, and strict conditions. Rituals may summon spirits, consecrate land, seal portals, or alter fate. Unlike combat spells, rituals typically have delayed effects and scene-wide consequences. Characters with high Ritual skill can create long-term enchantments or divine boons. It pairs with Soul or Religion and is often used by Sangromancers, Wardens, or Revenants.
Possession
Possession allows control over other beings, objects, or spectral anchors—most commonly used by Wraiths or characters with Razielim lineage. This skill governs entering host bodies, manipulating environment-bound spirits, or transferring consciousness. It’s a dangerous and high-reward skill that often requires Will saves from the victim. Possession may also let characters escape death, bypass barriers, or manipulate machines. Soul and Will are common pairings.
Forbidden Knowledge
This skill taps into the unspeakable truths—Hylden technology, fate codes, glyph decay algorithms, and time-stream fractures. Characters with this skill recognize cursed relics, navigate impossible timelines, or interpret prophecies. It also grants insight into the workings of the Balance Pillars and ancient bloodlines. Forbidden Knowledge often brings risk, increasing Corruption or Sanity loss on failure. It pairs with Will, Soul, or Focus.

🌑 Stealth & Subterfuge
Stealth
Stealth is the ability to move silently, remain unseen, and slip past both living and spectral sentries. It’s essential for assassins, scouts, and those seeking to avoid conflict. Stealth checks are used for infiltration, ambushes, escaping detection, or navigating dark terrain unnoticed. At high levels, this skill can be used to vanish in plain sight or traverse dangerous ground like a shadow. It synergizes well with Shadow or Will, depending on whether the stealth is physical or magical.
Deception
This skill covers lying, bluffing, impersonation, and creating false narratives. Deception is useful in both social interactions and espionage, allowing a character to disguise intentions or assume false identities. Skilled deceivers can forge documents, mimic voices, or sow doubt among enemies. This skill is often contested by Insight, making it vital for social intrigue or diplomacy under false pretenses. It pairs naturally with Presence or Will.
Thievery
Thievery governs lockpicking, pickpocketing, disarming traps, and other sleight-of-hand techniques. It’s often used in dungeon crawling, urban stealth missions, or acquiring forbidden artifacts. High Thievery lets characters detect mechanical traps, crack enchanted locks, or even create makeshift tools on the fly. It requires finesse and patience, pairing well with Shadow or Focus. In Nosgoth’s ruined cities, Thievery is a vital survival tool.
Observation
Observation is the skill of noticing hidden details, spotting enemies, or reading minute clues. It’s the counter-skill to Stealth and Deception, used to find traps, detect lies, or sense presences from the Spectral Realm. High Observation can allow prediction of ambushes, tracking by sight alone, or recognition of magical anomalies. It complements Focus or Soul and is common among scouts, Reavers, and inquisitors.

💬 Social & Mental
Persuasion
This is the ability to influence, bargain, or inspire others through words and charisma. It’s used to convince NPCs, negotiate terms, or dissuade conflict. Persuasion can be used with charm, reason, or passionate appeals, depending on the speaker’s approach. High Persuasion might sway a crowd, call off an attack, or turn a faction to your side. It’s based on Presence or Will.
Presence
Presence reflects force of personality—used to intimidate, command, or awe others. It’s vital for leaders, warriors, or any character who uses fear or respect as a tool. Presence can suppress rebellion, rally allies, or terrify enemies in a standoff. It’s often used in battle to assert dominance or outside combat to demand attention. This skill pairs well with Fury or Will.
Insight
Insight is a character’s ability to read emotions, detect lies, and sense true intentions. It’s used to evaluate threats, see through deception, or understand social nuance. High Insight provides strategic social awareness, making it easier to negotiate or expose manipulation. It’s commonly paired with Will or Focus and is used by Oracles, judges, and mystics.
Concentration
Concentration measures mental endurance, concentration, and resistance to distraction or corruption. It’s vital when casting glyphs under duress, resisting possession, or navigating chaos. Concentration is also used for long tasks that require attention, such as rituals or deciphering glyphs. Characters with high Concentration are less prone to madness and more resilient against supernatural stress. It’s tied to Soul or Will.

📚 Lore & Practical
History
This skill encompasses the study of ancient events, bloodlines, landmarks, and empires. It’s used to recognize ruins, recall battles, or identify important figures. High History provides context and clues in puzzles or dialogue and often unlocks deeper lore. It’s essential for characters seeking lost knowledge or interpreting visions. It pairs with Focus or Will.
Religion
Religion measures understanding of faiths, divine entities, sacred rites, and holy relics. It’s used to identify rituals, interact with religious NPCs, or invoke divine powers. High Religion also grants insight into the Balance Pillars, Time Streamers, and Nosgoth’s moral codes. It pairs with Soul or Will and is common among Wardens, Sarafan, or Oracle-blooded.
Nature
This skill covers animal tracking, wilderness survival, terrain navigation, and identifying natural dangers. It’s used to find paths, avoid hazards, and understand beast behavior. Nature also lets characters forage, read weather signs, or tame creatures. It’s useful in open-world exploration and outside Nosgoth’s ruined cities. It pairs with Will or Focus.
Craft
Craft allows players to build, repair, or modify weapons, armor, relics, or glyph-based items. It includes forging, alchemy, enchanting, and inscription. High Craft lets players build traps, create gear, or fortify a location. This skill supports both downtime activity and real-time advantage creation. It’s paired with Focus or Soul.

With these detailed skill descriptions, players and GMs alike can fully leverage the mechanical and narrative potential of Nosgoth’s complex, layered skill system.

A condensed version of this table is also included on the character sheet to help players assign skills during character creation or leveling.

📊 Skill-to-Attribute Summary Table
Skill
Primary Attribute(s)
Weapon Mastery
Fury or Shadow
Evasion
Shadow or Will
Unarmed Combat
Blood or Fury
Tactics
Will or Focus
Glyphcasting
Soul or Will
Rituals
Soul or Religion
Possession
Soul or Will
Forbidden Knowledge
Will, Soul, or Focus
Stealth
Shadow or Will
Deception
Presence or Will
Thievery
Shadow or Focus
Observation
Focus or Soul
Persuasion
Presence or Will
Presence
Fury or Will
Insight
Will or Focus
Concentration
Soul or Will
History
Focus or Will
Religion
Soul or Will
Nature
Will or Focus
Craft
Focus or Soul























Weapons and Armor List
This document lists both class-specific and universal weapons available in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG. All weapons deal a fixed amount of damage on a successful hit. Traits indicate special effects triggered on hits or conditions.

🧙 Class-Specific Weapons
Vampire Class
Scion Blade – Damage: 6 – Bleed on crit; +1 damage if gained a blood point this round.
Bloodfang Dagger – Damage: 4 – +2 damage when targeting a bleeding foe.
Nightblade Saber – Damage: 5 – +1 armor penetration; silent and swift.
Sarafan Crusader Class
Sarafan Pike – Damage: 5 – Reach 2 tiles; +2 damage vs. Undead.
Blessed Mace – Damage: 6 – On hit, undead must succeed DR 2 or be stunned.
Crusader Broadsword – Damage: 5 – +1 DV when wielded; balanced and blessed.
Wraith / Spirit-Bound Class
Spectral Talons – Damage: 4 (Spiritual) – Ignores armor; requires Spectral Realm.
Echoblade – Damage: 5 – On hit, copy last minor spell cast.
Phantom Claws – Damage: 3 – On hit, inflict -1 on enemy rolls for 1 round.
Blood Mage Class
Bloodstaff – Damage: 3 – Heals caster instead of damage.
Veinbinder Rod – Damage: 4 – Targets take 1 damage per round unless healed.
Crimson Spear – Damage: 5 – Range 2 tiles; caster gains 1 HP on crit.
Forbidden Scholar / Cultist Class
Hexbrand – Damage: 5 – Target gains 1 Corruption; disrupts next spell.
Ritual Blade – Damage: 4 – On crit, absorb 1 Soul Energy.
Whisperknife – Damage: 3 – Can be summoned and dismissed freely; bypasses normal wards.

🛡 Multi-Class / Universal Weapons
Iron Longsword
Damage: 5
Traits: Versatile (can be wielded one- or two-handed).
Available To: All non-spectral martial classes.
Nosgothian War Axe
Damage: 6
Traits: On crit, remove 1 reaction from target.
Available To: Warriors, Vampires, Outcasts.
Throwing Dagger
Damage: 3
Traits: Thrown (Range 8 tiles); mark target for 1 turn.
Available To: Rogues, Vampires, Scholars.
Repeater Crossbow
Damage: 4
Traits: Ignores 1 armor; reload every 2 rounds.
Available To: Any ranged-trained class.
Soulreaver Prototype
Damage: 7 (Spectral + Soulfire)
Traits: Causes 1 corruption on wielder per hit; immune to mundane armor.
Available To: Artifact-bound classes or GM story reward.
Nosgothian Cleaver
Damage: 6
Traits: Brutal and heavy; -1 to hit but ignores 2 armor.
Available To: Vampires, Cultists, Outcasts.
Steel Javelin
Damage: 4
Traits: Thrown or melee; can pin target (DR 2 vs. STR to move).
Available To: Any martial or hybrid class.
Huntsman's Bow
Damage: 5
Traits: Long range (12 tiles); +1 vs beasts or corrupted wildlife.
Available To: Rogues, Outcasts, Rangers.
Spiritshard Wand
Damage: 3 (Spiritual)
Traits: Ranged spiritual weapon; pass through walls within spectral realm.
Available To: Any caster class with Soul > 2.
Twin Knives
Damage: 3 (each)
Traits: Can strike twice as one action if both hit same target.
Available To: Vampires, Rogues, Scholars.

💎 Rare Weapons (GM Discretion)
Moonlit Fang
Damage: 6
Traits: +2 damage when used under moonlight or in darkness; user gains +1 Evasion.
Available To: Vampires, Rogues, Spirit-bound.
Requiem Pike
Damage: 7
Traits: On kill, emit shockwave (1 damage to enemies in 2-tile radius); cannot be parried.
Available To: Sarafan, Blood Mages.
Soulbrand Blade
Damage: 6 (Soulfire)
Traits: Wounds inflicted cannot be healed for 2 turns; bypasses shields.
Available To: Any class wielding a soul-bound item or marked by the Abyssal Heart.
Dreadhammer of Threnos
Damage: 8
Traits: On crit, knock target prone and silence for 1 round. Wielder takes 1 Corruption.
Available To: Outcasts, Cultists, GM artifact unlock.
Bloodwoven Whip
Damage: 5
Traits: Can target enemies 3 tiles away; grapple effect on DR 2. If target is bleeding, they cannot move.
Available To: Blood Mages, Forbidden Scholars.
🗡️ Relic Weapons (Legendary or Unique)
Soulreaver Prime
Damage: 9 (Soulfire + Spectral)
Traits: Absorbs souls of those slain; grants 1 extra action the next round. Can only be wielded by one chosen by the Pillars.
Available To: GM Storybound Character or Chosen Hero.
Blade of Balance
Damage: 7
Traits: At the start of each turn, wielder may choose +2 damage or +2 DV for the round.
Available To: Any character who has restored a Pillar.
Voidrend Scepter
Damage: 6 (Void)
Traits: On hit, target must succeed DR 3 or be pulled partially into the Spectral Realm (disadvantage on next action).
Available To: Forbidden Casters, Wraith-Knights.
Sanctified Claymore of Avernus
Damage: 8 (Radiant)
Traits: Undead take double damage; caster allies in sight gain +1 to saves.
Available To: Sarafan, Crusaders, or chosen defenders.
Abyssal Fang
Damage: 6 (Corruption)
Traits: Target gains 1 permanent Corruption point on crit. If wielder has 6+ Corruption, deal +2 damage.
Available To: Cultists, Forbidden Ones, or Abyss-bonded characters.
These weapons are designed for tactical narrative combat in both tabletop and digital platforms like TaleSpire. Let your GM determine availability, crafting requirements, or relic acquisition paths.

☠️ Special Damage Types Explained
🕳 Void Damage – Represents reality collapse and dimensional corruption. Bypasses all armor and resistances. Cannot be healed normally. On hit, target suffers disadvantage on next DR save.
🔥 Soulfire Damage – Hybrid of spectral and spiritual fire. Ignores physical armor, bypasses undead immunities. Prevents natural healing for 1 round unless cleansed.
🌞 Radiant Damage – Pure divine energy. Double damage to undead and spectral foes. Often resisted by corrupted or abyssal enemies.
💀 Corruption Damage – Inflicts long-term corruption buildup. On crit, may increase target’s corruption score. Triggers thresholds and disrupts concentration effects.
🌫 Spiritual Damage – Targets the soul. Ignores mundane armor. Only resisted by soulbound items or high Spirit saves. Causes lingering effects in Spectral Realm.

🛡️ Armor List (Class-Specific and Universal)
Note: All armor reduces incoming damage by a flat amount. Traits grant unique bonuses depending on class or conditions.
🧛 Vampire Class
Bloodsteel Cuirass – Reduces Damage by 2, gain +1 HP after melee crit. Corruption threshold +1.
Nightshade Cloak – Reduces Damage by 1, grants Stealth bonus. Shadow damage resistance.
Fleshwoven Mail – Reduces Damage by 2, regenerate 1 HP if standing in blood.
Graveskin Harness – Reduces Damage by 1, +1 to DR vs. fire and radiant effects.
Ebonwing Shroud – Reduces Damage by 2, fly for 1 turn once per scene.
🛡 Sarafan Crusader
Sarafan Plate – Reduces Damage by 3, disadvantage on Stealth. Undead gain disadvantage vs. fear saves.
Radiant Tabard – Reduces Damage by 2, allies within 2 tiles gain +1 to Will saves.
Blessed Chain Vestments – Reduces Damage by 2, caster allies gain +1 to spell saves.
Holy Valor Guard – Reduces Damage by 3, you gain +1 DR vs. corruption magic.
Lightforged Aegis – Reduces Damage by 2, once per scene deflects 1 source of incoming damage.
👻 Spirit-Bound / Wraith
Shroud of Echoes – Reduces Damage by 1, ignore terrain effects. Move freely in Spectral Realm.
Gravewind Mantle – Reduces Damage by 2, attacks against you have -1 on first round of combat.
Veilpiercer Shroud – Reduces Damage by 1, you see into Spectral and Material realms simultaneously.
Soulrift Weave – Reduces Damage by 2, teleport 2 tiles once per scene.
Spiritthread Vestments – Reduces Damage by 1, regain 1 Soul Energy after casting in Spectral Realm.
🩸 Blood Mage
Veinsilk Robes – Reduces Damage by 1, caster heals 1 HP after casting a Blood spell.
Sanguine Mantle – Reduces Damage by 2, add +1 to Blood spell damage once per round.
Arterywraps – Reduces Damage by 1, cast 1 Tier 1 Blood spell as a reaction once per scene.
Bloodflame Vestment – Reduces Damage by 2, causes attackers to take 1 fire damage on melee hits.
Crimson Channeling Coat – Reduces Damage by 1, regain 1 HP per spell level when crit casting.
🕯 Forbidden Scholar / Cultist
Ritual Vestments – Reduces Damage by 1, reduce corruption cost by 1 (min 1) for one spell per scene.
Woven Shadows – Reduces Damage by 2, +1 to DR when resisting mind-affecting effects.
Inkbound Mantle – Reduces Damage by 1, gain +1 on Glyph rolls while worn.
Soulwrack Robes – Reduces Damage by 2, spells that cause corruption deal +1 damage.
Chantwoven Cloak – Reduces Damage by 1, once per scene cast a Tier 1 Forbidden spell without cost.
🛡 Universal Armor
Traveler’s Leathers – +1 DV, no penalties to movement or Stealth.
Nosgothian Chainmail – +2 DV, standard medium armor.
Abyss-Ward Cloak – +1 DV, resist 1 corruption point per session.
Wraithbone Shell – +2 DV, halve Spectral damage once per scene.
Feral Hide Armor – +2 DV, +1 damage on melee crits.













Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG – Character Sheet

🧙 Character Information
Name:
Lineage (Race):
Class:
Faction (if any):
Realm Affinity: Material / Spectral / Hybrid
Background / Origin:
Narrative Hook:

📊 Core Attributes (1–5)
Fury: ___
Soul: ___
Shadow: ___
Will: ___
Focus: ___
Blood: ___

🧠 Skills (0–5)
Note: Skills are typically paired with one or more core attributes. Below are suggested pairings for dice rolls. Combat: (Attribute: Fury / Shadow)
Weapon Mastery ___
Evasion ___
Unarmed Combat ___
Tactics ___
Arcane & Forbidden: (Attribute: Soul / Will / Focus)
Glyphcasting ___
Rituals ___
Possession ___
Forbidden Knowledge ___
Stealth & Deception: (Attribute: Shadow / Will / Focus)
Stealth ___
Deception ___
Thievery ___
Observation ___
Social & Mental: (Attribute: Presence / Will / Focus)
Persuasion ___
Presence ___
Insight ___
Concentration ___
Lore & Practical: (Attribute: Focus / Soul / Will)
History ___
Religion ___
Nature ___
Craft ___

🧬 Lineage Traits
Lineage Feature:
Terrain/Stealth Bonus:
Movement Speed:
Unique Trait:

⚔ Combat
Health Points (HP): ___ / ___
Defense Value (DV): ___ (Base DV = 1 + Shadow or Will, + Armor/Perks)
Armor: ___
Speed (Tiles): ___
Base DV: ___
DV Modifiers (Armor/Perks): ___
Total DV: ___



Combat Notes:
Reactions, Critical Rules, Corruption Dice triggers, etc.

🔮 Spellcasting
Soul Energy Pool: ___ / ___
Blood Energy Pool: ___ / ___
Known Spells: (Include tier, type, and any backlashes)
Corruption Score: ___
Corruption Threshold: _________ (e.g., Touched, Marked)
Sanity Points (if used as a trackable score): ___ / ___



🎖 Perks
Tier 1:
Tier 2:
Tier 3:
Tier 4:
Faction / Lineage-Specific:

💎 Relics, Equipment & Gear
Weapon(s):
Armor:
Utility Items:
Spell Components:
Corrupted Relics:

📜 Notes & Journal
Use this space for prophecies, NPC bonds, plot threads, and story decisions.

Designed for use with TaleSpire or physical campaigns set in Nosgoth.








🌍 Realm Affinity Explained
Affinity
Description
Material
You are grounded in the physical world. You interact with objects and beings in the Material Realm normally, but cannot see or affect Spectral creatures or pathways without magic.
Spectral
You exist primarily in the Spectral Realm. You can move through certain walls, see hidden truths, and interact with spirits—but struggle with physical objects and may require anchors to touch the Material world.
Hybrid
You can shift between realms or interact with both to some extent. Hybrid characters (e.g., Wraiths, Glyph-marked) can access both realms for brief periods, often gaining powerful tactical advantages.


🧬 Mechanical Implications
Spectral movement: Some abilities or stunts allow Spectral-affined characters to ignore terrain or bypass locks.


Targeting and resistance: Spells or damage types (e.g., Spectral, Void) may affect characters differently depending on affinity.


Visibility: Some enemies or artifacts are only visible or interactable in one realm.






Terrain Type
Terrain Type
Description & Effects
Open Ground
Standard terrain. No modifiers.
Difficult Terrain
Costs 2 movement per tile. Affects large rubble, snow, shallow water, broken stairs.
Hazardous Terrain
May deal damage or require a DR check to cross. Examples: fire, acid pools, spectral thorns.
Elevated Terrain
Higher ground gives +1 DR against ranged attacks and +1 success on certain awareness or combat rolls.
Cover
Half or full cover grants +1 or +2 to DR against ranged and spell attacks.
Obscuring Terrain
Reduces line of sight; Stealth rolls gain +1 success when hiding in mist, darkness, or ash.
Spectral Terrain
Exists partially in the Spectral Realm. Non-spectral entities may need glyphs or special skills to interact with or move through it.
Corrupted Ground
Causes stress or minor corruption with prolonged exposure. Certain perks allow immunity.
Holy Ground
Deals damage to undead or corrupted creatures. Boosts DR for holy casters or relics.
Bloodsoaked Terrain
Grants +1 to Blood Mages; may allow free BP recovery once per scene if fed upon.
Arcane Nexus
Magical energy foci. Reduce spell costs by 1 for casters attuned to the Nexus. Rare and volatile.


An Energy Foci (plural: Foci) in the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG is a locus of concentrated magical power—a place, object, or formation where ambient arcane energy is naturally or supernaturally amplified. These foci are often remnants of old Pillar magic, spectral bleed-throughs, or Hylden constructs.

✨ Energy Foci – Overview
Definition:
 An Energy Foci is a physical or metaphysical site where magical forces are denser or more volatile than usual. Spellcasters can tap into these locations to enhance, reduce the cost of, or alter the effects of their spells.

🧙‍♂️ Mechanical Benefits
Reduce spell Soul Energy or Blood Point cost by 1 (minimum 0) while casting from or within a Foci.


Gain +1 success on spellcasting rolls if attuned.


Some rare Foci allow forbidden or hybrid magic (e.g., spectral-blood casting).


May serve as fast-travel nodes, ritual circles, or resurrection anchors in some campaigns.



⚠️ Drawbacks or Risks
Overuse can destabilize the Foci, causing magical surges, corruption waves, or temporary rifts.


Some are contested by factions (e.g., Pale Accord, Sarafan) or guarded by wraiths or spirits.


Casting forbidden spells at a Foci may trigger Corruption Threshold gains or attract the attention of ancient entities.



🔮 Example: The Cradle of Glyphfire
Deep within the ruins of Avernus lies a circular chamber inscribed with shifting runes. Those who channel magic within this Foci do so at half cost—but each casting whispers a fragment of their soul into the Spectral Realm.

🔗 How to Attune to an Energy Foci
📜 Basic Method
Be within range of the Foci (typically within 1–2 tiles).


Spend one full round focusing uninterrupted.


Make a Will + Rituals or Spirit + Glyphcasting skill check.


DR depends on the Foci's potency:


Common: DR 2


Rare/Corrupted: DR 3


Ancient/Forbidden: DR 4+


🎲 Success Results
Successes
Effect
1 Success
Gain reduced spell cost while attuned
2 Successes
Also gain +1 success on spell rolls
3+ Successes
Additional bonus: e.g., restore 1 resource per cast or unlock a hidden property


❌ Failure & Consequences
Failing the attunement roll may:


Inflict 1 corruption or stress


Overload the Foci, making it unstable


Attract attention from Spectral entities or nearby factions


You can retry after a long rest or by spending a Corruption Die.



🧪 Optional Rule: One Foci at a Time
Characters may only be attuned to one Foci at a time, unless they possess a rare Foci Conduit Relic or a perk like:
“Anchor of the Arcane” – You may maintain two concurrent Foci attunements without backlash.

Would you like to incorporate this attunement system directly into the Spellcasting or Combat Rules document?






















Rests
Short Rest
Duration: Approximately 1 hour.
Activity: This is a brief period of relative calm where characters can catch their breath, tend to immediate wounds, consume a quick ration (if mortal), or briefly focus their will. It requires a modicum of safety, as engaging in strenuous activity (fighting, casting demanding spells, extensive travel) would interrupt it.


Mortals (Humans, some Hylden): Focus on bandaging wounds, a hurried meal, maintaining gear, and keeping watch.
Vampires: A moment of unnatural stillness, perhaps drawing on ambient darkness or entering a light trance if in a place of some security. They might use this time to meticulously clean their weapons or focus on their predatory instincts. If a very vulnerable or willing blood source is immediately at hand, a quick, minimal feeding might occur but wouldn't be as restorative as a proper hunt.
Wraiths: A brief withdrawal deeper into the Spectral Realm or a quiet period of coalescing their spectral form, perhaps drawing on minor ambient soul echoes or emotional residue.
Revenants: A moment to reassert their will over their decaying form, perhaps re-knitting minor physical damage through sheer force of will or performing small rites to appease the forces binding them.
Benefits (Examples):
Characters might be able to make a Focus or Will check to remove 1 point of a specific type of Stress.
Allow characters to regain a small, fixed amount of HP (e.g., 1d6 + Focus attribute, or a quarter of their max HP). Alternatively, if you implement a "Hit Dice" like mechanic, this is when they could spend them.
Refresh any abilities specifically designated as "per short rest" in your class or lineage descriptions.
Perhaps allow a character to regain 1 expended use of a "per scene" ability if they haven't used it extensively.
Long Rest
Duration: At least 6-8 hours of largely uninterrupted downtime. True safety is paramount and rare in Nosgoth. Interruptions (especially an hour or more of combat or strenuous activity) would typically negate the benefits.
Activity:
Mortals: A full period of sleep, usually in shifts if a watch is needed. This requires a secure location like a hidden sanctuary, a fortified room, or a rare moment of peace.
Vampires: This is less about "sleep" and more about entering a significant torpor or deep meditative state within a secure sanctum (their coffin, a crypt, a place of personal power). This allows their immortal bodies to mend and their dark powers to consolidate. A significant feeding (or having recently fed well) is often crucial for a vampire to gain the full benefits of a long rest; without it, their "rest" might be fitful, incomplete, or even draining. This could tie directly into regaining their full Blood Points.
Wraiths: A prolonged period of deep immersion in the Spectral Realm, perhaps near a powerful soul font, a nexus of potent memories, or a location where the veil between realms is thin. This allows them to fully re-cohere their essence and replenish their Soul Energy.
Revenants: A period where their will fully reasserts control over their decaying form, often involving rituals or drawing upon whatever force animates them. This might involve replacing rotted components or re-inscribing binding runes.
Benefits (Examples):
Regain all or most lost HP.
Fully restore resource pools like Soul Energy. Vampires fully restore Blood Points, perhaps contingent on recent feeding or a secure resting place that bolsters them.
Refresh all abilities designated as "per long rest" 
(like the Wraith's Phasing if it remains "per rest" or Kain's Chrono Reversal).
Make significant progress on recovering from more severe or persistent forms of Stress or Corruption (this might involve specific checks or roleplaying).
Allow for longer activities like complex Rituals, Crafting, or deciphering Forbidden Knowledge.
Key Considerations for Nosgoth:
Resource Cost of Resting: For mortals, food and water. For vampires, the need for blood should be a constant pressure influencing their rest.
Safety & Interruption: Resting in Nosgoth should rarely be a "given." The threat of discovery should be real. The GM can use failed Stealth checks for camp setup or random encounters to interrupt rests, denying benefits and adding tension.
Lineage Specifics: Emphasize how each lineage's nature affects their version of "rest." This adds great flavor. For example, a Zephonim might "rest" by dissolving into a swarm of insects in a hidden crevice, while a Dumahim might enter a stone-like slumber.
Thematic Names: You could rename them for your world (e.g., "Moment's Respite" & "Night's Renewal" or "Vigil's End" & "Abyssal Slumber" for darker tones).
Damage Types
1. Physical Damage (Bludgeoning, Piercing, Slashing)
Definition: The most common form of injury, resulting from direct kinetic impacts, cuts, and punctures. Physical damage is typically inflicted by mundane weapons (swords, maces, arrows), natural attacks (claws, fists, fangs), or environmental trauma (falling, crushing).
Mechanical Effects:
Reduced by a target's Armor value.
Can be magical (from enchanted weapons, bypassing some resistances) or non-magical. Many resistances specify "non-magical bludgeoning, piercing, and slashing damage."
Sub-Types:
Bludgeoning: Forceful impacts from blunt weapons (hammers, maces), crushing forces, or heavy falls. Effective against brittle structures or certain undead like skeletons.
Piercing: Puncturing wounds from pointed weapons (spears, daggers, arrows) or natural attacks like fangs or sharp claws. May be particularly effective at finding chinks in armor or targeting vital organs.
Slashing: Deep cuts and lacerations from edged weapons (swords, axes) or claws. Effective against unarmored flesh.
Sources: Common weaponry, creature attacks, environmental hazards.

2. Soul Damage (also referred to as Spiritual Damage)
Definition: This potent and often insidious form of damage bypasses physical defenses to directly assault a being's spiritual essence, life force, or soul. It is frequently associated with spectral energies, powers drawn from the Spectral Realm, abilities that manipulate souls, or the inherent nature of spiritual beings.
Mechanical Effects:
Ignores all non-magical (and typically magical) physical Armor.
Can effectively harm ethereal, incorporeal, or spectral creatures.
Resistance is typically not granted by physical toughness but by strong Will or Soul attributes (often through a saving throw), specific magical wards, "soulbound" items, or unique spiritual defenses.
May cause "Soul Stress" or interact with abilities related to the spirit, death, and undeath.
Your "Spiritual Damage" entry notes it can cause "lingering effects in the Spectral Realm," suggesting a visible or tangible impact on a soul's presence there.
Sources: Soul Reaver abilities (Soul Bolt), Wraith attacks, certain Sangromancer and Hylden Warlock spells, spectral weapons, direct manifestations of soul energy.

3. Fire Damage
Definition: Harm inflicted by intense heat, open flames, or magical conflagrations. It scorches flesh, ignites flammable materials, and can create areas of persistent hazard.
Mechanical Effects:
Typically reduced or negated by fire resistance (from innate biology, gear, or magic).
Vulnerable creatures (e.g., ice-based beings, some plant creatures) may take increased damage.
May have secondary effects like igniting flammable objects/terrain or causing a "Burning" condition that deals minor damage over subsequent rounds (though your system leans towards static damage, a condition is possible).
Sources: Glyph Seeker spells (Glyph of Flame, Seal of Fire), Soulfire (which is part fire), environmental fires, alchemical mixtures, some demonic or elemental entities.

4. Electrical Damage (also Shock Damage)
Definition: Injury caused by concentrated electrical discharges, lightning strikes, or raw, volatile arcane energy. It can overload senses, disrupt biological functions, and affect technological or magically powered constructs.
Mechanical Effects:
May be more effective against targets in metal armor (providing a dice penalty to their save or increasing damage) or those in water.
Can have secondary effects such as imposing dice penalties on actions (due to muscle spasms), temporarily stunning, or disrupting concentration.
Some constructs or machinery might be particularly vulnerable or, conversely, absorb and redirect it.
Sources: Glyph Seeker abilities (Shock Sigil, Glyph of Sparks), Hylden technology, storm-based magic, some elemental beings.

5. Frost Damage (also Cold Damage)
Definition: Harm resulting from exposure to extreme cold, magical ice, or life-draining chill. It numbs extremities, makes materials brittle, and can slow or halt biological processes.
Mechanical Effects:
Typically resisted by cold-resistant creatures/gear or specific magic.
Vulnerable creatures (e.g., fire-based beings, some reptilian creatures) may take increased damage.
Commonly has secondary effects like reducing movement speed (as seen with Glyph of Frost), imposing dice penalties on Dexterity-based (or Will-based) actions, or causing a "Frozen" or "Slowed" condition.
Sources: Specific Glyph Seeker spells (Glyph of Frost), ice-based magic, exposure to unnaturally cold environments or entities from frozen planes.

6. Void Damage
Definition: An esoteric and terrifying form of damage stemming from reality collapse, dimensional rifts, direct exposure to the Hylden's original chaotic dimension, or the unmaking touch of pure entropy. It is not merely an attack but an unraveling of existence.
Mechanical Effects:
Bypasses ALL Armor and ALL resistances. It is an irresistible form of harm.
Damage inflicted by Void effects often cannot be healed by normal magical or mundane means, requiring specific, powerful restorative rituals, rare artifacts, or the passage of significant time under special conditions.
On a successful hit, the target typically suffers a significant dice penalty (e.g., -2 dice, representing disadvantage) on their next saving throw against any effect, as their connection to stable reality is frayed.
Sources: Extremely potent and forbidden Hylden magic, artifacts from beyond the known planes, direct contact with entities of pure chaos/void, or areas where reality itself is breaking down.

7. Soulfire Damage
Definition: A rare and potent hybrid energy that burns with both spectral intensity and spiritual fire. It is a scouring flame that sears both the physical body and the animating soul, often appearing as an unnaturally colored or ethereal blaze.
Mechanical Effects:
Ignores all physical Armor (both mundane and magical) due to its spiritual component.
Uniquely bypasses the typical immunities of Undead creatures to fire or soul-based effects, targeting their animating negative or spiritual energies directly.
Inflicts a temporary blight on the target's life force, preventing natural healing (such as hit point recovery from rest) for 1 round unless magically cleansed (e.g., by a "Balance Strike" or specific healing magic).
Sources: The Soul Reaver blade itself, high-level Soul Reaver abilities, specific ancient or divine conflagrations.

8. Radiant Damage
Definition: Harm caused by an eruption of pure, untainted divine light, sacred power, or the focused essence of positive energy or cosmic order. It is often anathema to creatures of darkness and undeath.
Mechanical Effects:
Deals double its normal damage value to Undead and Spectral creatures.
Often resisted by creatures of significant corruption, Hylden, or those with abyssal/demonic ties. The target gains bonus dice on any save if one is allowed.
May have secondary effects like temporarily blinding creatures of darkness or dispelling minor shadow/darkness effects.
Sources: Spells and abilities of faithful Sarafan, blessed weapons, holy sites, artifacts touched by the original pure magic of the Pillars, or angelic/benevolent spirits (if any exist).

9. Corruption Damage
Definition: A vile energy that doesn't just wound the body or soul in a single instance but actively infuses the target with creeping, unnatural taint. This damage represents the insidious influence of powerful corrupting forces.
Mechanical Effects:
Directly inflicts long-term Corruption buildup on the target (e.g., the target gains 1 or more Corruption Points, or progresses along a Corruption Track, as per your system's mechanics).
On a Critical Hit with an attack dealing Corruption Damage, the target may suffer an additional increase to their Corruption score or immediately suffer a minor debilitating effect related to their new Corruption level.
Accumulated Corruption often triggers detrimental thresholds (as per your "Corrupted Perks" system), leading to negative physical or mental changes.
The shock of this type of damage often disrupts concentration effects, forcing an immediate, difficult check (e.g., DR 3 or with a dice penalty) to maintain them.
Sources: Direct attacks from highly corrupted beings (e.g., some Hylden, powerful vampires who have fallen far), exposure to active Hylden Gate energies, cursed artifacts, or forbidden rituals that draw upon entropic or abyssal powers.

10. Necrotic Damage
Definition: Damage inflicted by life-draining, unholy energies that cause flesh to wither, vitality to decay, and spirits to dim. It is distinct from pure Soul damage, often focusing on the decay of the physical form through negative energy, though it can also sap spiritual strength.
Mechanical Effects:
Often particularly effective against living creatures.
Undead creatures might be resistant or even immune to Necrotic damage, or in some cases, healed by it.
Commonly has secondary effects such as preventing Hit Point regeneration or magical healing for a duration, imposing weakness (e.g., dice penalties to Might-based checks), or causing lingering debilitating conditions related to decay.
Sources: Classic necromantic spells (animate dead, drain life), the touch of powerful undead like liches or wraiths, curses that inflict unnatural aging or decay, exposure to areas saturated with negative energy or death essence.

11. Force Damage
Definition: Pure, unbound magical energy manifested as a direct, concussive impact or an invisible field of power. It is not tied to any specific element or energy type like fire or cold but is raw arcane might given form.
Mechanical Effects:
Typically bypasses all physical Armor as it's not a conventional physical impact, but it doesn't specifically target the soul like Soul Damage.
Very few creatures possess inherent resistance to Force damage due to its pure and direct nature, unless they have broad "magic resistance."
May have secondary kinetic effects such as pushing targets back, knocking them prone, or momentarily stunning them from the sheer impact.
Sources: Spells that create blasts of pure magical power (like "Rift Pulse"), telekinetic impacts, force fields, or abilities of powerful arcane being



SANITY
In the Legacy of Kain: Bloodbound RPG, Sanity is a core mechanic representing a character's mental resilience and psychological integrity when facing the pervasive horrors, forbidden knowledge, and reality-bending forces inherent to the world of Nosgoth. It functions as a measure of a character's mental stability that can be eroded by "sanity damage". Such loss can occur through exposure to terrifying entities, the use of potent Hylden magic or other proscribed arts, specific spell effects like "Nightmare Seed", or other forms of psychic assault and trauma.
While particularly central to classes like the Hylden Warlock who frequently interact with these dangerous energies and may suffer Sanity loss as a cost for their abilities, any character might find their Sanity tested. Depleting Sanity or failing Sanity-related saving throws can lead to various detrimental gameplay effects, including "madness-related condition[s]", "severe mental state[s]" such as paranoia or catatonia, or other negative psychological consequences. Conversely, some abilities allow a character to deliberately spend or "tap" into their Sanity to achieve powerful outcomes. Characters typically resist Sanity loss through Will-based saving throws or specific perks, and recovery from Sanity damage can occur during rests or may require more potent magical intervention for severe cases.

Scene
A scene is a narrative segment or structured moment of play, such as a combat encounter, a social negotiation, or a dangerous exploration sequence. Scene-based abilities (e.g., “once per scene”) reset when the party enters a new context, such as transitioning from a battle to a conversation or from one major location to another. Requires one Tier 2 perk.





















Game Master (GM) Resources and Guidance:


 Denizens of Nosgoth

 1. Principles of NPC/Monster Design: * Reflecting Nosgoth's Themes (Corruption, Despair, Predation). * Scaling for Player Level (Threat Tiers: Minor, Standard, Major, Legendary). * Key Statistics: Health Points (HP), Defense Value (DV), Armor, Movement, Attacks (Dice Pool, Damage, Traits), Core Attributes (simplified), Key Skills, Special Abilities/Spells. * Unique Traits: How to give enemies a Legacy of Kain feel (e.g., spectral phasing, blood-fueled rage, Hylden tech).

 2. Stat Block Template: * [Provide a clear, concise template for NPC/Monster stats].

 3. Example Denizens (by Faction/Type): * Humans: Sarafan Zealot, Nomad Skirmisher, Desperate Peasant. * Vampires: Fledgling Vampire, Clan Enforcer (e.g., Turelim Brute), Ancient Seer. * Spectral Beings: Minor Wraith, Tormented Spirit, Spectral Predator. * Hylden: Hylden Scout, Corrupted Beast, Hylden Gate Guardian (minor). * Wildlife: Corrupted Wolves, Giant Spiders, etc. * (Provide 1-2 full stat blocks per category as examples).

 4. Modifying and Customizing Enemies: * Applying Corrupted Perks to NPCs. * Creating "Elite" or "Champion" versions of standard enemies. * Using templates for different roles (Brute, Skirmisher, Caster, Leader).



The Economy of Nosgoth: A World of Scarcity and Power
The world of Nosgoth, shattered by war, corruption, and the tyranny of immortals, operates less on formal economic systems and more on raw necessity, power, and the echoes of a broken past. Traditional currencies have largely collapsed, replaced by a complex interplay of barter, factional influence, and unique, often grim, forms of exchange.
I. General Economic Principles
The Collapse of Formal Systems: Centuries of conflict and the decay of human civilization have rendered most pre-war monetary systems obsolete. Ancient coins might be found, but their value is often more as historical curiosities or raw material than as standardized currency. Trust in such tokens has eroded.
The Primacy of Survival (Barter): For most of Nosgoth's inhabitants, especially humans, daily life is a struggle for survival. The most common form of exchange is direct barter for essential goods:
Food & Clean Water: The rarest and most valuable commodities for mortals.
Basic Tools & Materials: Simple weapons, farming implements, scrap metal, sturdy cloth, wood.
Shelter & Security: Safe passage, a defensible room for the night, or a place within fortified walls.
Rudimentary Medicine: Herbs, poultices, and the skills to apply them.
Scarcity and Desperation: Resources are scarce and unevenly distributed. This breeds desperation, making even mundane items highly valuable in certain contexts. Hoarding is common, and trade is often fraught with danger.
Power Dictates Value: Ultimately, what is "valuable" is often dictated by those in power. A vampire lord might value a skilled artisan thrall far more than a chest of old coins, while a Sarafan commander might prize information above all else.
II. Currencies and Valuables
While formal currency is rare, several items and concepts function as de facto currency or hold significant value:
Blood (Vampire Society & Beyond):
Literal Value: For vampires, fresh, potent blood is life, power, and sustenance. It can be a direct currency within vampire society – vials of "pure" human blood, blood from specific lineages, or even magically enhanced vitae.
Symbolic Value: Access to feeding grounds, control over blood thralls, or the promise of a "blood boon" (a future feeding right or a gift of potent blood) can be traded among vampires.
Human Perspective: Humans might trade information or services for protection from exsanguination or for a "controlled" tithe of blood if living under vampire rule.
Ancient Relics & Artifacts:
Old World Coins: Though not widely accepted as currency, coins from Nosgoth's more prosperous past (e.g., from the era of the Circle of Nine before its corruption) might be valued by collectors, historians, or as sources of refined metal. Their value is inconsistent and highly localized.
Pillar Fragments/Shards: Infused with residual magical energy, these are incredibly rare and potent. Valued by sorcerers, those seeking to understand the Pillars, or entities wishing to further corrupt or exploit them.
Hylden Technology Scraps: Remnants of Hylden devices – glyph-etched plates, power conduits, strange alloys – are sought by those daring enough to study their dangerous magic (like some Glyph Seekers or Hylden Warlocks).
Sarafan Insignia & Relics: Old symbols of the Sarafan Order, blessed weapons, or fragments of their doctrine might be treasured by surviving human zealots or collected by vampires as trophies or objects of study.
Soul Essence & Echoes:
Soul Shards/Crystals: In a world where souls are a commodity for entities like the Elder God, crystallized soul essence or items trapping souls (as per the "Bind Soul" ritual) could be a dark but potent form of currency, especially among necromancers, wraiths, or those dealing with extra-planar entities.
Memory Echoes: Wraiths or powerful psychics might trade in potent memories or emotional echoes, offering glimpses of the past or specific knowledge for a price.
Knowledge, Lore & Glyphs:
Spell Scrolls & Ritual Texts: Practical magical knowledge is invaluable. Well-preserved scrolls, instructions for potent rituals, or forbidden texts command high prices or demand significant favors.
Maps & Charts: Reliable maps of Nosgoth's treacherous terrain, hidden pathways, or the locations of ruins and resources are highly sought after.
Glyph Patterns: Unique or powerful glyph sequences, especially those for warding or potent traps, can be traded among Glyph Seekers or sold to those needing magical defenses.
Crafted Goods & Rare Materials:
Masterwork Weapons & Armor: Well-crafted, durable gear is always in demand. Items made by skilled smiths (human or vampire) or those with unique properties fetch high prices.
Alchemical Components & Rare Herbs: Ingredients for potions, poisons, or rituals, especially those found in dangerous or magically-infused areas.
Glyph-Inscription Materials: Specially prepared parchments, inks infused with magical properties, or rare stones suitable for permanent glyphs.
III. Factional Economies & Trade Dynamics
Different factions value different things and engage in trade in distinct ways:
Human Settlements (e.g., a hidden village, a struggling town):
Focus: Survival. Trade is primarily barter-based for food, medicine, tools, and protection. Old coins might circulate in more established (but still precarious) settlements.
Exports: Labor, crafted goods (simple), scavenged materials, information about local dangers.
Imports: Food, weapons, protection, rare medicines.
Vampire Dominions (e.g., Kain's territory, individual clan holdings):
Focus: Power, control, sustenance.
Internal Currency: Blood (literal and symbolic), thralls, territory rights, favors owed, fear, and loyalty.
External "Trade": Often involves conquest, raiding human settlements for blood and thralls, or demanding tribute. Some more "sophisticated" vampire lords might engage in coercive trade for unique human crafts, knowledge, or entertainment.
Sarafan Remnants (e.g., hidden cells, isolated fortresses):
Focus: The Crusade, purity, order.
Internal Economy: Based on tithes, shared resources, and devotion to the cause. Blessed items, relics of past saints, and strategic information are highly valued.
External "Trade": Likely secretive, seeking weapons, supplies, and information to fight vampires. May offer protection or guidance to trusted human groups in exchange for support.
Outcasts, Scavengers & Mercenaries (e.g., those in the Termogent Forest or ruined cities):
Focus: Opportunism, self-preservation.
Currency: Anything of immediate practical value – weapons, armor, food, potent relics, information that can be sold. They are pragmatic and will use whatever "currency" is accepted by their current trading partners.
The Spectral Realm:
Currency: Less tangible. Wraiths and spirits might trade in soul fragments, potent memories, echoes of strong emotions, secrets of the dead, or passage through dangerous spectral pathways. Favors and binding oaths are significant.
IV. Services as Currency
In a world lacking stable currency, skills and services are often bartered directly:
Protection: Bodyguard services, escorting caravans, defending locations.
Information: Secrets, rumors, enemy movements, locations of resources or dangers.
Assassination/Bounty Hunting: Eliminating rivals or troublesome individuals.
Magical Aid: Spellcasting services (healing, warding, divination, offensive magic), glyph inscription, ritual performance.
Guidance: Leading parties through treacherous terrain or forgotten ruins.
Crafting & Repair: Forging weapons, mending armor, creating alchemical concoctions.
Labor: Manual labor for construction, farming (for humans), or serving a master (thralls).
V. GM Guidance: Implementing Nosgoth's Economy
Emphasize Scarcity: Make essential resources genuinely hard to come by. Finding a reliable source of food or a skilled blacksmith should feel like an achievement.
Contextual Value: The worth of an item should fluctuate wildly based on location, faction, and immediate need. A vial of clean water is priceless in a parched wasteland but common near a pure spring.
Design Trade Encounters: Trade shouldn't just be a menu of items. Encounters with merchants (who might be desperate humans, shifty outcasts, or even calculating vampires) should be roleplaying opportunities, fraught with potential negotiation, deception, or danger.
Meaningful Wealth: "Wealth" in Nosgoth might mean a secure haven, a loyal retinue, access to rare knowledge, or a powerful relic, rather than a hoard of gold. Quests could revolve around acquiring these forms of wealth.
Integrate with Character Motivation:
A vampire PC might constantly need to secure blood sources.
A human scholar might risk everything for a lost tome.
A Glyph Seeker might hunt for rare materials for their craft.
Quest Rewards: Instead of gold, reward players with valuable barter goods, useful relics, favors from influential NPCs, safe passage, vital information, or access to unique training or resources.
The economic system designed in "Economy of Nosgoth: A World of Scarcity and Power" intentionally moves away from fixed monetary costs for equipment, reflecting Nosgoth's shattered and desperate state. Traditional currencies have largely collapsed [nosgoth_economy_system], and the value of items is highly contextual, based on scarcity, immediate need, location, and factional influence [nosgoth_economy_system].
Instead of a price list in ancient coins, the "cost" of equipment would be determined by:
Barter Value:


Most transactions, especially for common gear, would involve bartering essential goods. For example:
An Iron Longsword might cost a significant amount of preserved food and clean water in a starving human settlement, or perhaps a working set of tools.
Traveler's Leathers might be traded for rare medicinal herbs or several days' worth of protection services.
The GM would determine what equivalent goods or services an item is worth in a specific situation.
Availability & Scarcity:


Common Gear (e.g., Iron Longsword, basic leather armor, simple tools) might be obtainable through barter in larger or more stable settlements, or found through scavenging. Their "cost" is in the effort to find traders or the risk of salvaging.
Class-Specific or Masterwork Gear (e.g., a Sarafan Pike, Bloodsteel Cuirass ) would be much harder to come by. These would likely not be for "sale" in a traditional sense. Acquiring them might involve:
Earning them as a reward from a relevant faction for significant service.
Crafting them, requiring rare materials and high Craft skill.
Taking them from powerful defeated enemies.
Rare & Relic Weapons (e.g., Moonlit Fang, Soulreaver Prime) are unique items. Their acquisition should be tied to major plot points, difficult quests, or discovering forgotten lore, not a simple purchase [nosgoth_economy_system]. Their "cost" is narrative.
Factional Standing & Favors:


Access to certain equipment might only be possible through factions. A Sarafan Crusader might only receive a Blessed Mace after proving their loyalty and completing a sacred task. The "cost" is service and allegiance.
Favors from powerful individuals (vampire lords, enigmatic sorcerers) could grant access to unique items, with the "cost" being a future unspecified service or a binding oath.
Unique "Currencies":


In vampire society, a Scion Blade might be gifted for exceptional loyalty, or its equivalent "value" measured in potent blood tithes or control over valuable thralls.
A Spiritshard Wand or a rare spell scroll might be traded among mages for significant Soul Essence, rare knowledge, or unique glyph patterns .
GM Guidance for Determining "Cost":
Instead of listing prices, the GM should consider these factors when a player wishes to acquire equipment:
What is the item? (Mundane, well-crafted, magical, artifact?)
Where are the players? (Struggling human village, vampire-controlled city, ancient ruin?)
Who are they trying to get it from? (Desperate merchant, proud faction quartermaster, opportunistic scavenger?)
What does the seller/current owner value? (Survival, power, knowledge, blood, loyalty?)
What resources or leverage do the players have? (Valuable barter goods, useful skills, information, factional standing?)
Example Scenarios:
Acquiring a Nosgothian War Axe in a human outpost: Might require trading a large supply of jerky and a working water purifier, plus a promise to help defend against an upcoming beast attack.
Obtaining a Nightshade Cloak from a vampire contact: Might involve a subtle exchange of valuable information about Sarafan movements or performing a covert task for the vampire.
Finding Ritual Vestments for a Forbidden Scholar: Could be the reward for delving into a dangerous, forgotten library and surviving its guardians, rather than a purchase.



Encounter Design and Balancing:


Defining Encounter Difficulty: Use a system of combined "Threat Value" for NPCs/monsters against the party's average level and number of players.
Action Economy: Consider the number of actions the enemy side has versus the player side.
Synergies: Design encounters where enemy abilities complement each other.
Environment: How terrain, hazards, and Energy Foci can alter difficulty.
Narrative Weight: Not all encounters need to be deadly; some serve to deplete resources or advance the story.
Awarding Progression:

Milestone Character Progression
As an alternative to tracking individual experience points (XP) for every monster slain or minor task completed, the Milestone Experience Progression system ties character advancement directly to significant narrative achievements and story arcs. This method allows the Game Master (GM) to control the pacing of the campaign and ensures characters level up at dramatically appropriate moments.
What is Milestone Progression?
With milestone progression, characters gain a level when the GM determines they have reached a significant point in the story, completed a major quest, overcome a formidable story-related obstacle, or made a discovery that profoundly impacts their journey or the world of Nosgoth.
Advantages of Using Milestone Progression:
Narrative Focus: Keeps the emphasis on story goals and character development rather than "XP grinding."
Controlled Pacing: Allows the GM to ensure the party is appropriately leveled for upcoming challenges and story beats.
Simplified Tracking: Reduces bookkeeping for both the GM and players, as individual XP tallies are unnecessary.
Rewards Diverse Playstyles: Characters are rewarded for clever problem-solving, impactful roleplaying, and achieving narrative goals, not just combat prowess.
Group Cohesion: The entire party typically levels up simultaneously, maintaining a consistent power level within the group.
Examples of Milestones in Nosgoth:
Milestones should represent significant turning points or accomplishments. Consider the following examples:
Major Quest Completion:
Successfully defending a human settlement from a vampire siege.
Retrieving a lost artifact crucial to understanding the Pillars.
Uncovering and thwarting a major plot by Moebius or a Hylden agent.
Significant Discoveries:
Finding a hidden Vampire Citadel or Sarafan Stronghold.
Deciphering an ancient prophecy that reveals a new path or dire warning.
Learning the true nature of a key faction or character.
Overcoming Major Adversaries:
Defeating a powerful vampire lieutenant or a significant monstrous threat.
Successfully navigating a deadly, lore-rich dungeon or ruin and its guardians.
Character Development/Story Arc Progression:
A character making a profound choice that alters their destiny or allegiance (e.g., a vampire choosing defiance over servitude, a human embracing a dangerous truth).
Resolving a significant personal storyline tied to a character's background or motivation.
Restoring a fraction of balance to a corrupted Pillar or region.
Shifting World State:
Witnessing or causing an event that significantly changes the political or mystical landscape of a region.
Pacing Character Advancement:
The frequency of leveling via milestones is at the GM's discretion and should be tailored to the campaign's desired pace and length.
Early Levels (1-5): Milestones might occur more frequently, perhaps every 2-4 game sessions, as characters establish themselves and overcome initial hurdles.
Mid Levels (6-15): Leveling might slow slightly, occurring every 3-5 sessions or after the completion of more substantial story arcs.
Late Levels (16-20): Milestones will likely represent major campaign victories or resolutions, potentially occurring less frequently but marking truly epic achievements.
Communicating Milestones:
While you don't need to announce "this specific action is a milestone," it's good practice to:
Signal Significance: Let players feel the weight and importance of their accomplishments that lead to leveling.
Announce Level-Ups Clearly: At the end of a session where a milestone has been achieved, or at the beginning of the next, inform the players that they have reached the next level.
Tie it to the Narrative: Briefly explain why they are leveling up in relation to their recent actions and the story's progression. This reinforces the connection between their choices and their growth.
Example GM statement: "After successfully navigating the Sunken Tombs, deciphering the Hylden's warning, and escaping the Elder God's spectral grasp, you all feel a profound shift in your understanding of Nosgoth's peril and your own capabilities. You have reached a new milestone. You may advance your characters to Level X."



Guidance on Narrative Abilities:


Suggestion: Add GM advice for perks like "Reality Fracture".
Proposed Guidance (New Content in GM Section):

 "Adjudicating Reality Fracture: This potent perk allows a player to narrate an 'impossible act'. When a player invokes this:


Listen to the Player's Intent: Understand what they hope to achieve.
Assess Narrative Impact: Does it break the campaign or just a current obstacle? The perk specifies "not permanently game-breaking" and "not negate entire plot arcs".
Collaborate on the Outcome: The GM resolves it "creatively". This means working with the player. It might not happen exactly as described but should achieve a significant, narratively powerful result.
Introduce Consequence (Optional but Thematic): Even if successful, such a blatant defiance of reality might attract unwanted attention (Elder God, Time Streamers, Paradox Demons) or cause localized temporal instability later on."

